Authors
Craig Roush
Number of Reviews
98

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
Release Date: August 14, 1998
Starring: Ralph Fiennes, Uma Thurman, Sean Connery, Jim Broadbent, Fiona
Shaw, Patrick Macnee, Eddie Izzard
Directed by: Jeremiah S. Chechik
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: PG (action violence, some innuendo) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/avengers.htm
Making the jump from television series to major American motion picture
is a timeless and storied art mastered by few directors and filmmakers.
At first glance, the transition might not seem nearly as difficult as it
is, but upon closer examination it becomes apparent that the differences
between the two media are large enough to cause significant problems.
The episodic fallback of TV - that is, if it doesn't happen this week,
it can always happen next week - is not present; and directors who have
become used to directing forty-two-minute segments must suddenly deal
with at least ninety and sometimes upwards of 120 minutes of footage.
THE AVENGERS, a spinoff of the popular 1960's British show of the same
name, is neither the first nor the last to fail at making the jump; if
anything, its failure to come together was imminent enough. 
Everyone involved here has seen better days, including Director Jeremiah
Chechik. His last big-screen feature, DIABOLIQUE, was a suspenseful and
engaging mystery thriller. Here, his work approaches comic book
territory in an ignorant fashion similar to that of the last two BATMAN
features. The characters are larger than life - in a bad sense - and are
never quite on the audience's level. All three principals are played by
A-list names, but each of the three have seen better days. Connery's
work here is uncharacteristically drab, and not since 1996's THE ROCK
has he been much fun. Ralph Fiennes and Uma Thurman, too, are fine for
the roles apart but fail to start much in the way of romantic chemistry
together. 
If anything, the movie is fun to watch for several reasons, although you
may have trouble convincing a friend to see the movie with you. Even
though Connery is rather drab, it's been over two years since the
infamous Brit has been on the scene; any dialogue he speaks is
invariably fun to listen to. Also, the movie's one bit of vulgar
language comes both from an unlikely character and at a horribly
unlikely moment; it's over and done so fast that you might not believe
your ears. Finally, in typical comic book fashion, the bad guys are
surly, hulking fellows with third-grade vocabularies or women in tight
catsuits. Both elicit attention from the audience, for varying reasons
and lengths of time. 
But any ground made there is lost in the terribly convoluted and
laborious plot that THE AVENGERS sports. John Steed (Fiennes) and Emma
Peel (Thurman) are suave and debonaire secret agents, charged with
finding the cause in a recent sabotage of a British defense mechanism
called Prospero. Prospero, it seems, has the ability to create a weather
"shield" around the British Isles should the Union Jack come under
siege. In the wrong hands (August de Wynter, played by Connery), though,
the controllable weather turns into an extortion plan. De Wynter will
bombard the isles with typhoons and lightning unless paid an appropriate
sum. Several questions are left completely or partially unanswered
throughout the movie, including an Emma Peel clone. Overall, THE
AVENGERS is too goofy to be much fun; and with luck its box office
returns will be nil, sparing us of a sequel.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE AVENGERS": 1.5 stars - a below average movie.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Release Date: November 25, 1998
The Voices of: Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, Hayden
Panettiere, Phyllis Diller, Denis Leary, Joe Ranft, John Ratzenberger
Directed by: John Lasseter, Andrew Stanton
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: G 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/bugslife.htm
Lest their be any question of whether or not the Mouse House still packs
any animated clout, consider this to be the convincing argument
otherwise. 
With a eerie feeling of déjŕ vu and a virtual replay of events earlier
this year, Disney's computer-animated movie about insects, A BUG'S LIFE,
not only beat out the competition (DreamWorks' ANTZ), but did so by a
good measure. Although there may have been doubt as to which of the
"double-vision" asteroid pics would succeed (DreamWorks' DEEP IMPACT
versus Disney's ARMAGEDDON), there was no question when DreamWorks chose
to challenge Disney on its own turf. The animation in A BUG'S LIFE is of
the finest quality, superb in design and free of the flaws that plagued
DreamWorks' picture. The graphic end of the movie -- a bright palette of
pastel hues -- runs smoothly and to great effect. 
Unlike ANTZ, which was a story of internal strife in an ant colony, A
BUG'S LIFE returns to Ćsopian ground and gives us a tale of ants against
grasshoppers. Strictly speaking, both the script and the voice talent in
A BUG'S LIFE is not nearly as developed as that of ANTZ (the latter
being written with more thought and intelligence), but the simplicity of
A BUG'S LIFE is the key to its success. The movie is a departure from
the serious fare of the competition's animation studios, and, in true
Disney fashion, is plea to the viewer's inner child. Characters are
drawn with an attitude of innocence, and bad guys are sulking, sneering
characters. It's the typical Disney formula, and as far as many are
concerned, that formula's still tops. 
The story centers around the life of an ant named Flik (Dave Foley, TV's
"News Radio"), whose curious tendancies land his colony in trouble when
he unknowingly ruins the year's harvest. Flik's colony gathers food for
a gang of grasshoppers, but when Flik sends the offering into the drink,
the lead grasshopper, Hopper (Kevin Spacey), delivers an ultimatum. The
ants must gather a replacement harvest by autumn, or Hopper and his gang
will destroy the colony. Flik decides to make amends by gathering a
group of warrior bugs to fight the grasshoppers, and to keep him out of
the way, the colony's Princess Atta (Julia Louis-Dreyfus, TV's
"Seinfeld") gives him approval. So Flik heads to the "city" and returns
with a troupe of circus bugs whom he believes to be great warriors, just
in time for he first day of autumn. 
The script is peppered with witticisms to keep the older crowd
interested, and there's plenty of slapstick comedy for the younger ones.
At an hour and forty minutes, however, the movie runs a bit longer than
necessary; kids may grow restless nearing the end. Fortunately, the
competition over the holiday weekend isn't much better: BABE: PIG IN THE
CITY and THE RUGRATS MOVIE are both over ninety minutes in length. For
family entertainment, it doesn't get much better than this, and the
Academy may just think so as well -- there's something here for
everyone.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
Release Date: January 15, 1999
Starring: Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, Elias
Koteas, Nick Nolte, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, John Travolta, George
Clooney
Directed by: Terrence Malick
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Film Corp.
MPAA Rating: R (prolonged sequences of war violence, strong language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/thinredline.htm 
James Jones, one of the major novelists from the middle of the twentieth
century, has written a number of fictional works about the effects of
war on the individual. A veteran of World War II, and a witness to the
Pearl Harbor bombings, his novels are not only grounded in realism but
poetic in nature. They are reminiscent of Stephen Crane in their blunt
eloquence, a trait which lends itself to razor-sharp focus. But perhaps
none matches the scope of his autobiographical novel, THE THIN RED LINE;
now a cinematic masterpiece from director Terrence Malick. 
The book's principal cast, some thirty characters, has been trimmed down
for this rendition, but it still retains its most endearing value. Each
of the roles has an everyman quality, emphasizing Jones' examination of
World War II on the American soldier. There's a definitive chain of
command present, and this also plays on the motivations of the cast. But
most importantly, and perhaps intrinsic to the novel but not to the
movie, a dynamic and effective voice-over is used. Malick has several
characters relating their thoughts, giving the viewer a greater
perspective of the issues at stake. 
The issues at stake are many and one. Told from a limited third-person
perspective (as opposed to a top-down, omniscient view), the movie
entails the struggle of an American infantry company ("C-for-Charlie")
to take a hill during the conflict at Guadalcanal. The South Pacific
island is seen by the top brass as the key position for American armed
forces to hold if they want to win the war. 
And want to win the war they do. In an excellent performance, Nick Nolte
plays C-for-Charlie's commanding officer, Lt. Col. Gordon Tall. He's an
aging soldier who embodies the win-at-all-costs mentality, if only to
impress his superior (John Travolta, in a questionable cameo). This
philosophy is opposite that of Captain Bugger Staros (Elias Koteas), who
dearly values the life of each and every one of the men under his
command. At the front are the privates and corporals (Adrien Brody,
James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, et al), lead by 1st Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn),
who must actually execute the suicide orders handed down to them. 
THE THIN RED LINE is filled with intense, visual poetry, but it's nearly
three hours long. Although the interest level is high throughout the
first two hours, the climax comes forty-five minutes before the end of
the movie; it goes without saying that the movie drags on the back end. 
THE THIN RED LINE will doubtless be compared to 1998's other masterpiece
of war, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN a countless number of times. But to do so is
to belittle both films, for although similarities abound, so do
differences. Director Malick has a story to tell, and for those
interested in listening, this can be a very outstanding movie.

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
Release Date: July 10, 1998
Starring: Kirsten Dunst, Gregory Smith, Phil Hartman, Jay Mohr, Denis
Leary
The Voices of: Tommy Lee Jones, Frank Langella, Sarah Michelle Gellar,
Christina Ricci
Directed by: Joe Dante
Distributed by: DreamWorks Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (violence, brief language, thematic elements) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/small.htm
Certain movies can be marketed for one demographic and made for another.
And often, that same movie may be suitable for neither grouping. When
that happens to a movie, there's an awful, sinking feeling that occurs
while watching it. And you get that feeling when watching the story in
SMALL SOLDIERS unfold. The movie runs 110 minutes long, but somewhere in
the middle it becomes very apparent that this movie was not made for
anyone over twelve years of age. The dialogue, story, and setting are
very childish, and only the spectacular special effects and sometimes
on-target humor make this movie a tad worthwhile. 
The movie begins at, conveniently, the beginning, when GloboTech
Industries president Gil Mars (Denis Leary) licenses his weapons
technology to toy makers (headed up by Jay Mohr). Two lines of these
super-smart, self-aware, "living" toys are introduced: the Commando
Elite - G.I. Joe wannabes - and the Gorgonites - STAR WARS alien extras.
These opening scenes are a bit ponderous, and they spend too much time
on characters that aren't important. The most miscast of all is Denis
Leary, whose character is too confined for him to make use of his
cynical comedic talent. Eventually, though, they do introduce the main
plot. A shipment of the toys makes its way to a small-time toy store
owned by Alan Abernathy (Gregory Smith) and his father (Kevin Dunn). The
first time the toys come "alive," they overrun the store and escape
before anyone notices. This is Alan's fault, because he was supposed to
be watching the store that day. 
Alan's got a rocky relationship with his family because he once
graffitied the wall of a school he was at and pulled the fire alarm.
These seemingly superfluous bits of knowledge about Alan's character are
extracted tediously, and to no effect. The biggest result of all of the
development of his character is that his parents don't trust him, which
is the setup for many formulaic scenes. Alan gets caught doing something
that has an explanation, but they won't believe him. This, along with
the very out-of-place love story between Alan and his next-door neighbor
Christy (Kirsten Dunst), are nothing but lopsided lampoons of
prepubescent cinema. There's nothing here that hasn't been done before,
and it's up to the toys to save the day and the integrity of the pic.
Which they do, with varied success. 
After the toys escape from the toy store, they fight the battle to end
all battles at Alan's house. There's a lot of unnecessary violence in
this scene and at other points throughout the movie, making it largely
questionable as a children's movie. On one side, the good guy toys - the
Gorgonites - aren't really that likeable. As Alan says, they're "losers
with self-esteem problems." They're programmed to lose, and their
monotonous, defeated voices don't really help. On the other side are the
Commando Elite, which really are the most fun in the entire movie. Tommy
Lee Jones voices the lead Commando, Chip Hazard, with great success, and
if not for the violence included, they would be a fine source of comic
relief. However, that final fallback - the comedy - also fails largely.
Phil Hartman is very underused, and the only jokes that work are
none-too-subtle jabs at the Spice Girls and TITANIC. This movie is just
too off-balance to be much fun, and the target audience is never really
honed in upon. Seeing it is a very gutsy movie.
FINAL AWARD FOR "SMALL SOLDIERS": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Release Date: May 20, 1998
Starring: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria,
Michael Lerner, Arabella Field, Kevin Dunn, Harry Shearer
Directed by: Roland Emmerich
Distributed by: TriStar Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sci-fi monster action/violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/godzilla.htm
Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin, creators, writers, and producers of
1998's long-awaited monster thriller GODZILLA, once caught lightning in
the bottle with 1996's INDEPENDENCE DAY. So overhyped that it became the
must-see movie of the year, and eventually impossibly successful with
the summer movie crowds, and so corny and melodramatic that it was
actually fun to watch, ID4 was the pinnacle of senseless cinema. In
keeping with the lightning analogy, though, it rarely strikes the same
place twice, and Emmerich and Devlin have turned out a product here that
pales in comparison to their earlier alien-invasion film. 
The Memorial Day weekend has long been home to loud and high-powered
movies (e.g. MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, THE LOST WORLD). After all, it
practically opens the summer movie season. In fact, the much-overhyped
movie that opens on Memorial Day is typically the only movie to have a
chance to outdo the much-overhyped movie that opens on the July 4
weekend. However, if there was any doubt prior to GODZILLA's opening,
this Memorial Day movie will likely fade quickly once the asteroid
thriller ARMAGEDDON takes to the screens. After the limpness of DEEP
IMPACT and the downright staleness of GODZILLA, audiences will be
looking for something sharp and intense when they attend the theaters. 
The reason GODZILLA is so stale is because the picture is incredibly
formulaic. It follows the typical maxim that "my enemy is only my enemy
until I know his secret." Although that was present in INDEPENDENCE DAY,
it wasn't completely obvious until the final thirty minutes. Here,
Emmerich brings Godzilla (a gecko-ish creature created from a French
nuclear explosion) to New York City with little premise but much
fanfare; turns the disaster and distruction knob to 11; and sits back as
a paltry crew of humans works frantically to hit the beast with
everything they have. The special effects, very JURASSIC PARK-ish in
nature, depict an agile Godzilla that's novel but hardly worth much. For
almost the whole of its 135-minute running time, this movie is nothing
but a messy mix of special effects and bad acting. 
The only way to enjoy GODZILLA is to dumb yourself down prior to
watching the flick. Matthew Broderick and Maria Pitillo, our two leads,
almost seem to be laughing silently at their parts. Most of the cast,
save the watchable Jean Reno, follows in accordance, and this results in
the movie being split into two entirely different sections. The movie
gravitates towards parody ground when the beast isn't on screen, and
then makes a radical shift towards guns-blazing action territory
whenever the call comes in that Godzilla looms nearby. It's much harder
to get as attached or involved here as most were in INDEPENDENCE, but
with the imminent box office returns and the wide-open ending (again,
formulaic), it won't be long before we see GODZILLA 2.
FINAL AWARD FOR "GODZILLA": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
Release Date: April 23, 1999
Starring: John Cusack, Billy Bob Thornton, Cate Blanchett, Angelina
Jolie, Jake Weber, Kurt Fuller, Vicki Lewis
Directed by: Mike Newell
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Films Corp.
MPAA Rating: R (language, a scene of sexuality) 
If there's a movie to be made, there's somebody there to make it -- and
there's a movie to be made about everything. So it comes as no surprise
that veteran "Cheers" writers Glen and Les Charles came up with a darkly
introspective comedy about air traffic controllers. The premise, based
on New York Times Magazine columnist Darcy Frey's article "Something's
Got to Give," sets the audience in the high-tension world of those
responsible for directing what suddenly becomes the scariest form of
mass transportation. It's an atmosphere that ought to be ripe with sick
humor and high-strung individuals, and indeed it is -- until the script
takes over. Then PUSHING TIN, the latest from DONNIE BRASCO director
Mike Newell, becomes a ho-hum presentation of stale characters and
unfinished humor. 
The usually-delightful John Cusack stars as Nick Falzone, the ace
controller for New York's Terminal Radar Approach Control (TRACON). He's
a slighty off-kilter individual whose life is heading down a dangerous
path, but Nick is oblivious to this in the intense confines of work. So
when TRACON brings in Russell Bell (Billy Bob Thornton), a controller
from out-of-town who can easily match Falzone's acumen, Nick begins to
lose control of his life. The suspicion that his wife Connie (Cate
Blanchett) may be sleeping with Russell leads Nick to an affair with
Mrs. Russell Bell (Angelina Jolie), and soon this erratic lifestyle
drives Connie away. Then it's up to Nick to put the pieces back
together. 
Although billed as a romantic comedy of sorts, PUSHING TIN makes very
little success in this area. The typical qualities associated with that
variety of comedies is not present: instead of cute romances and a
feel-good atmosphere, the movie is filled with tawdry affairs and
spiteful language. Cusack's charm, which gained so much ground in the
outstanding GROSSE POINTE BLANK, does not make an appearance here, and
the movie suffers without it. Cate Blanchett and Angelina Jolie do not
make much difference, and neither gives a standout performance. The
worst of the lot, however, is the miscast Billy Bob Thornton. Although
he excels in the oddball roles, the character of Russell Bell has too
many mixed motivations for Thornton's unique approach to work. His
efforts are wasted and the role comes out upside-down. 
For the most part, the movie as a whole has similar mixed motivations.
Although the friction between Nick and Russell ought to generate some
sort of witty report, the atmosphere is icy and the air is thick with
tension. That's no fun for the audience, and with no sympathetic factor
working in its favor, the comedy in PUSHING TIN's script falls flat on
its face. The jokes are mostly wry, tongue-in-cheek humor which, at
best, inspires nothing more than an occasional chuckle at how bitter it
is; in the end, though, there is no true humor involved. The movie is a
basket of tarnished goods, and only brief moments of genuine tension and
excitement (such as visuals of New York's packed airspace or a bomb
threat scene near the end) save PUSHING TIN from crashing and burning. 

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
Release Date: April 10, 1998
Starring: Justin Lazard, Natasha Henstridge, Marg Helgenberger, Michael
Madsen, Mykelti Williamson, James Cromwell
Directed by: Peter Medak
Distributed by: Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer
MPAA Rating: R (strong sexuality, sci-fi violence/gore, language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/species2.htm 
Hollywood is increasingly feeling the need to produce big-budget films
that contain gratuitous sex and violence. The second such film in less
than a month (after WILD THINGS), SPECIES II has given movie goers
another reason to fear studio-produced films. In movies such as this,
there is no such thing as depth, no one has an alterior motive,
duplicity is unlikely, and dynamism is impossible. Every single element
is laid out for the viewer to see, and anything approaching complexity
is hammered home; everyone in the audience is forced to watch the movie
on the level of the lowest common denominator. 
This might be expected from Director Peter Medak, who is a veteran
director from the hit television series HOMICIDE: LIFE ON THE STREETS.
Confined to a span of forty-two minutes, it's no wonder a film that runs
ninety-five minutes in length is hard for him to design. There's not
much to expect from the screenwriting department, either, because the
only other major feature that Chris Brancato has penned was 1997's
Laurence Fishburne starrer, HOODLUM. So the only thing left to turn to
is, in this order: sex, special effects, and violence. 
Justin Lazard plays Patrick Ross, an astronaut who is the first man to
walk on Mars. After some melodramatic screentime, he becomes infected
with alien DNA that renders him in a precarious condition: any woman he
has sex with will grotesquely perish moments after intercourse. This
becomes a problem for the increasingly sexually active Ross, who
receives no help from his father (James Cromwell). Only Dr. Laura Baker
(Marg Helgenberger) and a team of scientists, who've recreated a
friendly version Sil (the female alien from the original SPECIES) - now
named Eve - know how to stop him. So they call in Press Lenox (Michael
Madsen, who reprises the role) to hunt down Ross. Unfortunately, there's
a telekinetic bond between Eve and Ross, and their peaking levels of
estrogen and testosterone, respectively, give them a strong desire to
mate. 
The movie might actually have a chance of thrilling the audience if
there wasn't so much gratuitous sex. The theme of the movie distracts
the audience's attention from what's going on: rather thangetting scared
by any of the several tense scenes, the focus is on how long it will be
until somebody takes their clothes off. Thus there is no reason to
comment on the acting, for nobody save Mykelti Williamson has any degree
of emotion. Cromwell's decreased screen time means he can't lend the
gravity here that he did in L.A. CONFIDENTIAL, and as the movie
progresses towards the end, everything loses any degree of seriousness.
This is another movie that's saved only by special effects and the
merest murmurings of a plot; definitely missable by anyone's standards.
FINAL AWARD FOR "SPECIES II": 1.5 stars - a below average movie.

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
Release Date: March 26, 1999
Starring: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Ellen DeGeneres, Woody
Harrelson, Martin Landau, Dennis Hopper, Elizabeth Hurley
Directed by: Ron Howard
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sex-related situations, partial nudity, crude
language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/edtv.htm
If John Steinbeck were alive today, he would be proud. The use of one
man as a metaphor for many, a theme so prevalent in his great American
novels, is also a principal element in EDTV. This latest
media-versus-man movie, which might be loosely grouped with last
summer's semiparanoia drama THE TRUMAN SHOW, gives us director Ron
Howard's take on issues of celebrity, fame, misadventure, and the road
less traveled. If not for the been-there-done-that feeling stapled to
EDTV in the wake of THE TRUMAN SHOW this movie would be an innovative
dramedy with much to say and a rather cute means of exhortation. 
EDTV starts at RealTV, a cable television network which specializes in
the FOX vein of it-actually-happened programming. Although the network
is in a slump -- losing to the Gardening Channel, in fact -- program
director Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres) has a hot idea. To boost
ratings, the network will hold casting calls for a regular individual
and then film his life twenty-four hours a day, indefinitely. Cynthia
chooses San Francisco local Ed Pekurny (Matthew McConaughey) almost by
chance, and soon our unassuming protagonist has more fame then he knows
what to do with. It alienates his girlfriend Shari (Jenna Elfman) and
his brother Ray (Woody Harrelson), and it even causes doubts in Ed's
mind as to whether or not this new life is truly what he bargained for. 
The ending is a clever escape, but it's not what the audience bargained
for, and in that sense it's similar to the Peter Weir-directed THE
TRUMAN SHOW. In fact, a large percentage of the script is lifted the
Weir film, and those who watch these films together will undoubtedly
find countless similarities. However, while THE TRUMAN SHOW prefers to
run in metaphorical circles and dance with esoteric symbolism, EDTV
chooses to focus on a literal message. Any larger elements are purely
speculative during the picture, and only upon viewing the film straight
through is there any merit to thematic criticism. Director Howard's
internal message is simple and straightforward: the grass is greener on
the other side. 
The grass may be greener on the other side for Ed Pekurny, but certainly
not for Matthew McConaughey, and this is one of the film's only
shortcomings. The cast is a dynamic bunch of individuals, well chosen in
sum and critical to success individually, but the themes do not befit a
lot of Hollywood veterans. McConaughey is not credible in the everyman
role of Ed, and he seems to play the character off the wall rather than
down to earth. Most of Ed's family, including Woody Harrelson, are
similarly loony, and they don't help the realism. Truly, only Jenna
Elfman (TV's "Dharma and Greg") gives a standout performance as Ed's
girlfriend Sheri, and the character itself as well as society's reaction
to it is one of the most realistic parts of the movie.
Then again, EDTV is a fantasy product, designed to suspend reality and
surround itself with "what-ifs." In this respect it's a thought-
provoking product, and very much the equal of THE TRUMAN SHOW. 

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
Release Date: March 12, 1999
Starring: Michelle Pfeiffer, Treat Williams, Whoopi Goldberg, Jonathan
Jackson, Ryan Merriman, John Kapelos
Directed by: Ulu Grosbard
Distributed by: Columbia Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (language, thematic elements) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/deepend.htm
All movies begin with a script, and all scripts begin as idle thoughts
in the minds of writers. Most scripts, that is, because there are those
which aren't written directly from the screen and instead adapted from
novels, plays, short stories, articles, and compendia of all kind. The
latest is THE DEEP END OF THE OCEAN, an adaptation of Jacquelyn
Mitchard's novel by TRUE CRIME writer Stephen Schiff. While this Ulu
Grosbard film features some powerfully thematic content regarding the
strength of family ties, however, audiences and industry experts will
file this one away as evidence of the inferior nature of adapted movies. 
DEEP END tells the story of the Beth (Michelle Pfeiffer) and Pat (Treat
Williams) Cappadora. The Cappadoras are loving folks who show their
affection for each other by appending "-y" to one another's names, and
we like them instantly. Turns out they're raising three children in
Madison, Wisconsin, during the late 1980's -- three, that is, until
their youngest goes missing in a crowded Chicago hotel lobby at Beth's
high school reunion. Nearly a decade later, the Cappadoras have pieced
their life back together and are living well in a suburb of Chicago when
Beth spots a kid on their block whom she supposes to be their lost boy.
Under a different name, now, it's with the help of Detective Supervisor
Candy Bliss (Whoopi Goldberg) that they establish his identity and go
through the process of reintroducing him to the family. 
Unfortunately all of this comes off as a very lightweight drama for many
of the same reasons that caused the demise of last year's STEPMOM.
Adapted from a novel, the screenplay is by nature very brief, and, like
STEPMOM it cuts from scene to scene without building any true depth. The
characters are real enough, and acted well by the principals, but most
importantly they are simply cardboard cutouts which can be easily
dropped into any scene. Also, like STEPMOM, what should be a significant
and weighty event in a family's life is left largely unresolved or
treated with little respect. The return of the lost child (Ryan
Merriman) is not the focus of the movie; instead, the film's center of
interest is the shallow relationship between Beth and Pat. 
On the positive side, the movie has a very good nature to it, and if not
for the significant tragedy involved it could almost be called a
feel-good movie. This uplifiting nature is something that was missing
from both STEPMOM as well as Pfeiffer's last live-action role in the
tragic drama A THOUSAND ACRES. Here, the theme of the strength of family
is decidedly the director's favorite, and we feel its winning qualities
in the end. Although all loose ends are not tied in the movie's running
time, they are implicitly resolved, and for this the audience is
grateful. The performances of all involved are vital to this success,
and for this Pfeiffer, Williams, Goldberg, Merriman, and Jonathan
Jackson (in the role of the Cappadoras' elder son) are to be commended.
On the whole, however, there's too many small mistakes or an overbearing
theme that's not present to call this movie a wholly fulfilling watch. 

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
Release Date: December 11, 1998
Starring: Ian Bannen, David Kelly, Fionnula Flanagan, Susan Lynch, James
Nesbitt, James Ryland, Eileen Dromey, Jimmy Keogh
Directed by: Kirk Jones
Distributed by: Fox Searchlight Pictures / 20th Century Fox Films Corp.
MPAA Rating: PG (nudity, language, thematic elements)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/waking.htm
Earlier this year, the movie HOLY MAN opened to a meager box office
receipt and to indifference from audiences and critics. A real charmer
of a movie, it's possible that the subject matter was too hip or trendy
to attract any real audience. Now, at the end of 1998, comes WAKING NED
DEVINE, a comedy which inspires the same vein of easygoing laughter.
There's no substantial difference between the two other than a more
refined atmosphere -- they strike all the same chords -- but still, NED
DEVINE is a movie worth seeing. 
The plot is interesting and robust: the latest lottery winner is Ned
Devine (Jimmy Keogh), of Tullymore, Ireland. Ned's prize is over six
million pounds, but the shock of winning killed the poor old man, and
the check remains unclaimed. Enter Jackie O'Shea (Ian Bannen) and
Michael O'Sullivan (David Kelly), the only two residents who are aware
the winner is in their village. The two men eventually find the ticket,
and decide that if Michael can convince the lotto authorities that he's
actually Ned, the entire town can reap the benefits; their only
adversary is an ancient old woman (Eileen Dromey) who sees more profit
in reporting the fraud. 
Ian Bannen and David Kelly truly shine as Jackie and Michael. Jackie,
stocky and large, is the brains behind the operation; Michael, scrawny
and short, is the method man. The two contrast each other delightfully,
and at the same time remain sympathetic to the audience. Every viewer is
sure to like both of them. 
There are other minor subplots included as well, such as an unlikely
romance between a local girl and the town pig farmer. This appears quite
inconsequential until the end, and even with a startling revelation it's
a tad bit unnecessary. Overall, WAKING NED DEVINE has a predictable
outcome, and plot twists are never really taken seriously. The ending, a
very hilarious and very ironic twist of fate, somehow fits with the
twisted sense of humor the movie exhibits throughout. The Kirk Jones
script is indeed off-the-cuff. 
In a way, WAKING NED DEVINE is exactly like the class of people it
presents: warm, friendly, outgoing, and jovial. It's the perfect kind of
comedy, a real gem of a tale that sets up a trivial plot outline by
which to introduce a sympathetic cast of characters and a string of
jokes. There's nothing remotely serious or grounded for more than a
moment or two, because the spirit of NED DEVINE is a lighthearted one.
Indeed, it's one of the year's best feel-good movies -- 91 minutes of
unrestrained joy that no one should miss. 

Title
Review for Big Hit, The (1998)
Release Date: April 24, 1998
Starring: Mark Wahlberg, Lou Diamond Phillips, Christina Applegate,
Avery Brooks, Bokeem Woodbine, Lela Rochon, China Chow, Antonio Sabato
Jr.
Directed by: Kirk Wong
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violence, pervasive language, some sexuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/bighit.htm
John Woo, who is credited with plenty of action films in his twenty-five
years in the motion picture industry, has a certain style of filmmaking
that no matter how intense the direction is, it cannot be escaped.
Similar to The Replacement Killers, another John Woo-produced/somebody
else-directed action film (surprisingly about another hit man with a
conscience), The Big Hit has an intensity and an off-the-cuff feel that
reeks of John Woo. While this in itself is no problem, Director Kirk
Wong feels the need to fight this Woo-ness, and instead of succumbing to
the style of that particular filmmaker he tries to stretch his product
into something else. Needless to say, that something else isn't as good. 
The closest comparison to that something else is 1997's Grosse Pointe
Blank (yet another hit man with a conscience), but that outstandingly
comical film had a far more grown-up feel to it. Similarly, John Woo's
most enjoyable films (Broken Arrow and Face/Off) retained a certain
amount of maturity no matter what the tempo was. However, The Big Hit
extends itself far beyond any barriers and is content to give the viewer
some shoot-'em-up silliness. One of the running jokes in the movie is
that the main character has an overdue rental of King Kong Lives, and
even as buildings are exploding around him he risks life and limb to
save the tape. 
The main character is Melvin Smiley (Mark Wahlberg), whose role is as
unlikely as his name. A hit man who can't stand the idea of anyone not
liking him, he falls prey to his girlfriend's and his fianceé's requests
for money. And of course, as a very good hit man, he's got lots of money
to give. So even though he makes thousands, he's close to broke, and to
remedy his situation he goes on a rogue assignment with fellow hit men
Cisco (Lou Diamond Phillips) and Crunch (Bokeem Woobine). Unfortunately,
the kidnappee (China Chow) for this particular job is the goddaughter of
Paris (Avery Brooks), Melvin's boss. Infuriated at the transgression,
Paris calls in Cisco to question him of his knowledge of the job, and in
looking for the easy way out, Cisco pins it on Melvin. 
None of the actors are particularly outstanding, save the possibilities
of the bossy Phillips (Courage Under Fire) and the sensual Chow. Avery
Brooks, whose role on TV's Deep Space Nine usually gives him quite a lot
of gravity, is pawned off as a tightly wound lunatic who kills at will.
The hangdog likes of Mark Wahlberg (Boogie Nights) can't sustain their
novelty, and soon his acting is just as bad as the pacing. The movie's
only high points are the take-no-prisoners action sequence at the
beginning, and then the extended explosiveness of the finale. Other than
that, the dry humor and the general wasted feel of the movie doesn't
lend itself to anything great. Worth a look, but perhaps not for all
types.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE BIG HIT": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Release Date: July 1, 1998
Starring: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Peter Stormare, Keith
David, Steve Buscemi, William Fichtner
Directed by: Michael Bay
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sci-fi disaster action, sensuality, brief language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/armageddon.htm
This year's second asteroid-threatens-earth movie turned out about how
last year's second volcano-threatens-city movie did. Similar to VOLCANO,
which was more action-oriented, more intense, and generally more on the
mark than the earlier-in-the-year DANTE'S PEAK, ARMAGEDDON takes a
decidedly different course of action than DEEP IMPACT. Produced by Jerry
Bruckheimer and directed by Michael Bay, two of the most noted action
movie crew heads, this one's got a better focus on the same material. In
short, there's more to like about ARMAGEDDON. 
There's quite a bit of star power involved in this one, and they're
mostly A-listers or competent supports, whereas DEEP IMPACT's cast was a
lot of unknowns. Although the movie begins with its biggest star - the
asteroid - we're soon introduced to our heroes. Dan Truman (Billy Bob
Thornton) gathers his team at NASA after a meteor shower destroys the
Space Shuttle Atlantis and a few choice spots of the Big Apple
(including the Chrysler Building). They realize there's a bigger chunk
of rock out there, and its imminent impact with the Blue Planet will
result in the death of every last organism - even bacteria. They can't
hit the thing from the outside; that'd just blow dust off the surface.
So they need to find the world's best deep-core driller, Harry Stamper
(Bruce Willis), and send him and his team up to the asteroid. Once
there, they need to drill down to 800 feet, plant a bomb, and get the
heck off before the explosion splits the Texas-sized thing in half. 
The picture is largely formula, but Jerry Bruckheimer and Michael Bay
have been working at the action movie business long enough to know
exactly what formula works. Also, they're working in a genre where
formula is almost accepted in a good picture, and by this advice they
create their characters to be a cast of the usual suspects. There are no
truly two-dimensional characters, and it's unfortunate that Jonathan
Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams, who wrote the script, chose to write most of
the players in as jerks. Harry Stamper, A.J. Frost (Stamper's soon-to-be
son-in-law, played by Ben Affleck), Colonel Sharp (commander of the
mission to save the Earth, played by William Fichtner) and Rockhound (a
sex-obsessed crazy played by Steve Buscemi) are all testosterone-loaded
for one reason or another; Grace Stamper (Liv Tyler), Harry's daughter,
comes of as one who likes to play the victim; in fact, only "Chick"
Chapple (Will Patton), Harry's second-in-command, is likeable for his
character. 
The movie's last half-hour is worth as much as the rest of the movie,
and Bay and Bruckheimer seem to have lost some of the excellent pacing
they displayed in THE ROCK from two years ago. ARMAGEDDON runs 144
minutes in length but only gets really exciting near the end; everything
leading up to that is character development, Stamper and his crew
getting trained to be astronauts, or "teaser" footage of the asteroid
nearing Earth. Although it never pretends to be anything but, the movie
is a summer movie, which means it's terribly shallow in all respects and
over-saturated with special effects. There's nothing wrong with this
once you're in the mood, because ARMAGEDDON is a fun movie to watch.
Certainly one of the better summer flicks.
FINAL AWARD FOR "ARMAGEDDON": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Dead Man on Campus (1998)
Release Date: August 21, 1998
Starring: Tom Everett Scott, Mark-Paul Gosselaar, Poppy Montgomery,
Lochlyn Munro, Randy Pearlstein, Alyson Hannigan, Mari Morrow
Directed by: Alan Cohn
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (drug use, language, crude sexual humor)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/deadcampus.htm 
MTV, for quite some time, has been a component of entertainment media
that has almost subconsciously defined an entire generation of children.
Anyone too young to be considered a Gen-Xer and/or born post-1979 has
most likely, in some way, been influenced by those three letters. As of
late, though, MTV has come to symbolize the lack of direction its
namesake generation is famous for. Originally formed simply for the
purpose of playing music videos, standard programming now is a curious
mixture of pop-culture-isms and lackluster talk shows. Similar to the
pseudo-network, MTV movies are almost never complete or viable examples
of cinema. Their latest is no exception. 
On the positive side, DEAD MAN ON CAMPUS is the best feature to come out
of that certain studio yet, and with a bit of work, MTV might get its
act together. Note carefully that "best yet" isn't high praise when
considering the past features that MTV has sponsored: JOE'S APARTMENT
and BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO AMERICA. Similar to DEAD MAN ON CAMPUS,
these films are a strictly limited-audience fare. Unlike this summer's
other offbeat comedy, THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, however, DEAD MAN
does not have a strong fan base to work with. Its audience will be made
up of those who do not have the intelligence to appreciate smarter
comedy, and even those will surely see limited appeal. 
The star of the show here is Tom Everett Scott, who plays Josh. Josh is
a likeable guy, attending Daleman College on a scholarship to their
six-year medical program. His intentions are honest until he meets up
with his roommate, Cooper (Mark-Paul Gosselaar). Cooper is a rich-kid
slacker who'll have nothing to do with going to class and everything to
do with getting high and getting laid. Through Cooper's antics, Josh
becomes distracted from his studies and eventually falls off his
"track." Then Cooper's dad shows up, and informs him that if Coop
doesn't get some higher grades, he'll have to come work for his old man
in the toilet-cleaning business. So Cooper and Josh happen upon an old
statute in the Daleman College handbook which says that if your roommate
commits suicide, you get straight-A's for your grief. Thus they set out
to find an appropriately depressed student to move into their room and
off himself before the end of the term. 
Tom Everett Scott, of AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN PARIS, does the best job
here, but that could be because he's got the most big screen experience
of the three principals. He's done fine work in most pictures he's been
in - even if the movies themselves weren't that great - and will most
likely mature to something even better. Poppy Montgomery also is
appropriately sexy here, but she plays Josh's terminally normal
girlfriend Rachel; one often wonders how someone so normal got into a
movie with weirdos Scott and Gosselaar. The humor that resounds from
their university escapades, as well, is decidedly sexual in nature and
not very smart. There's not much outright laughter and so what was an
interesting preview turned out to be a botched feature. Think twice
before seeing this one.
FINAL AWARD FOR "DEAD MAN ON CAMPUS": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
Release Date: January 29, 1999
Starring: Freddie Prinze Jr., Rachael Leigh Cook, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe,
Matthew Lillard, Usher Raymond, Anna Paquin, Elden Ratliff
Directed by: Robert Iscove
Distributed by: Miramax Films
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sexual content, crude humor, brief strong language,
teen drinking)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/shesallthat.htm
For the first time since June of 1998's CAN'T HARDLY WAIT, a large
collection of Gen-X talent masses together to produce something other
than a slasher-horror flick. The change is a welcome one, if perhaps a
bit awkward for Hollywood, for their talent is half a generation ahead
of their target group. Now, formulas which have worked for the last five
years must be revised for application to a new generation of youngsters
born after 1980. SHE'S ALL THAT, the first bigscreen feature from
veteran TV director Rob Iscove, tentatively tests the waters of teenage
fanship before risking all on a muddled strategy. 
The strategy is to borrow from other sweet-hearted romances -- most
explicitly PRETTY WOMAN -- and mold them into the teenager/high school
setting. This works initially, until the movie falls into a repetitive
cycle. The end, which barely breaks from this cycle, is unsatisfying. 
The repetitive feeling comes after the novelty of our characters has
worn off. Zack Siler (Freddy Prinze Jr.) -- Harrison High soccer star,
honor roll student, and heartthrob to every girl in his class -- comes
back from Spring Break to find that his girlfriend Taylor (Jodi Lyn
O'Keefe) has just dumped him for Brock Hudson (Matthew Lillard), star of
MTV's "The Real World." The break-up is a wooden stake to the heart for
Zack, since Taylor is the most popular girl in school, but on the
rebound he bets his friends that he could make any other girl just as
popular. The guinea pig is Laney Boggs (Rachel Leigh Cook), recessive
art student extraordinaire, and Zack has six weeks to turn her into the
prom queen. 
The R. Lee Flemming Jr. script seems worthless because the character
types are so overused. Although Flemming goes to all lengths to paint
Zack as a likeable guy -- which he accomplishes to some degree -- both
Taylor and Laney become predictable. Neither of the three leads do
anything substantial with their roles, and all are there simply for
visual appeal. The supporting roles, as well as their interactions with
the main cast, manage to add some humor which helps to break the
monotony. 
For the most part, the movie has a surreal or unrealistic feeling to it.
Teenagers are likely to eat it up, though, and that's what counts. SHE'S
ALL THAT works on its level, just not anywhere else. 

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
Release Date: February 19, 1999
Starring: Jennifer Aniston, Ron Livingston, Gary Cole, Stephen Root,
David Herman, Ajay Naidu, John C. McGinley, Paul Willson
Directed by: Mike Judge
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Films Corp.
MPAA Rating: R (language, brief sexuality)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/office.htm 
Confucius once said, "Governing a nation is like cooking a small fish --
don't overdo it." His maxim might be easily applied to writing a comedy
script, for quantity over quality is one of the worst mistakes an
amateur scribe can make. Granted, Mike Judge, writer-director of the
workplace satire OFFICE SPACE isn't exactly an amateur (his most
infamous work, the MTV series "Beavis and Butt-head" was pure gold for
its network). But unfailingly, Judge manages to make some rather
inexcusable mistakes in OFFICE SPACE by spreading an iffy plot over too
much ground. 
The iffiness in Judge's plot -- a group of coworkers plan the downfall
of their despicable boss -- is not in its appeal. In fact, based on the
popularity of Scott Adams' cartoon "Dilbert," which will soon have its
own television series, a satirical view of the American workplace is a
hot item in Hollywood. Unfortunately the concept lends itself to
skit-length sequences which would be more at home on the set of
"Saturday Night Live" rather than a full-length feature. The most
convincing evidence of this are the trailers for OFFICE SPACE, which
feature almost all of the movie's top content; this leaves the actual
picture appearing very deflated. 
Other evidence of OFFICE SPACE's failure to work are its lack of good
jokes. The comedy is marginally funny at best, but not enough to get a
packed house of theater-goers to laugh out loud. The material in the
movie is on-key for an older demographic than Judge is used to
targeting, and this could partially explain his work here. However, the
movie is loaded with too many misfires -- including the token plot -- to
allow for any excuse. 
The plot centers around three or four cubicled engineers, headed up by
Peter Gibbons (Ron Livingston), at a company named Initech. After the
movie elaborately establishes the miserable working conditions at
Initech, the movie introduces us to two consultants (John C. McGinley
and Paul Willson) which are in charge of "downsizing" the company's
payroll. When Peter and his gang learns of this, as well as the reason
behind it -- so their smooth talking boss Bill Lumbergh (Gary Cole)'s
stock will go up -- they set about creating a plan to see his downfall. 
The circumstances that follow were obviously intended to be hilarious
but they come out as anything but. A sympathetic cast and a muddled
Jennifer Aniston-as-love-interest subplot are all that keep this one
together, but it's definitely missable in lieu of something more
intelligent. 

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Release Date: March 31, 1999
Starring: Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne, Carrie-Anne Moss, Joe
Pantoliano, Hugo Weaving, Marcus Chong
Directed by: Andy Wachowski, Larry Wachowski
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: R (sci-fi violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/matrix.htm
Perhaps the most dramatic changes in the motion picture industry in this
decade have to do with special effects. There is no question that
action-adventure and science-fiction/action movies are now judged by the
character of their light and noise. Whereas classic adventure pics of
the last twenty years, such as RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, were made in
grand traditional fashion; contemporary films like JURASSIC PARK are
multimillion-dollar creations of computer technology. The latest in this
visually awesome series of movies, the Wachowski brothers' THE MATRIX,
is a testament to the skilled use of special effects and its ability to
enhance a movie's story. 
Unlike many sci-fi movies which promote themselves as effects-heavy
blockbusters but fail to deliver on that promise, THE MATRIX is a
carefully constructed special effects event. It runs 135 minutes in
length and employs a countless number of computerized tricks which range
from gimmick to grandiose, and the quality of the effects remains
constant throughout the film's length. Contrary to popular trend, THE
MATRIX commits itself to being a spectacle of light and sound. 
In this regard, the movie is something like a card sharp. With its
flashy mass stripped away, THE MATRIX would be quite shallow and
untalented. The script is characteristically weak, and the dialogue
suffers in lieu of a far more innovative visual approach. But, like the
card sharp, THE MATRIX wows its audience to such a high degree that
actual content is irrelevent. The viewers don't care about what THE
MATRIX has to say as long as the next special effects sequence is right
around the corner. 
And right around the corner they usually are, for the script tells a
fast-paced, albeit frequently revisited story. As the movie explains,
the world as we know it is nothing but an elaborate computer program
constructed by an artificial intelligence for the purpose of placating
mankind. Billions of human beings lie in this dormant state while the
intelligence -- the Matrix -- "farms" our life energy. Only a select
group of individuals knows of the "real" world, and a particularly
ingenious squad of these rebels is led by ultra-cool Morpheus (Laurence
Fishburne). Morpheus and his crew recruit a computer expert named Neo
(Keanu Reeves), believing he is a prophesied individual who will help
them overthrow the Matrix and return peace to Earth. 
The cast plays out this story in stylish fashion. The set design is very
dynamic, running the gambit between cramped and dreary to bright and
airy. The costumes, as well as the actors who wear them, add to the
roles. For instance, the manifested antagonists in the movie, a group of
"agents" created by the Matrix in its computer program, all dress in
matching Secret Servicewear; the rebel fighters, on the other hand,
dress in rich hues of leather. The casting cannot be criticized, for the
typically stoic Reeves isn't required to say much and Laurence Fishburne
gets plenty of time to be so damn cool. Supports in Carrie-Anne Moss,
Joe Pantoliano, and Hugo Weaving are all effectual. 
One of the best comparisons to THW MATRIX is last year's science fiction
masterpiece DARK CITY, particularly if one ponders how this same premise
would've worked from a different approach. The Alex Proyas film was far
more dark and introspective, requiring a bit of thought before themes
became clear; here, the Wachowski brothers have managed to construct a
thrill-ride motion picture with little abandon and much noise. The
better picture between the two depends on the viewer, but the key to the
success of THE MATRIX is that the noise did not get in the way of the
fun. 

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
Release Date: October 2, 1998
The Voices of: Woody Allen, Sharon Stone, Gene Hackman, Sylvester
Stallone, Christopher Walken, Danny Glover, Dan Aykroyd, Anne Bancroft,
Jennifer Lopez
Directed by: Eric Darnell, Lawrence Guterman
Distributed by: DreamWorks Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (mild language, menacing action) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/antz.htm
Over the past two years, DreamWorks SKG has shown a remarkable ability
to insert themselves into mainstream film production. They've had a hand
in some of the more successful projects of recent memory, including DEEP
IMPACT and SAVING PRIVATE RYAN. However, a lot of their films - PRIVATE
RYAN as possibly the only exception - have found themselves lacking in
drive and inspiration. DreamWorks has yet to come up with defining
characteristics as a film studio, and it shows in their latest feature,
ANTZ. Both impressive and plain at the same time, ANTZ was an inventive
movie that was made without gusto. 
The impressiveness comes from the computer-generated images involved.
The movie runs ninety minutes in length, and all but forty seconds of
this is entirely dependent on computer imaging. The CGIs are remarkably
well-crafted, and though they only fall apart in select situations (the
brief involvement of a human being), they are a benchmark standard. It
will be interesting to see how later-this-year's A BUG'S LIFE compares
in scope and execution to the flawlessness of the imaging in ANTZ.
Certain aspects of insect life are also flawlessly integrated into the
movie as well, and it almost looks real (such as the entire scene on the
picnic blanket). The insects are given human characteristics and
personalities, but not to the extreme like some of the primitive Disney
animations. Everything in ANTZ is well-designed in the technical
respect. 
The cast behind the eye-candy is impressive as well: Woody Allen does he
voice of the lead ant, and is backed by love-interest Sharon Stone, best
friend Sylvester Stallone, nemeses Gene Hackman and Christopher Walken,
unlikely acquaintance Danny Glover, and colony queen Anne Bancroft. Most
of these A-listers lend suitable voice support, and in some instances,
it's more enjoyable to hear them talk without watching them. Stallone,
for example, gives voice to a comic rendition of himself, and the
performance is lively whereas watching Stallone himself would most
likely be a dreary affair. Allen is the best overall, however, and his
neurosis becomes part of his character, the ant named Z. Z questions his
totalitarian society to the point of depression, and Allen reflects this
well. 
Eventually, Z meets up with colony princess Bala (Stone), and the two
hit it off until colony guards break the encounter up. Z convinces his
friend Weaver (Stallone) to switch places with him - Z is a worker and
Weaver is a soldier - so he can have access to the royal chamber. The
secret is blown, then, and in a hasty exit, Z grabs Bala and leaves the
anthill. The two make a fantastic journey but return to find that the
evil General Mandible (Hackman) has usurped the colony and is preparing
to kill all of the workers off. It's in the plot that the movie is
bogged down, for it follows a formula of animation so closely that it's
easy to predict what's ahead. Granted, a family movie will not contain a
complex plot, but there are relatively few twists to make watching it
completely worthwhile; the adult humor involved is not enough to pick
things up. For the computer imaging and the cast of voices, however,
it's still worthwhile, and you may find this one to be more than meets
the eye.

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Release Date: August 21, 1998
Starring: Wesley Snipes, Stephen Dorff, Kris Kristofferson, N'Bushe
Wright, Donal Logue, Udo Kier
Directed by: Stephen Norrington
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: R (strong, pervasive vampire violence and gore; language;
brief sexuality)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/blade.htm 
There have been several disappointing and unfulfilling movies both this
year and last that have received the "comic book" label - a heavy blow
from the critical community. The film is then perceived as low-class,
unintelligent, and thoughtless entertainment. There is a dedicated
audience who will see those movies anyway - the ones that actually do
read comic books - but overall the movie founders on rough waters.
BLADE, too, is worthy of such a title. But instead of being among the
bottom-feeders, this movie epitomizes the comic book action subgenre. It
is surely a testament to its source, as well as a welcome achievement
for genre fans. 
The movie opens with a young man being led to an underground nightclub
by his newfound date. Intent on getting some action, he doesn't realize
anything's wrong until the techno/hip-hop music climbs to a fever pace
and blood begins to rain down from the ceiling. He's scrambling for his
life, surrounded by vampires, until he runs into the thick black boots
of Blade (Wesley Snipes). Impossibly clean and immaculately tailored in
black leather, Blade is our hero. Nicknamed the Daywalker by the
bloodsucking breed, he is a hybrid vampire-human who kills as many
vampires as he can to avenge his mother's death to the nasties. Aided by
an aging partner named Whistler (Kris Kristofferson) and a hemotologist
(N'Bushe Wright), he must stop a young vampire named Frost (Stephen
Dorff) who plans a complete revolution in the ranks. 
The opening scenes are almost entirely action and have little to do with
vampire legend or lore. Although vampires are a popular fantasy element,
BLADE ignores this initally and thus resembles something of a more
serious BATMAN. At times, one wonders if this might've been the road
that the Dark Knight features would've taken if they hadn't succumbed to
the goofy direction of Joel Schumacher. As it progresses, though, the
movie turns increasingly to its fantasy roots - there are certain rules
to putting a vampire in his grave, and even when you follow those you
still get a lot of gore. Moments of excessive gore or non-sequitous sex
appeal are mostly unwanted but do not detract from the overall value.
But by the final scene, the movie has left any Earthen setting and
instead prefers a MASTERS OF THE UNIVERSE-esque swordfight to decide
all. 
The characters are written in an acceptably melodramatic fashion. Like
New Line's other comic book adaptation from last year, SPAWN, this one
is more dark than it is light. Unlike SPAWN, however, BLADE manages to
become more realistic through characters that are more easily accepted
as well as better defined. Snipes gives us an expectedly stoic Blade,
and though not outstanding, he acts consistently for two hours. Dorff's
bad guy Frost is mostly uninspired until the closing half-hour, when
Dorff allows wit to take over. Then he becomes a more lifelike character
rather than a pale, cigarette-smoking upstart. Despite minor setbacks
such as these, it's no wonder that everything in BLADE manages to fall
into place. Topped off with absurdedly Oscar-quality sound and visual
effects, BLADE is a well-spent trip to the theater.
FINAL AWARD FOR "BLADE": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
Release Date: February 26, 1999
Starring: Nicolas Cage, Joaquin Phoenix, James Gandolfini, Peter
Stormare, Christopher Bauer, Catherine Keener, Amy Morton
Directed by: Joel Schumacher
Distributed by: Columbia Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: R (strong perverse sexuality and violence, strong language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/8mm.htm 
Graphically intense movies can be thrillers and they can be exposés, but
8MM is neither and therein lies its problem. There's too much fiction
for 8MM to deliver any sort of social message about the underground
world of pornography; and there's no sense of intense storytelling for
8MM to be considered a successful thriller. Instead, the latest film
from BATMAN AND ROBIN director Joel Schumacher is a run-of-the-mill
detective story with darkly ambitious overtones. 
The movie is dark to the point of repulsion, and in this respect it is
most successful. Advance word from critics and the MPAA's reasons for
certification trumpeted tales of a very raw and very edgy movie;
instead, Schumacher plays up the movie with smoke and mirrors. Given the
horrific nature of the tale, it's a testament to Schumacher's brief
moments of genius that he actually shows very little substance. Much is
assumed in 8MM. 
What isn't assumed are the story's basic facts, which never really
change throughout the course of the movie -- destroying any hope for
suspenseful thrillerism. Nicolas Cage stars as private investigator Tom
Welles, who is called upon the recently widowed Mrs. Christian (Myra
Carter) to investigate the contents of her dead husband's private safe.
Of particular concern is an ominous reel of eight millimeter film which
contains a pornographic movie that ends with a brutal murder. Mrs.
Christian asks Tom to find out if the film is real, and more
importantly, if the girl is still alive. 
All of this is laid out in the film's opening scenes, and so the
audience is not left to ask any questions. Within moments, Tom has
several solid leads, one of which takes him to Los Angeles where he
meets up with streetwise porn dealer Max California (Joaquin Phoenix).
Max provides the movie's dark comedy, and to great effect. The Andrew
Kevin Walker script handles supporting characters like Max awkwardly,
thus resulting in the movie's muddled nature. It does not do well to
reject the character of Max, one of the audience's only sympathetic ties
to the plot, and it makes much ado about the identity of the masked man,
which has no bearing on the plot's outcome. 
The rest of the movie is standard fare. Nicolas Cage sleepwalks through
his role and provides little entertainment benefit other than the
guaranteed box office minimum for Columbia Pictures. And, despite
seventeen films and twenty-five years in the film industry, it's still
hard to call Joel Schumacher's work anything but goofy. For most, this
will not be an essential film to see. 

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Release Date: March 20, 1998
Starring: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards,
Theresa Richards, Daphne Rubin-Vega, Bill Murray, Robert Wagner
Directed by: John McNaughton
Distributed by: Columbia Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: R (strong sexuality, nudity, language, some violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/wildthings.htm
Okay, so it was mostly gratuitous. How else can you explain a scene
where a guy convinces two girls to make out on the premise that it's a
"victory celebration"? No, the champagne didn't have anything to do with
it. It was gratuitous. And like most other movies starring "the
beautiful people" these days, it was not only gratuitous, but it
involves a lot of immoral acts, scandalous trickery, and blatant
disregard for any socially redeeming values. How else to describe a
movie that's shallow on character, centered around the heist of eight
million dollars, and filled with catfights, pot smoking, perjury, and
shameless greed? If you haven't already guessed, there's nothing deep
about WILD THINGS, but it's the sort of thriller that's good for a
once-over. 
If you've seen PALMETTO, then you know just about what to expect from
this one. Put man and woman together and throw in sex and money. Yes,
there's more of a plot than that, but it's nothing more than an excuse
to use the theme. Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon), a popular guidance
counselor at Blue Bay High is accused of rape by popular teen socialite
Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards). It doesn't help Sam that Kelly's mom,
Sandra (Theresa Russell), is a rich widow who's out to bury the guidance
counselor. It doesn't help him, either, when pot addict Suzie Toller
(Neve Campbell) comes forward to confirm the story. Luckily for Sam,
he's got a genius of a sleazeball lawyer (Bill Murray) to pull out all
the stops in court and get Sam off the hook with a cool eight mil.
Unfortunately, the route to Sam's non-guiltyness unearths a lot of other
unlikely truths. 
This movie belongs to Bill Murray and Kevin Bacon (who plays the
detective assigned to Kelly's rape claims). Murray's straight-faced
humor is one of the few bright spots among the otherwise stoic cast, and
Bacon's cop is a good number. Unfortunately for Kevin, his role fades
into stereotype when he pushes too far. We like to see him ask the tough
questions, but when he keeps asking them and doesn't relent, he becomes
every made-for-TV-drama policeman with a gut feeling. The rest of the
cast is wholly unlikeable for at least one moral excess. Dillon, whom
the audience believes is good for the most part, loses a lot of that as
the movie drags on. And while it does run fairly well through a
108-minute span, there are some lulls. Bring some popcorn. 
The script is what's pure gold about WILD THINGS. It takes a twistier
route to the conclusion than TWILIGHT, which had previously taken the
award for most turnabouts in one script. Your jaw will drop open at
some, and expect others (it's easy to tell when a character is about to
bite the dust, or, as the case may be, swim with the fishes). All in
all, WILD THINGS is a fun thriller, more energetic than other recent box
office efforts. It's also the kind of movie you forget all about twenty
minutes after you're out of the theater, so come with an open mind and
don't expect much to get the most out of this one.
FINAL AWARD FOR "WILD THINGS": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
Release Date: November 13, 1998
Starring: Anthony Hopkins, Brad Pitt, Claire Forlani, Jake Weber, Marcia
Gay Harden, Jeffrey Tambor
Directed by: Martin Brest
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (an accident scene, some sexuality, brief strong
language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/meetjoe.htm
There's a way of bringing romance to the screen without tipping your
hand. Successfully, a romantic picture will have finesse rather than
power, and style rather than substance. It will also have a chemistry
between lead roles that is thick and palpable -- nobody wants to watch a
pair of deadbeats fall in love. The script will be skillfully drawn out,
with devotion to both realism and fantasy, and it will have at least one
important thematic element to deliver. This definition is just as well
the description of Martin Brest's latest film, MEET JOE BLACK, an
inspiring drama about life and death and the love that falls within. 
Director Brest made the original BEVERLY HILLS COP, but hasn't directed
a feature since 1992's SCENT OF A WOMAN.  He makes a fine return here in
masterfully helming a picture that runs nearly three hours in length -
never an easy task. The script he's given to work with isn't fantastic
in terms of extensibility, for it does not spread itself out over the
three hours. There are moments when it proceeds at an interminable pace,
making sixty-second conversations into five- or ten-minute affairs.
Brest takes advantage of the script's shortcomings, however, by styling
the movie around them -- and thus MEET JOE BLACK ends up having a
thoughtful air about it. The audience definitely ponders the same
questions that the characters do. 
The cast does their best to highlight the plot, and the names involved
are certainly worthy of note. Anthony Hopkins has the main character but
in an interesting shift of dynamic, he's relegated to a supporting role
as Brad Pitt takes center stage. Pitt plays Death, in the body of Joe
Black, a young man killed in a car crash at the movie's open. And so
Death visits successful communications exec Bill Parrish (Hopkins) to
let him know that his time is up -- but before they travel to the next
world, Death wants Parrish to show him around Earth a bit. And so
Death's vacation becomes a life experience as he learns what the human
way is like; the crux of the trip, however, is the love that begins to
grow between Death and Parrish's daughter Susan (Claire Forlani). So
when Bill's time is up, it becomes a pivotal point in time for all three
characters. 
The acting corps does a fine job all around. Hopkins is the highlight,
delivering many spectacular lines in fine form (although he does wax a
bit poetic too early on). He lends a sense of robust energy to his
character that sharply contrasts the appropriate lack of emotion in
Pitt's Death. But the grounding factor in the movie is Claire Forlani,
who gives an excellent turn as the daughter of one character and the
love interest of another. She lends a passive sensuality to the movie
that strengthens the romance as well as the life story of Bill Parrish,
and the movie is certainly greater because of her. The other supports
are in fine form as well, from Jake Weber's bad guy to Jeffrey Tambor's
comic relief. All in all this becomes a very inspiring and thoughtful
movie to watch, and it's questionable only for its three-hour length.
Compared to other films of such length, like the recent BELOVED, MEET
JOE BLACK is definitely worth the price of the ticket.

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
Release Date: September 11, 1998
Starring: Matt Damon, Edward Norton, Gretchen Mol, Martin Landau, John
Malkovich, John Turturro
Directed by: John Dahl
Distributed by: Miramax Films
MPAA Rating: R (pervasive strong language, some sexuality, brief drug
use)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/rounders.htm 
There's something about "making it" - raking in hundreds upon thousands
of dollars all at once - that will drive people to play incredible odds.
Average people will visit casinos, buy lottery tickets and scratch
games, enter drawings, and bet on sports teams all to make "easy" money.
That's precisely the bet that Director John Dahl (THE LAST SEDUCTION) is
counting on to pay off in his new poker drama, ROUNDERS. And, for the
most part, it does. Minus a few temporary flaws, ROUNDERS is an
enjoyable and occasionally witty look at card-playing, life, and man's
obsession with money. 
Our star and hero - if he can be called that - is Mike McDermott (Matt
Damon). Mike's a good kid who's going to law school on a tuition that's
paid by his fantastic ability to win money at poker. He tells us early
on that he's a 'rounder': someone who doesn't always go for the big
money but grinds it out, one small bet at a time. Seemingly against his
own advice, however, he loses all his money in one shot to a ruthless
Russian gambler and hustler named Tony KGB (John Malkovich). Mike gives
up poker, but it's not long before the devil's advocate walks in. In
this case, it's Mike's friend Worm (Edward Norton), who's just out of
jail and fifteen large in the red. 
Mike decides to take up poker again to help Worm earn back his debt, but
Worm's a pathological card sharp who can't hold on to money long enough.
Both of the characters here are well-written and well-acted from the
start, which makes their story all the more believable. Damon's brought
charm and impressiveness to every feature he's been in since last year's
THE RAINMAKER, and although he doesn't top his Academy Award-nominated
performance in GOOD WILL HUNTING, he's still fun to watch here. He's
clearly a good guy, and the audience is cheering for him all the way.
Norton, as Worm, adds a lot of nuance to the character that encourages
hate and like at the same time. His wit is over the top, and
convincingly so. 
There's no mistaking one fact, however: ROUNDERS is a poker movie, and
Dahl decides to keep it almost exclusively so. Money is the real
motivator, but poker is used as a concrete front for it. Five cards and
chin-high stacks of colored chips are the only reason anyone does
anything in this movie. The script attempts to have Damon do some
voice-overs that explain some of the various poker games, but the action
is so vivid onscreen that anyone without prior understanding of the game
won't gain any knowledge. Some of the supporting roles were also written
in with an unfitting lack of gusto - such as Mike's girlfriend Jo
(Gretchen Mol); she's got no depth and we have no idea why Mike keeps
coming back to her. Martin Landau's law professor also provides some of
the movie's slower moments, but his screen time is minimal. For the
majority of its running time, ROUNDERS is an exciting and worthwhile
feature to watch, and against the competition in a paltry post-summer
season, it comes up all aces.
FINAL AWARD FOR "ROUNDERS": 3.0 stars - a good movie

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Release Date: October 23, 1998
Starring: Tobey Maguire, Jeff Daniels, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen,
William H. Macy, J.T. Walsh, Don Knotts
Directed by: Gary Ross
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (some thematic elements emphasizing sexuality,
language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/pleasant.htm
If there's one thing in common about all of Hollywood's major studios,
it's that their productions are moving toward mainstream more and more.
Although Twentieth Century Fox and New Line Cinema have spawned
subsidiaries which specialize in independant or controversial motion
pictures (Fox Searchlight and Fine Line respectively), it's obvious
there's no significant movement underway to promote inventive ideas at
the theater. So when a movie like Gary Ross' PLEASANTVILLE comes along,
wrapped in a blanket of innovative ideas and served up on a platter of
fine production, it's a welcome change of pace for all who frequent the
cineplexes. 
Although the atmosphere and buzz about the movie are cheery and
lighthearted, PLEASANTVILLE should not be mistaken for a no-thought
movie. Quite the opposite is true, in fact, as Director Ross skillfully
brings a narrative with intense and intelligent undertones to the
screen. The story, both about the joys of living life to the fullest as
well as the social ills of segregation, captures the essence of
statement-making in the cinema. Not in recent memory has a movie carried
such weight of theme into widescale distribution, and even if mass
audiences fail to see the ingenuity of Ross' work, it is still a
testament that his picture was considered worthy enough. Kudos to both
he and his production staff for putting together this fine picture. 
It stars Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon as two nineties teenagers
who, through quite a bit of luck, find themselves zapped into a fifties
sitcom named "Pleasantville." Maguire, as the reserved Bud Parker, is
perfect for the pseudo-world; but the rebellious Mary Sue (Witherspoon)
is not at all made for the father-knows-best times. It's not long before
she sets the town of Pleasantville on end, and begins to teach the
townspeople - in a quite unlikely way - what life is *really* like. Soon
hues of color creep into the black and white world, and while some
embrace the change in the passion of realism, others fear the
strangeness. At one end is a soda shop owner-turned-painter named Mr.
Johnson (Jeff Daniels) and at the other end is a close-minded mayor
(J.T. Walsh) and his chamber of commerce; but the two sides are simply
fronts for a clash of ideas that soon involves the entire town. 
Fine performances are turned in all around. Maguire and Witherspoon are
effective as the leads, but the true complements go out to Jeff Daniels
and J.T. Walsh (in his latest and final posthumous performance). Daniels
brings an atmosphere of awe, inspiration, and hope to his character,
whereas Walsh simply drips of sinister closemindedness - almost to the
point where you can sense Gene Hackman's envy. For Daniels, it's his
most commendable performance of the last three years - or more - and for
Walsh, it's a complementary exclamation point on a fine career. Also of
lesser note is the supporting role by Joan Allen, and in viewing the
entire cast works well together from start to finish. There's not much
to dislike about PLEASANTVILLE, and its dynamic nature makes it the
perfect movie for those who want serious as well as those who don't.

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Release Date: March 5, 1999
Starring: Ryan Phillippe, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Reese Witherspoon,
Selma Blair, Joshua Jackson, Sean Patrick Thomas, Tara Reid
Directed by: Roger Kumble
Distributed by: Columbia Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: R (strong sexual dialogue, sexual situations involving
teens, language, drug use) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/cruel.htm
Like most teen dramas or comedies, CRUEL INTENTIONS follows an annoying
pattern of oversimplification. Reality is suspended indefinitely and
imperitively, and all sorts of assumptions are necessary for the movie
to make sense. Although this movie fills its time with a plethora of
edgy sexual situations and dialogue so as to establish its context
firmly in the minds of its adolescent target audience, the latest from
director Roger Kumble is all smoke and mirrors. CRUEL INTENTIONS does
not deliver on any of its promises, and has little to offer other than
an occasionally witty script and some steamy content. 
The plot is a bet: step-siblings Kathryn (Sarah Michelle Gellar) and
Sebastian (Ryan Phillippe) are idle and rich (as in the Upper East Side
of Manhattan rich) and without parental supervision over the summer.
Upon news that their exclusive prep school is getting a new headmaster
and more importantly, a new headmaster's daughter, the foundation for
the bet is laid. Then we learn that the daughter in question, Annette
(Reese Witherspoon), is a firm believer in abstinence until true love.
So Kathryn bets Sebastian, a suave young womanizer, that he can't
devirginize Annette; if he succeeds, Sebastian has his way with Kathryn,
the only girl he can't seduce, and if he fails Kathryn gets Sebastian's
classic Jaguar sportster. 
There follows 95 minutes of sexcapades among an elite clique of
teenagers in New York City. The movie plays heavily to anticipation,
saturating the script with heavily lustful dialogue and providing
unlimited footage of foreplay. Kudos to a director that can keep a
premise such as this nudity-free, but the lack of skin means this film
was far less erotic than it could have been. Instead, the direction
comes off as inadaquate. 
The acting corps *is* adaquate, but that's not much of a complement
considering the limited nature of the roles involved. Sarah Michelle
Gellar, best known from TV's "Buffy the Vampire Slayer," does not play
the temptress to its fullest potential, and often has seemingly mixed
motivations -- ruining the possibilities of the character. Phillippe
does the job of chief romancer well enough, even managing to evoke some
sympathy in the movie's twist of an ending. But he's stoic throughout,
giving little reason to feel anything for him. Witherspoon evokes the
most emotion as the pretty-in-pink heroine, but the role is too overdone
for her to be noteworthy in it. No one has a chance here. 
About the only thing that does have a chance is the script, which is
unfailingly witty in a straight-faced sense. Although it's almost
pathetically dumb when it counts, trite insults fly across the screen
with humorous abandon. This allows the audience to achieve some foothold
in the lives of the characters. But by and large CRUEL INTENTIONS is an
ignorant movie, promising things that cannot be delivered and taking
large steps in all the wrong directions. 

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
Release Date: September 11, 1998
Starring: Ian Michael Smith, Joseph Mazzello, Ashley Judd, Oliver Platt,
David Strathairn, Dana Ivey, Jim Carrey
Directed by: Mark Steven Johnson
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (language, emotional thematic elements, an accident
scene)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/simon.htm 
In some regards, making a movie is like trying to stretch a rubber band
as far as you can without breaking it. Try too hard, and it snaps; but
too much reservation means someone else will come along and pull it
farther. In SIMON BIRCH, Director Mark Steven Johnson shows us just how
to master the technique: he takes advantage of caution and poise, but
also risks his movie with a few bold steps. In the end, he's not only
holding an unbroken band, but he makes the audience appreciate the
lengths he went to direct such a fine feature. 
There's no doubt about it: the film that Johnson has crafted is rich. He
chooses for his setting the quaint town of Gravestown, Maine - leaves
turn bright orange in the fall, the grass is a lush green, pure white
snow falls in the winter, and the sky goes on forever. The characters
continue that turn: our two leads are Simon Birch (Ian Michael Smith)
and Joe Wenteworth (Joseph Mazzello). Simon is the smallest baby ever
born within the records of the local hospital, and by age twelve he's
only two feet tall. Joe is the bastard son of Rebecca (Ashley Judd), and
by age twelve he's ready to know who is father is. Naturally, the two
outcasts become good friends and share many adventures together, from
disrupting Sunday school to doing community service to playing Little
League baseball. 
In a wonderfully executed performance by Ian Michael Smith, Simon Birch
is convinced that he's God's instrument, and there must be a reason he's
so small. Joe doesn't quite buy it, but he sticks by Simon; the two
tough it out through the worst of times and are each other's only true
friends. Early on, the two meet up with Ben Goodrich (Oliver Platt),
Rebecca's new boyfriend, and although the bond isn't immediate, Ben and
the two boys develop a liking for each other. Both Platt and Judd give
solid performances that lend their characters a deep likeability. The
audience cares about them as much as they do about Joe and Simon, a
testament to the acting jobs of both. Finally, Jim Carrey gives a cameo
as the adult Joe in the present day, and his few minutes here are
relatively more impressive than his entire performance in THE TRUMAN
SHOW. 
Mark Steven Johnson's sense of drama and writing is fantastic. The
script is loosely based on John Irving's novel, A PRAYER FOR OWEN MEANY,
but it's so far off the source material that Irving actually requested
the credits be changed from 'based on' to 'suggested by.' Along those
same lines, it's almost unfitting to compare the two; Johnson uses
tension, humor, atmosphere, and suspense to create an original drama of
Forrest Gumpian proportions. By no means has he developed a project of
similar popularity - GUMP made over 300 million dollars while BIRCH
ought to pass out of sight in a few weeks - but the winning idea remains
the same. SIMON BIRCH is a different look at a different life, and one
that will most likely be studied in film school classes in decades to
come. In the present, however, it's an enjoyable little picture that
everyone ought to take a look at.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Release Date: December 11, 1998
Starring: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham, Anthony
Zerbe
Directed by: Jonathan Frakes
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (sci-fi action violence, mild language, sensuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/st-insur.htm
STAR TREK is inarguably the most successful entertainment franchise of
all time. The latest motion picture in the formidable line follows in a
tradition that is now thirty-three years old, and it is the ninth
feature in a string of sequels that extends back to 1979. It might be
thought that STAR TREK: INSURRECTION has a lot to live up to. 
That's not the case. Although there are certain conventions and customs
to pay homage to, it has long been a hallmark of the STAR TREK series
that each movie is nine-tenths self-contained. Certain features have
been major turning points for the series -- for example, in STAR TREK:
GENERATIONS, audiences saw the destruction of the Enterprise-D -- but
INSURRECTION is more modest in its intentions. This is, simply put,
bread-and-butter STAR TREK -- a double-length television episode with
beefed-up special effects and a bit more polished script -- all for the
enjoyment of the fans. 
INSURRECTION begins in the Sierra-Nevadas -- er -- a peaceful planet
inhabited by an idyllic race of metahumans. These people live a life
delightfully free of technology and have a youthful vigor about them;
but like all good things, it's not destined to last. As it turns out,
their planet holds certain "magical" properties which have attracted the
interest of the highest levels of Starfleet and its alien allies. When
Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the crew of the Enterprise-E learns
of this, however, it's obvious that the Starfleet's intentions are a
clear violation of the Prime Directive (the Directive is Starfleet's
rule prohibiting interference with the natural course of a
civilization's progression). Hence, Picard and his top officers resign
from their commands and lead a mission of insurrection on behalf of the
planet's people. 
Even for non-fans, the movie is still some very impressive cinema. On
the technical side, INSURRECTION is the most awesome TREK feature to
date, giving the audience a good load of special effects. Of course,
TREK special effects have never been on-the-cheap, but the significantly
larger budget for a motion picture allows the computer folks to get a
bit more creative. On the aesthetic side, however, a lot of that
grandeur is lost. The script is not pervasive or moving -- Picard only
gets one great speech -- and instead fills its time with sniveling bad
guys or straight-faced humor for the Enterprise crew (most of which is
genuine). 
The acting corps is back in fine form, although these actors have been
playing the same characters for over ten years now. Stewart is
considered by many to be the most accomplished actor to have ever donned
a Starfleet uniform, and he makes a fair impression here. Jonathan
Frakes (directing himself again in his second TREK feature), as
Commander Riker, and Brent Spiner, as Lt. Cmdr. Data, are wonderful as
Picard's top two officers. Director Frakes even makes a point of giving
more screen time to the rest of the ensemble cast, whereas the previous
two features -- FIRST CONTACT and GENERATIONS had focused almost
exclusively on one character. 
Overall, INSURRECTION is not the best STAR TREK movie to date. It lacks
much of the inspiration that the previous two features had, opting
instead to take a lighthearted tone. Those not expecting greatness will
find this to be a real crowd-pleaser; but there will be disappointed
fans out there. Probably best seen on a Saturday afternoon with nothing
else to do.

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
Release Date: April 9, 1999
Starring: Drew Barrymore, David Arquette, Michael Vartan, Molly Shannon,
John C. Reilly, Garry Marshall, Octavia Spencer
Directed by: Raja Gosnell
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Films Corp.
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sex-related material, some drug content)
If you've ever asked this question to someone of considerable age, you
undoubtedly know the answer is something like, "Not unless I could have
the knowledge I do now." And indeed, there's a certain naďveté about the
teenage years that befits the young but baffles the elderly. This
philosophical fountain of youth is pondered in the lyrics of songs and
countless movies, but most recently it's given a home in the flighty
Raja Gosnell romance NEVER BEEN KISSED. 
Gosnell (HOME ALONE 3)'s story is also a foray into the
fish-out-of-water theme, which posits a character in unfamiliar settings
and exploits the implied, resultant humor. In this case, Chicago
Sun-Times copy editor Josie Gellar (Drew Barrymore) is chosen to write
an undercover piece on today's high schoolers. Unfortunately, in her
first go at it, Josie was a real geek -- worse than Paul on "The Wonder
Years." To the rescue comes her brother Rob (David Arquette), who proves
the little-known truth that it only takes one person to think you're
cool to be "in." Soon Josie is in the running for prom queen and the
romantic interest of stud English teacher Sam Coulson (Michael Vartan). 
Throughout this story the movie attempts to juggle several different
ideas before dropping them all in favor of a predictable and
disappointing ending. The first of these themes is Josie's inadaquate
character for the job of undercover reporting -- she's a control freak
copy editor, accustomed to correcting people's grammar and not sliding
into hip-and-trendy MTV-era high school. This idea gets dropped in favor
of the second one, which is the inevitable humiliation that will occur
when Josie attends high school. The third subplot, which is unfinished
and consequently unsuccessful, is the romantic possibility between Josie
and her English teacher Coulson; the resolution to this plot does not
make sense. And finally, the fourth facet of the script is Rob's minor
role in Josie's life, as well as his "redemption" in high school. Truly,
his story holds interesting potential, but it too is compromised in a
quick-and-easy ending. 
The cast carries off these different larks in typical and unremarkable
fashion. Barrymore gives a lackluster performance here, which is
especially disappointing after she had received such high acclaim for
her last two romantic pictures (EVER AFTER and THE WEDDING SINGER). She
proves here that she's unable to carry a movie which has little support
and relies heavily on the lead. In terms of support, both Arquette
(SCREAM 2) and Vartan (THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS) have too little
screentime and not enough to say to make an effective appearance. There
is not a standout player among the lot. 
In terms of romantic offerings this year, NEVER BEEN KISSED falls below
par. There are those who will sympathize with the geekiness of
Barrymore's character, but in its own right, the movie paralells its
oddity. Nothing ever comes together, and other than a good laugh or two
at the expense of others, time and money are best spent elsewhere. 

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
Release Date: June 12, 1998
Starring: Harrison Ford, Anne Heche, David Schwimmer, Jacqueline
Obradors, Allison Janney, Danny Trejo
Directed by: Ivan Reitman
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (language, sensuality, brief violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/sixdays.htm
Harrison Ford's track record with romantic comedies has left him a bit
high and dry with fans who saw more in his original, action-adventure
roots (e.g. STAR WARS, RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK). This new conglomeration
of quasi-adventure and romantic comedy, SIX DAYS SEVEN NIGHTS, has Ford
living up to everyone's expectations, and unfortunately, those weren't
high. Although marketed early on as an Indiana Jones-type vehicle in
order to nail the males, and as a smart, snappy romance to nail the
women, it doesn't manage to do anything solid with either of the two
genres. Instead, it comes out a bit limp, which is disappointing
considering the promise and talent involved. 
Director Ivan Reitman (Fathers' Day) heads up three noteworthy stars in
this film about finding love where it's least expected. Frank Martin
(David Schwimmer, of TV's FRIENDS), an extra-sweet and extra-sensitive
guy, takes his girlfriend and soon-to-be-fianceé Robin Monroe (Anne
Heche, WAG THE DOG) on a trip for six days and seven nights at a remote
island paradise in the south seas. However, Robin, a magazine editor, is
called to Tahiti for a photo shoot, the only ride available is with
Quinn Harris (Harrison Ford, AIR FORCE ONE), a grumpy, isolated, aging
pilot of a dilapidated cargo plane. While on the way, the plane is
struck by lightning and forced to land on a largely unknown island, and
the two are forced to brave the tropical wilds and nearby pirates before
reconstructing their damaged plane in a part-MACGYVER, part-A-TEAM
sequence so they can hopefully return home.
Ford, who's by far the most solid of the three principals, is again left
high and dry. His performance in this movie shows that he's looking for
something more from the script, and from the way he moves on camera it's
painfully obvious that he's rather confined. His character - a
pissed-off, tequila-drinking loner - should be a great source of snappy
one-liners; unfortunately, he's more of a wimp than not. Heche, on the
other hand, is full of talk, perhaps almost too much. Her character is
too dynamic, swinging from the loudmouthing New Yorker to the subdued
romantic, and she never provides much chemistry for the relationship
with Ford. In fact, the only palpable feeling of drama comes near the
end, when Robin visits Quinn in the hospital. Schwimmer is adaquate,
although his screen time is nil and he can't make much of it. 
All told, the promise that SIX DAYS shows in the previews is not
delivered upon. The romance here should revolve around a dark comedic
tone, much as it did in the much-funnier GROSSE POINTE BLANK of last
year. It takes quite a bit for a comedy to actually work in situations
such as this, and it's obvious from the first moments of the film that
it's not going to work here. Ford, although he has expressed sentiments
not to, should stick to action-adventure films, and Heche, whose
performance in her last several films has been moderate at best, may
need to work more on big screen performances. This summer, there are
better movies to see.
FINAL AWARD FOR "SIX DAYS SEVEN NIGHTS": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for Life (1999)
Release Date: April 16, 1999
Starring: Eddie Murphy, Martin Lawrence, Obba Babatundé, Poppy
Montgomery, Clarence Williams III, Bokeem Woodbine, Nick Cassavetes,
Noah Emmerich
Directed by: Ted Demme
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (strong language, a shooting) 
As Hollywood has its say, life in prison can be a unique experience.
Humanity is laid bare for the simple civilization it is, and free
individuals from all social classes are equaled as inmates by the
promises of the next meal and free time in the yard. THE SHAWSHANK
REDEMPTION, perhaps one of the best prison movies ever made, gave a
serious outlook (albeit with humorous asides) on a wrongly convicted man
who adapts to the microcosmic society on the inside. In LIFE, however, a
strikingly similar statement is made by director Ted Demme (THE REF)
with almost entirely humorous content. Most exactly, this movie is
SHAWSHANK inverted. 
Eddie Murphy and Martin Lawrence star as Ray and Claude, our soon-to-be
convicts living life on the edge in 1920's Harlem. They're both hustlers
to a certain degree, making a quick dollar with fast hands and a fast
tongue. Their debts catch up to them, though, an in order to pay it off,
the two are sent with a truck to Mississippi to get a load of moonshine
for a nightclub back in Harlem. All's fine until the two stumble upon a
dead body, and in the segregational South a life sentence for the pair
is inevitable. So they end up at Mississippi State Penitentiary where
director Demme offers us an episodic view of their lives over the span
of nearly seventy years. Throughout that time, the two see a number of
changes -- some good, some bad -- but their humorous outlook and
never-say-die spirit keeps them going. 
As the leads, Murphy and Lawrence are outstanding, and in addition to
complementing each other they make strides individually. As Ray, Murphy
is probably more the audience's favorite than Lawrence as Claude, for
Murphy expands on the mirth and good nature that brought him brief
success in last year's HOLY MAN. 
Martin Lawrence, too, makes a better appearance than his last turn in
1997's NOTHING TO LOSE. Whereas his character there was bland and
somewhat typical, his role here is much more effectual: he plays a
sniveling, weaseling little dime-snatcher who has good intentions and an
annoying way of going about them. Together, with Murphy, he helps
generate the necessary atmosphere for a buddy comedy like this; in fact,
a bond of this type was missing from 1994's SHAWSHANK. Granted, the
Frank Darabont film was more an introspective look at one man's life
told through the eyes of another, but the jokes that fly between Murphy
and Lawrence could not be matched with only a single lead. 
And indeed, the humor comes frequently and to much success. The jokes
are fresh and delivered in good form, in addition to being
well-camouflaged and diverse. There's not a lot of running humor, and so
for the entire 100-minute running length there are hearty new laughs
around the corner. Much of it comes at the other inmates' expense, but
Murphy and Lawrence managed to play up a bit of it between themselves as
well, giving the comedy a dynamic feel. As with everything else, it's
well-done. 
The movie does have its low and slow points, but audiences are sure to
forgive them for the volume of laughs that LIFE offers. This is the
first true comedy since last fall's RUSH HOUR, and it is sure to be one
of the more memorable of 1999. 

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
Release Date: February 19, 1999
Starring: Nick Nolte, Sissy Spacek, James Coburn, Willem Dafoe, Holmes
Osborne, Jim True
Directed by: Paul Schrader
Distributed by: Lions Gate Films
MPAA Rating: R (violence, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/affliction.htm
It has been said that men achieve a piece of immortality through their
children. Fathers and sons in particular are a uniquely bound pair,
having a historical precedent of patriarchal family living. Some sons
aspire to be the great men their fathers were, while others live under
the shadow of their father's legacy. In the case of Wade Whitehouse
(Nick Nolte), his father's legacy was one of drunken abandon, a legacy
which now frightens him in a very personal manner in Paul Schrader's
character drama AFFLICTION.
Wade, a character essayed in fine form by the accomplished Nolte, is a
man who's being sucked into a black hole of desperate living. His wife
(Mary Beth Hurt) left him, and due to his reckless lifestyle, has taken
their daughter (Brigid Tierney) with only minimal visitation rights. His
life is plagued by a multitude of minor problems which snowball into a
giant, aggrivating circumstance: his car's transmission is bad, he has a
toothache, he can barely afford to pay his lawyer, and he's frightened
to death of becoming the man his father is. 
His father (James Coburn), as we learn, beat him and his brother Rolfe
(Willem Dafoe) as children; the old man lives on now in a drunken stupor
of harmlessness. Yet the tensions between Wade and his father are now
greater than ever, due to a lifetime of silent confrontation. Nolte and
Coburn really accentuate this relationship, and through excellent
casting the father-son bond is truly authentic. Nolte, in particular,
offsets some of the horrible risks this film takes by wearing the
character of Wade like a second skin. 
Some of the risks that AFFLICTION takes pay off, and some do not. For
instance, center-wrapping the movie around the character of Wade pays
off because of Nolte's excellent work. Deviating from the conventional
plot structure and allowing Wade to simply hit bottom does not work.
Using a particular deer hunting accident to emphasize Wade's crooked
mind does work; attempting to turn the accident into a mystery and then
dropping it does not work. Also, the script suffers when it discards the
characters of Rolfe and Margie (Wade's love interest, played by Sissy
Spacek), for they are the stabilizers of Wade's life and the audience's
only sympathetic characters. 
In all, AFFLICTION is a dark and scary character study of the common
man. It has a very realist point of view, evident because the chain of
events is very plausible. And the atmosphere bears no hint of lightness.
This is a different kind of movie for a different kind of crowd. 

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Release Date: November 20, 1998
Starring: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean,
Jake Busey, Barry Pepper,
Gabriel Byrne, Jason Lee
Directed by: Tony Scott
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (language, violence) 
Lean, mean, escapist thrillers are a tough product to come by. Most are
unnecessarily complicated, and others have no sense of expediency -- the
thrill-ride effect gets lost in the cumbersome plot. Perhaps the
ultimate escapist thriller was THE FUGITIVE, which featured none of the
flash-bang effects of today's market but rather a bread-and-butter,
textbook example of what a clever script and good direction is all
about. The latest Tony Scott movie, ENEMY OF THE STATE, doesn't make it
to that level. It's a true nineties product that runs like greased
lightning through a maze of cell phones and laptop computers, without
looking back. 
Although Director Scott has made missteps in the past, such as the lame
thriller THE FAN, he's generated a good deal of energy in pictures like
CRIMSON TIDE and TOP GUN. That vibrant spirit is present here, shown in
well-timed and carefully planned chase scenes that give the movie an
aura of sheer speed. ENEMY OF THE STATE also features an unprecedented
use of amazing cinematography -- Director of Photography Daniel Mindel
throws a staggering amount of different views, angles, lenses, and film
stocks at the audience that goes a long way toward involving the
audience in the movie. ENEMY is truly a visual experience, and that's
only one of the reasons it's such a fun watch.
The movie lights up with an aging senator visited by NSA deputy chief
Thomas Reynolds (Jon Voight). Reynolds wants a new communications act
passed to allow the government free reign in the use of surveilance
equipment, but the senator plans to bury the bill in committee. Reynolds
has the senator offed, but not before the murder is caught on a
naturalist's camera. By an extremist chain of events, the tape ends up
in labor lawyer Robert Dean (Will Smith)'s posession, and it's not long
before he's running from Reynolds' cronies. It's only with the help of
an ex-spook named Brill (Gene Hackman) that Dean is able to get to the
bottom of things. 
The acting is top notch, and the three principles - Smith, Hackman, and
Voight - are generally more mature and excellent all around. Smith puts
aside the wisecracking act and becomes a normal human being; Voight
tones down the amount of sneer he puts into his character for greater
ominpotence; and Hackman is simply over the top in the mysterioso role.
Smith's regular joe comes off particularly well, as he runs from
authorties for reasons that he knows not. The supports are also in fine
form, lending credibility to the main roles and advancing the plot in
key areas. This is, for the holiday crowd, the hot ticket; as well as
anyone looking for a serving of genuine action in a market that is
otherwise lacking.

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Release Date: December 4, 1998
Starring: Vince Vaughn, Julianne Moore, Viggo Mortensen, William H.
Macy, Philip Baker Hall, Anne Heche, Robert Forster
Directed by: Gus Van Sant
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violence, sexuality/nudity) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/psycho.htm
The original PSYCHO, released in 1960 and directed by Alfred Hitchcock,
is a classic suspense thriller which all other entries of the genre
derive their lineage from. Even for one who's never seen the movie --
such as myself -- the movie's popularity among film buffs is immediately
popular. Only the first syllable of Hitchcock's last name need be
invoked before testamonies come pouring from the lips of others. And,
being a classic, aging only makes it more popular; so, it's natural,
then, that someone might want to remake it? 
The arts are filled with remakes. For the theater, the most popular
remake vehicle is probably THE NUTCRACKER or LES MISÉRABLES; for the
cinema, LES MIS again comes to mind. While it's almost a given that a
remake will never approach the genius of the original, filmmakers take
their shot either for fame or for love of film. Hopefully it's the
latter -- someone who just wants to work with a great script -- but
likelihood says it's the later -- someone wants to be known as the
genius who bested a longstanding champion. It's difficult to say where
Gus Van Sant stands in helming his PSYCHO remake. 
The bottom line on Van Sant's product is that it falls flat on its face.
There's no question that the script was written as a truly cinematic
experience; do not mistake this to be a cleverly-penned movie. Instead,
Joseph Stefano gives the filmmaker a bare bones plot and expects that it
will be glorified by atmosphere -- camera angles, moody music, timing or
pacing, film speed or stock, acting, and any of the other qualitative
properties of a movie. This may have been the case in 1960 with Alfred
Hitchcock, Anthony Perkins, and Janet Leigh, but it is most certainly
*not* the case in 1998 with Gus Van Sant, Vince Vaughn, and Anne Heche. 
The movie begins as we're introduced to Marion Crane (Heche) and her
lover, Sam Loomis (Viggo Mortensen). Loomis is deep in debt but working
it off so that he can get out of his marriage and live happily with
Marion. Until that happens, however, Marion is set working at a real
estate company. Upon returning from a "late lunch" with Sam, Marion
finds her boss about to sell a house worth $400,000 to a wealthy
Arizonan; the rich shmuck pays entirely in cash and the greens are
handed over to Marion to take to the bank. She immediately thinks of the
possibilities of paying off her lover's debts, and takes to the road in
a newly purchased car -- her only mistake in stopping at the Bates motel
along the way. 
The motel is run by an eerie fellow named Norman Bates (Vaughn) and is
entirely vacant when Marion shows up. She disappears shortly thereafter,
and soon Marion's sister Lila (Julianne Moore), a p.i. (William Macy),
and Sam come looking for her. The movie ought to reach its peak here,
but there is absolutely no tension or suspense developed and PSYCHO
becomes rather boring. Van Sant looks for cheap thrills by using camera
tricks, but comes up empty-handed. This isn't the sort of work you'd
expect from an Oscar-nominated director, and certainly isn't
recommendable either. Best to see it at cheap prices; or rent the
original, because by any measuring stick, it's a better watch.

Title
Review for Knock Off (1998)
Release Date: September 4, 1998
Starring: Jean-Claude Van Damme, Rob Schneider, Lela Rochon, Michael
Wong, Paul Sorvino, Glen Chin
Directed by: Hark Tsui
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (continuous violence, brief language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/knockoff.htm
If you were to watch all of Jean-Claude Van Damme's movies and assign a
value to each of them based on campiness, plotting those points on a
graph would reveal a decidedly downward trend. One might think, though,
that Van Damme would eventually sign on a good movie, and that the graph
would finally bottom out before heading upward again. But, if one
thought that, one would be wrong. KNOCK OFF, the latest feature from the
infamous martial arts expert, is so void of any redeeming qualities that
it becomes questionable as to why it was even made. Even long-time fans
of Van Damme's work will be disappointed by this one. 
As always, with this sort of feature, the writer/director team attempts
to cover up for the lack of substance by creating a plot that's overly
complicated and rarely to the point. In KNOCK OFF, Van Damme plays
Marcus Ray, a fashion designer working for V-Six Jeans Company in Hong
Kong. He, along with his business partner Tommy Hendricks (Rob
Schneider), happen upon some local mafioso who are in the business of
making knock-off jeans and slipping them into the shipping manifest.
There's one catch, though: the knock-off jeans are loaded with the
ultra-high-tech nanobombs - tiny devices which contain the explosive
power of a half-stick of dynamite but look like buttons. Bring in the
Russians (apparently they developed the bombs) and the CIA (they're out
to stop the Russians) and you've got a full-scale action movie on your
hands. 
That's about the one thing that works for KNOCK OFF: the action.
Unfortunately, it's so overdone and trite by now - Van Damme is only
following in a trend that was initiated and mastered by Jackie Chan -
that it's not even worth it. This is a far cry from the explosive
mixture of martial arts and guns that was so popular in UNIVERSAL
SOLDIER. Van Damme never was very good on-screen, and now his longevity
is beginning to show it. Unlike Arnold Schwarzenegger, who's managed to
turn out an enjoyable feature once in a while, Van Damme has not matured
to any level of watchability in recent years. 
Rob Schneider is thrown in for comedy, but his ability to deliver the
sidelong, snappy one-liners is hampered by the poorly written script.
It's hard to believe that this piece of writing comes from the same man
(Steven De Souza) who wrote DIE HARD. De Souza makes unnecessary
melodrama out of Hong Kong's change from a British colony to a Chinese
protectorate, and this only emphasizes the lack of substance. Unlike
another recent failure, THE AVENGERS, excuses cannot be made for the
cast and crew involved here; Director Hark Tsui has not made an American
film prior to this and Van Damme's movies have never received critical
praise in this decade. Hopefully Hollywood dollars will now be spent on
making more realistic and enjoyable movies after the sure box office
failings of this picture, for word of mouth will spread fast and it will
not be good.
FINAL AWARD FOR "KNOCK OFF": 1.0 star - a poor movie.

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
Release Date: October 2, 1998
Starring: Robin Williams, Cuba Gooding Jr., Annabella Sciorra, Max von
Sydow, Jessica Brooks, Josh Paddock
Directed by: Vincent Ward
Distributed by: PolyGram Filmed Entertainment
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (thematic elements involving death, some disturbing
images, language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/whatdreams.htm
Almost all movies start on paper somewhere - perhaps something a
production exec scribbles on paper during lunch or an idea that a writer
beats around in his head awhile before scripting a rough draft. From
there, if it sounds good, the thing gets pitched to a studio that might
be interested; if so, the movie is greenlighted into a production phase.
Considering this process for Vincent Ward's latest drama, WHAT DREAMS
MAY COME, it's possible to think that everything sounded good until the
movie was actually laid on plastic and sent to movie theaters
nationwide. And in all fairness, it most likely was a good idea. But in
this case, it's just one good idea that wasn't suited for film. 
It's possible to see the shortcomings of DREAMS at the outset. Director
Ward wants to work with a very metaphysical and esoteric concept for two
hours, while simultaneously trying to mix solid drama and a sprinkling
of Robin William's characteristic wit. It doesn't work, for there's just
too much going on in his head for everything to come together onscreen.
At times, the movie reaches inspiring levels of thought-provoking
scripting, but these arrive at unexepected moments and it's likely that
the audience will miss many of them. As a whole, the script is not very
well done for such a good idea. It's a very muddled foray into an area
of screenwriting that takes a very committed and experienced writer to
perform well in. Writer Ronald Bass, basing it on the Richard Matheson
novel, certainly has experience (RAIN MAN), but he doesn't have
commitment, and the movie suffers because of it. 
The cast has the goods but does not deliver. Williams is fun to watch,
but he lacks the flair that he had in GOOD WILL HUNTING, and,
ultimately, DEAD POETS SOCIETY. Here, he plays the lead of Chris
Nielsen. Chris meets the lovely artist Annie (Annabella Sciorra) while
on vacation in Europe, and the two fall in love and are married soon
after. They have two kids, but not long after the movie's opening
credits are the children killed off in a car accident. The couple
suffers but survives until Chris is also killed in a car accident. He
goes to Heaven, which, for him, is composed of his wife's paintings.
It's there that he meets spiritual tour guide Al (Cuba Gooding Jr.), who
gets him to know the hereafter. Back on Earth, Annie can't take the
grief of losing her entire family and commits suicide; she goes to Hell.
When Chris learns of this, he takes Al and an ancient netherworld
tracker (Max von Sydow) on a journey to Hell to find Annie. 
The rest of the cast is rather drab, including Cuba Gooding Jr. Gooding
had showed promise after his Academy Award-winning performance in JERRY
MAGUIRE and a delightful turn in AS GOOD AS IT GETS. Here, his job seems
forced, and he doesn't fully become the character. The only one to lend
any substance is Annabella Sciorra, who provides a solid sense of
motivation for Williams' character. This rather mediocre cast doesn't
help the script any, and so the movie's truly redeeming facets are the
special effects and set design. WHAT DREAMS MAY COME makes very dynamic
use of extreme color and lack thereof; the movie has a very powerful
vision. It's watchable for the most part, but not extremely so. And
unfortunately, it's about a subject that won't fly well with everyone,
so you may have trouble convincing yourself that this one's worth the
bucket of popcorn.

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
Release Date: October 9, 1998
Starring: Eddie Murphy, Jeff Goldblum, Kelly Preston, Robert Loggia, Jon
Cryer, Eric McCormack
Directed by: Stephen Herek
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (some language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/holyman.htm
There's a certain category of romantic comedies that critics and
commentators like to call "feel-good" movies. (Some might say that
feel-good movies are the only romantic comedies which ever achieve any
measure of success; the rest are typically passed on by audiences and
deep-sixed by critics.) These spirited flicks have a moderate amount of
emotion involved - more than your average film but not as much as a
tearjerker; the cast of characters is usually a fun-filled bunch that's
very sympathetic to the audience; and the plot is a formulaic rag that
has us cheering for the characters by movie's end. And although it's
certainly nowhere near the caliber of last year's Academy Award
feel-gooders (e.g. AS GOOD AS IT GETS and GOOD WILL HUNTING), HOLY MAN
might rightly be termed the first feel-good movie of '98. 
The casting is not spectacular, and really, Jeff Goldblum is the only
one at least semi-suited to the job. He - like David Duchovny - does the
straight-faced humor with talent and in HOLY MAN he works the crowd
well. Unfortunately, he never manages to land a solid baseline for the
role and it comes off feeling unfulfilling. That's unfortunate, because
his role is central to the success of the entire movie and without
gravity, both Kelly Preston and Eddie Murphy have a tough time deciding
where to go. It's not entirely Goldblum's fault, because the Tom
Schulman (DEAD POETS SOCIETY) script isn't particularly well-written.
Preston and Goldblum also can't develop any romantic chemistry, and that
side of the movie doesn't really shine either. If not for Goldblum's
ability to adapt well and Murphy's mirthful countenance, the acting
corps would be in the red for this movie. 
With what they've got, however, they managed to pull off a darn cute
movie. Goldblum plays shopping network exec Ricky Hayman, a man who's
under constant pressure from the boss to boost sales. He's teamed up
with attractive co-worker Kate Newell (Preston), who, although initially
cold to Ricky's not-so-suave advances, eventually comes to like the
fellow. The two discover latter-day prophet "G," a grinning,
good-natured dude played with skill by Eddie Murphy. G does many things
well, including making people feel good about buying things off of a
shopping network. Ricky and Kate exploit this until Kate gets second
thoughts; she backs out and eventually leaves Ricky because he's too
power-minded. It's up to Ricky, then, to do the right thing and try to
get the girl back. (And, since it's a romantic comedy, the ending is
never really in doubt.) 
The humor content is not outrageously hilarious, as it was in the action
comedy RUSH HOUR. Most of the one-liners are average, and there's no
extended comedic setups to speak of. But Schulman and Director Stephen
Herek (MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS) manage to overcome the quality problem with
quantity. The jokes are at least semi-funny, and the whole lot promotes
a sort of tongue-in-cheek atmosphere that makes the movie more
watchable. None of the specific elements really work in HOLY MAN on an
individual basis, but as a whole they come together nicely and make this
movie worth the price of the ticket. The only people who'll have
problems with it are those that expect an outright laugh-fest and don't
watch the movie for its more humanitarian qualities. Indeed, watching
this movie should end up being a very enjoyable experience for all who
attend.

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
Release Date: March 27, 1998
Starring: Matthew McConaughey, Ethan Hawke, Skeet Ulrich, Vincent
D'Onofrio, Julianna Margulies, Dwight Yoakam, Chloe Webb
Directed by: Richard Linklater
Distributed by: Twentieth Century Fox Film Corporation
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (violence including bloody aftermath of a shooting,
language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/newtonboys.htm
The first three months of 1998 have been a textbook exercise in the
effect of star power on major American motion pictures: DESPERATE
MEASURES (Andy Garcia, Michael Keaton), SPHERE (Dustin Hoffman, Sharon
Stone, Samuel Jackson), and PRIMARY COLORS (John Travolta, Emma
Thompson, Billy Bob Thornton) are all good examples of otherwise weak
movies turned into average or better fare. There is no denying the fact
that audiences will see a movie simply for the principals in it. While
THE NEWTON BOYS follows this trend to a certain level, its four
headliners - some of today's best up-and-coming actors - do not account
for the entirety of its liveliness. 
Rather, the script is peppered with fun-loving, aw-shucks humor that
grows on the audience. The story is set in a day that no movie-goer
today is old enough to have lived in, and hence derives a sort of
romanticism that works towards its advantage. The story is also highly
unused. It's been a good while since a down-home, all-American bank
robbers story has been told. The most recent film of similar value is
the Laurence Fishburne starrer HOODLUM, but the racial, social, and
political overtones of that 1930s film seem drab in comparison. There is
little that this 1920s recreation lacks, and every bit of it plays to
the public's image of the Old West. 
The characters, too, are bright and colorful, although not all of them
are used to the film's fullest advantage. Matthew McConaughey and Ethan
Hawke are the top names here, starring as Willis and Jess Newton. They,
along with their brothers Doc and Joe (Vincent D'Onofrio and Skeet
Ulrich), are America's most successful bank robbers. Their heists are
meticulously planned and skillfully executed, resulting in their take of
several hundred thousand dollars. However, when technological advances
in the construction of safes and lockboxes make their conventional
methods impossible, they turn towards a more daring - and more lucrative
- mail train robbery. If completed, the resulting payoff of several
million dollars will set them up for life. 
Even by today's standards, the Newton boys' ambitions are quite high.
This, of course, drags the audience in, for who doesn't like to see a
perfectly planned robbery go off without a hitch? Unfortunately, the
scenes after the train robbery take too long to play out. The movie has
reached such a full head of steam that when the movie doesn't wind down
quickly the audience becomes bored and loses interest. Other than that,
THE NEWTON BOYS is a movie that's full of color and ambition, most of
which pays off. This is a worthwhile film, especially compared to other
movies now playing. 
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE NEWTON BOYS": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
Release Date: February 27, 1998
Starring: Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, Richard
O'Brien, Ian Richardson, William Hurt
Directed by: Alex Proyas
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: R (violent images, some sexuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/darkcity.htm
Originality is probably the most advantageous as well as the most
detrimental component of any new movie. It's been proposed that the
American cinema audiences are being "dumbed down" by the senseless
violence, almost unrestricted sexuality, and blatant disregard for high
culture of any kind. Naturally, then, ingesting an intriguing and
original plot is going to be a tough meal. However, if one can sit up in
the theater and throw themself whole-heartedly at the mercy of the
director and the cast, one is bound to hear a good story once and
awhile. DARK CITY, by far the most original and probably the best movie
I have seen this year, is that good story. 
The intellectual science fiction isn't anything new - it's the same
thinking man's movie as CONTACT and GATTACA. But Director Alex Proyas
isn't content to let DARK CITY fall to the doldrums of meaningless
sci-fi. There's one problem with that - he's got to keep the audience's
attention. His answer: suspense and niblets of tense action. Kudos to
both he and the scriptwriter for nimbly mixing watchable action
sequences in with one drawn-out, suspensefully-orchestrated plot. The
weirdness that is the atmosphere for that plot is sure to deter some - I
can't say I don't prefer Jodie Foster in CONTACT to Rufus Sewell
here - but as film critic James Berardinelli said of this movie, it
can't suffer from too much atmosphere. 
The plot that inhabits said atmosphere is a what-if scenario. As many
bright minds have previously philosophied, imagine your world exists on
the thumbnail of a giant. Imagine that you are nothing but an experiment
in the test tube of an omnipotent alchemist. In this case, John Murdoch
(Sewell) lives in a world that's being run by the Strangers - a strange
breed whose name is aptly chosen. Headed up by respectable performances
by Richard O'Brien and Ian Richardson, their goal is to study the human
race in the confines of a city they have created. Their motive is to
learn to harness the power of the human soul as a vehicle for
themselves, for their world is dying and they need a new existence. Most
humans fall prey to their all-powerful telepathy, but Murdoch is immune
and hence must be killed - even as he struggles to figure out the
Strangers' esoteric world. 
The plot is contained nicely and well-generated given the setting.
Several movies have suffered because their settings were too dark and
enclosed to offer much watchability. In DARK CITY, on the other hand,
by the time Sewell has stepped into the sunlight in the final scene, the
audience feels an undescribable awe at the power of sunlight. One of
DARK CITY's plot facets was the absence of day, which seems as
unreal to the audience as it does to the characters. The characters are
drawn up in clear opposition of each other - good and bad are
immediately decided by the audience - and my only complaint is that
some of the characters have little substance and no motivation. Other
than that, DARK CITY is sure to be one of the year's more memorable
titles, and is recommendable to most everyone.

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Release Date: February 12, 1999
Starring: Robin Wright Penn, Kevin Costner, Paul Newman, Robbie
Coltrane, Jesse James
Directed by: Luis Mandoki
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (a scene of sexuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/message.htm
In some respects it can count for a lot -- the classic example is Jim
Carrey, otherwise known as the Twenty Million Dollar Man -- and in other
respects it can count for very little. AT FIRST SIGHT, a recent romantic
release, dropped off the Top Ten charts only three weeks after debuting
despite trumpeting the names of Val Kilmer and Mira Sorvino. Eventually,
that may be the case for the latest drama from WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN
director Luis Mandoki, but it's clear initially that MESSAGE IN A BOTTLE
is drawing a tidy sum from its leading names. 
Those leading names are Kevin Costner, Robin Wright Penn, and Paul
Newman, and each has something to offer this romantic tale of love under
precarious circumstances. Costner has it all backwards, making something
out of nothing and nothing out of something, but by this point in his
career he's mastered the art and we've come to expect it from him. Robin
Wright Penn, of FORREST GUMP notoriety, even manages to make Costner's
frequent missteps look charming, and together the two create quite a
screen presence. Newman lends comic relief in fine form, giving a much
more memorable performance than his last outing in the crime drama
TWILIGHT. 
Here, Costner plays sea dog and widower Garret Blake, a sailboat expert
who lost his wife several years ago and now writes bottled romantic
epistles to her. Jogging along the beach one day while on vacation,
divorced newspaper researcher Theresa Osborne finds one of these
messages and takes it back to Chicago to check it out. Using
professional connections and doing some tidy sleuth work on her own, she
tracks the messages back to Garret and smoothly works her way into a
love affair with the man. The two share a common feeling of neglect, and
share their love by throwing marshmallows at each other before snuggling
up by a fire on the beach. All of this is very romantic, except for the
fact that Theresa's secret of how she found Garret threatens to tip the
balance. 
The movie plays out like THE HORSE WHISPERER Lite, with all of the grand
cinematography of Big Sky country replaced by cramped silhouettes of
sailboats on the Carolina coast at dusk. Gone is the silent brooding of
the Robert Redford film, and instead we get Robin Wright Penn and Kevin
Costner doing voice-overs that lack all emotion but will still manage
evince a tear in every woman's eye. The red-blooded American males in
the audience will appreciate the movie's lone fight scene, in which a
disgruntled Costner suplexes his opponent on a diner table before being
told by the assembled crowd, "It's not worth it, Garret." 
Truth be told, the movie does manage to play itself out fairly
efficiently, and its 145-minute running time hardly seems that long. The
drama is solid, providing metaphors for Garret's maturity with his
personal project of constructing a sailboat. When the sequences begin to
scrape the bottom, Paul Newman enters with a witty line and a twinkle in
his eye. There's not a specific flaw to be found, other than the movie's
refusal to break from tradition and its seamless devotion to the
predictable. The ending does not come as a surprise, and encapsulates
the whole affair with startling precision. On the whole, this isn't a
light and breezy romantic comedy but a moody drama which will have those
leaving the theater feeling disenfranchised. But it just might be worth
it, anyway. 

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
Release Date: January 15, 1999
Starring: Annette Bening, Robert Downey Jr., Aidan Quinn, Stephen Rea,
Paul Guilfoyle, Katie Sagona
Directed by: Neil Jordan
Distributed by: DreamWorks Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violence/terror, language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/indreams.htm
Psychological thrillers, like Neil (INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE) Jordan's
latest film, IN DREAMS, are a scary bunch of movies. They are to cinema
what Edgar Allan Poe was to American literature: a dark and haunting
introspective of what makes humanity tick. Thrillers which leave an icy
cold in your chest hours after you leave the theater are the best kind,
for they are the ones that hit the mark and realize their vision.
Others, like IN DREAMS, make a marginal push toward such a pinnacle, but
never really reach the peak. 
Instead, director Jordan goes for shock value. The imagery in IN DREAMS
haunting stuff, the kind that nightmares are based on. Unfortunately
they're so over the top that they become forced, and instead of being
completely immersed the audience is on the outside looking in. Jordan
*does* make good use of symbolism, and the recurring power of that
cannot be denied. His script, which he co-wrote with Bruce Robinson
(RETURN TO PARADISE), revolves around an apple orchard. Apples appear
frequently to denote chaos or instability, and to great effect. 
Annette Bening is the script's main character, Claire Cooper. Claire is
haunted by nightmares which are fragmented and inconclusive at best -- a
sort of homage to TWELVE MONKEYS. In her nightmares, a girl is lead
through a grove of apple trees by an older man, completely trusting.
It's only days later that she realizes her dreams were a supersomatic
link to serial killer Vivienne Thompson (Robert Downey Jr., in a
wonderfully psychotic role). The dreams become more powerful, the
connection more vivid, until finally Claire abandons her husband (Aidan
Quinn) to track down Vivienne. 
So why doesn't IN DREAMS work where TWELVE MONKEYS did? Perhaps the
imaging in TWELVE MONKEYS was more subtle, and perhaps there the plot
took longer to play out than it did here. IN DREAMS is highly
suspenseful at the movie's open, but two-thirds of the way through, most
of the information is already revealed. It disintegrates into a
rolling-ball movie, wherein all of the plot points that have been built
up are now simply being knocked down by a ball set in motion. There's no
more guesswork. Similarly, the movie calls for a lot of character
buildup, which the script never really provides -- characters are flat,
and scenes are cut too quickly and too often. 
Overall, IN DREAMS is a frightening watch, but one that most viewers are
likely to be put off by. It most likely will become prime Saturday night
rental material. 

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Release Date: June 19, 1998
Starring: David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau, William B.
Davis, Blythe Danner, John Neville, Mitch Pileggi, Armin Mueller-Stahl
Directed by: Rob Bowman
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Film Corp.
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (intense violence and gore) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/xfiles.htm
For a long time one of the top-ten rated shows on network television,
THE X-FILES has generated a cult following of enviable size. Its jump to
the big screen format, then, is only a natural progression of evolution;
similar, in some ways, to the movement of another staple of twentieth
century pop culture, STAR TREK. Although producers of both television
series are most concerned with box office dollars (requiring the movies
to be watchable by viewers who are not fans of the show), the
writer-director team behind THE X-FILES: FIGHT THE FUTURE have managed
to integrate some continuity with the TV show and at the same time make
an enjoyable movie independent of its base. This success will surely
garner it money that would otherwise be lost by bad word of mouth. 
The television show focuses on the activities of two federal agents. Fox
Mulder (David Duchovny), the lead, is obsessed with the paranormal and
devoted to a series of cases that can be classified as such. His
partner, Dana Scully (Gillian Anderson), is almost the opposite: a
rationalizing doctor of medicine assigned by the FBI to debunk Mulder's
claims. In the movie, Mulder and Scully investigate a bomb threat at a
Federal Building in Dallas, Texas, but when the bomb goes off a
committee is formed to assess blame. Mulder, suspecting the real intent
is to break his partnership up, gets drunk and runs into a shady
character named Dr. Allan Kurtzweil (Martin Landau). Kurtzweil tells him
that the bomb was planted as part of a cover-up; the Federal Emergency
Managment Agency offices in the building had evidence of a deadly virus
that the government was concealing. Kurtzweil also points the inebriated
Mulder toward the American Southwest to investigate further. 
It's in these opening scenes that the characters show both the greatest
moments and their biggest shortcomings. The dialogue is the most
strewn-out here - later on it takes second position to more intense
action - and it offers the actors to show their talents. David Duchovny
gets plenty of chance to show his talent as an actor, and even a line
which makes fun of his own trademarked stoic look. Gillian Anderson, who
mostly plays second fiddle to the leading man, is there to offer a bit
of sexual diversity in a cast almost entirely composed of males. Her
presence, though not outstanding in any particular manner, is rather
welcome. The cast of supporting characters, too, highlights the story's
focus on the paranormal and paranoia which is such a core component of
THE X-FILES' ideology. 
As the story continues, it takes our heroes Mulder and Scully to more
diverse regions, including the wastelands of Antarctica. There are quite
a few memorable special effects sequences, and this is the movie's
stronger point. Although the opening scenes give way to screen time
exposure, what's actually being said is of little value to the
uninformed viewer. Because the movie draws heavily on the
characterization developed through several seasons' worth of network
airing, there's not much to establish the characters in the movie.
Although being a fan of the series isn't necessary, having watched a few
episodes will be a great help, almost an extension of the characters in
the movie. Having an enlightened friend explain it is also preferrable.
Once the viewer is past the slow take-off, though, the tension meter
steadily climbs, and this is what makes THE X-FILES: FIGHT THE FUTURE a
more enjoyable suspense-adventure film.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE X-FILES": 3.0 stars - a good movie

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
Release Date: February 19, 1999
Starring: Jake Gyllenhaal, Laura Dern, Chris Owen, William Lee Scott,
Chad Lindberg, Chris Cooper, Natalie Canerday
Directed by: Joe Johnston
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (language, brief teen sensuality and alcohol use, some
thematic elements) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/october.htm
Since 1990, the dramatic picture has undergone a certain change of
style. Now, instead of emphasizing feel-good stories replete with
characters of noble virtues, the screenplays and direction point toward
human struggle and sorrow. This realist tendancy can be inspiring at
times, as 1993's SCHINDLER'S LIST shows. Most of today's mainstream
drama, however, creates an overabundance of emoting that can turn off
members of the audience. That's why pictures like OCTOBER SKY, which are
a throwback to the good ol' dramas of yesteryear, are such a welcome
relief in contemporary cinema. 
The movie is based on the true story of Homer Hickam (Jake Gyllenhaal),
a teenager in the 1950's company town of Coalwood, West Virginia. It's a
well-known fact that the only boys to make a name for themselves are the
ones that get out of the town on football scholarships; the rest grow up
to work in the coal mine. The mine, which is run by Homer's father
(Chris Cooper), is not the place for Homer, however. After watching the
Soviet satellite Sputnik shoot across the October sky in 1957, Homer
feels a connection with the outside world -- as he puts it, "Anyone in
the world could look up and see the same thing I did." Drafting two of
his best friends and the brainiac outcast, Homer begins to construct
rockets. With the help of their history teacher, Miss Riley (Laura
Dern), and several mine workers, the four are soon bound for great
things. 
October Sky is a skillfully crafted film, and most of that credit must
go to director Joe Johnston. Johnston -- whose career in the film
industry includes everything from directing well-known titles like
JUMANJI and THE ROCKETEER down to an uncredited role as a Death Star
trooper in STAR WARS -- certainly knows what he's doing here. He molds
characters which are true to life and also fun to watch into a plot that
is straightforward and robust. He does not push any barriers, but
instead adopts a conservative style of filmmaking which enhances the
film's charm. His finesse brings out elements which might otherwise be
lost -- such as the relationships between Homer and various mine
workers, or the silent struggle between Homer's mother and father. 
The cast is well chosen, although the true bright spots are the
supporting roles. Laura Dern (JURASSIC PARK) lends a strong performance
in the role of the history teacher, giving the boys the support and
guidance they need. Her role is instantly likeable. Chris Cooper (THE
HORSE WHISPERER), as Homer's father, is less likeable -- even downright
despicable at times -- but his turn here gives gravity to the movie.
He's definitely a driving force in Homer's life, and his more humane
moments give the piece a certain dynamic that is commendable. 
The script is generally cheerful, projecting the boys' endeavors in a
lighthearted manner. There are moments when it becomes predictable --
such as the train tracks scene -- and there are moments when it
sacrifices orginality for the need to come up with an emotional plot
twist. It highlights the essence of youth, however, and for its
exceptional job at this it can be forgiven other missteps. 
OCTOBER SKY should be a success with audiences. Although it doesn't have
the appeal of current teen flicks like VARSITY BLUES or SHE'S ALL THAT,
it certainly holds an undeniable quality that older crowds will lean
towards. It's a welcome change to the dramatic genre, and one that
everyone should see. 

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
Release Date: December 25, 1998
Starring: Elijah Wood, Piper Laurie, Josh Hartnett, Laura Harris, Robert
Patrick, Clea DuVall, Usher Raymond, Salma Hayek
Directed by: Robert Rodriguez
Distributed by: Miramax Films
MPAA Rating: R (strong violence, language, brief nudity) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/faculty.htm
Georges Polti once wrote a paper called "The Thirty-Six Dramatic
Situations," in which he asserted the fact that all drama could be
defined by no more than thirty-six different situations. This may be the
modern restatement of the Biblical prophecy from Ecclesiastes, "There's
nothing new under the sun." THE FACULTY, the latest movie by FROM DUSK
TILL DAWN director Robert Rodriguez, certainly proves this in typical
Hollywood fashion. There's not a measureable fraction of original
material in this unworthy outing. 
Drawing elements from both THE PUPPET MASTERS and INVASION OF THE BODY
SNATCHERS, screenwriter Kevin Williamson (of SCREAM 2 credit) gives us a
horror tale set in middle America (Ohio) one eventful fall. Making use
of a cast of unusually stock characters, Williamson designs an alien
invasion that will not be done INDEPENDENCE DAY-style but rather
"through the back door." Parasitic aliens take over the faculty of a
run-down high school and soon have infested most of the student body,
leaving it up to the ensemble of principal characters to win the day. 
The lack of gusto is the movie's major stumbling block. Even though the
genre has seen movies that have a lack for quality such as this, they've
been saved by an energetic approach. This casts more than a shadow of a
doubt on Williamson's ability, who enjoyed success with the Wes
Craven-directed SCREAM but couldn't pull anything solid in for this
outing or I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER. Although he designs THE
FACULTY with more of a sci-fi bent than his typical slasher picture, it
still comes down to the same results: throw the stock characters in a
steel cage match and see who comes out alive. 
On that level, the main roles are played by virtual unknowns. Only the
recognizeable Elijah Wood (DEEP IMPACT) is at the front; other than
that, the screen veterans are saved for the minor roles of the alien
teachers. Perhaps Williamson has it in mind to champion these
up-and-comers to the fame that their SCREAM and LAST SUMMER counterparts
achieved; but to do that, they'd all need to star in their own WB
television show about the horrors of puberty a la "Dawson's Creek."
Needless to say the acting is far from top notch, nor does necessity ask
that it should be. There is a moment or two of genuine horror, but
unfortunately Williamson and Rodriguez did not take the story far enough
in the sci-fi direction to make any use of it. In sum, THE FACULTY was
just one long shot that did not pay off. 

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
Release Date: April 3, 1998
Starring: William Hurt, Gary Oldman, Heather Graham, Matt LeBlanc, Mimi
Rogers, Lacey Chabert, Jack Johnson
Directed by: Stephen Hopkins
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (some intense sci-fi action) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/lostinspace.htm
Similar to 1997's STARSHIP TROOPERS, LOST IN SPACE is a story told to
and written for the lowest common denominator of movie going audiences.
Although TROOPERS was undoubtedly written for a more adult demographic
(although the intelligence level was just as undoubtedly no higher),
LOST IN SPACE starts off as and remains throughout a graphically-
enhanced comic book. The flat characters and cringe-enducing dialogue
are trademarks of a medium that tells stories in jerky segments and
plays to ignorance and suspension of belief. While this latest sci-fi
action flick may be a step up from that, it retains some of the more
undesirable aspects. 
A kickback from the baby boomer days, LOST IN SPACE has to hope for the
curiosity of adults and the willingness of adolescents to pay to see
mind-blowing visuals and sound. Much as THE FIFTH ELEMENT (surprisingly,
another Gary Oldman-is-the-antagonist film) did, this movie presents an
awesome array of colors, lights, and sounds in one continuous stream;
the producers expect the audience to sit back and say "wow." Just like
the THE FIFTH ELEMENT, there is probably an Academy Award nomination in
the future for LOST IN SPACE, but its on-screen tenacity will garner it
nothing more than a Best Sound Editing or Best Visual Special Effects
nomination. The cast and story are not nearly as good. 
Written by Akiva Goldsman, who has penned the last two BATMAN features
and also the upcoming SUPERMAN LIVES, the story is definitely the worst
part of LOST IN SPACE. It takes the Robinson family (headed up by
respectable performances from William Hurt as the father and Heather
Graham as the twentysomething daughter) off of Earth with the planned
destination of a planet that will hold Earthlings in the future. Because
Earth's life as a hospitable planet is limited, and humanity has only
discovered one other possible home in the galaxy, this is the final
shot. (Fitting, in mankind's current mega-consumptive mindset, that the
story tells us Earthlings have only twenty years left.) No thanks to a
stowaway (Gary Oldman), though, the Robinsons' ship is sent hurtling
towards the sun. In a last minute attempt to escape, they hit the
hyperdrive and careen into regions unknown. 
There are only two or three really likeable performances in the bunch.
William Hurt has power and gravity on-screen, but often it gets
channeled into horrible lines that detract from his character's value.
His attempted conversations at family values are particularly
belittling, both to the character and to the movie. Matt LeBlanc, who
plays the pilot assigned to the Robinsons' spaceship, is the best as the
arrogant fighter jock with a bag full of sarcastic lines. Heather Graham
is also good, although her young age lends a certain questionability to
her role; also, her cold shoulder to the constant come-ons of LeBlanc,
like LeBlanc's character himself, get old fast. The rest of the cast
play stereotype cardboard cut-outs. Director Stephen Hopkins, who
directs another misfired action thriller here (after BLOWN AWAY), can't
keep everything under control and some scenes are just plain ridiculous
(like Jack Johnson having a conversation with a robot about 'forgetting
logic'). Mostly full of groaners, but still, the movie manages to come
out mediocre.
FINAL AWARD FOR "LOST IN SPACE": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for Quest for Camelot (1998)
Release Date: May 15, 1998
The Voices of: Jessalyn Gilsig, Cary Elwes, Gary Oldman, Pierce Brosnan,
Jane Seymour, Eric Idle,
Don Rickles, Bronson Pinchot, Gabriel Byrne, Jaleel White, John Gielgud
Directed by: Frederik Du Chau
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: G 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/questcam.htm
Once upon a time, not too long ago, it used to be that one film company
held a vertiable monopoly on the animated feature film market. Disney,
and moreover their distributing company Buena Vista Pictures, has long
since lost the monopoly, but their success there hasn't quite been
overcome. QUEST FOR CAMELOT, Warner Brothers' entry, and 1997's
ANASTASIA, Twentieth Century Fox's product, still do not compare to
Disney's films. Although Fox's parlay was excusable because of their
lack of animation history, this WB attempt should've had the feel of a
finely-tuned machine. After all, it's the same company that turned out
timeless characters like Bugs Bunny, Daffy Duck, and Wile E. Coyote.
Unfortunately, it falls well short of benchmark. 
There's a lot of formula and a lot of "girl power" in this movie,
although the target audience - loveable little scamps in the coveted
ten-and-under bracket - won't be quick to realize either. Of course, the
little ones in pink will be more attached to the lead character of
Kayley (Jessalyn Gilsig) than will the little ones in blue, but there's
enough comedy and action to go around. As for formula, the typical crowd
is about: there's your generic, chivalrous good guys (in this case, King
Arthur, voiced by Pierce Brosnan) who are generally helpful but stand to
encounter a setback early on. This starts the plot in motion. Then you
have your over-the-top cartoon villain, who is the inspiration of said
setback (in this case the disgruntled knight Ruber, voiced by Gary
Oldman). Finally you have your unlikely hero(es), who will take the
place of aforementioned good guys in the face of adversity - in this
case, Kayley, the tomboyish daughter of a knight, and Garrett (Cary
Elwes), a blind hermit. 
The movie begins with some enjoyable scenes that get to the action right
away. Ruber sends a giant griffin (Bronson Pinchot) to Camelot to steal
Arthur's magical sword Excalibur, but the beast loses the weapon while
returning it back to his boss and it's lost in the Forbidden Forest.
Kayley learns of this when Ruber kidnaps her mother (Jane Seymour) as
ransom for his entry into Camelot, and the girl escapes, being chased by
Ruber's henchmen into the Forbidden Forest. It's there that she meets up
with Garrett, and while being persued by Ruber and company, they come
upon Devon and Cornwall, a two-headed dragon with an appetite for
comedy. The four- er ... threesome then locates the sword and makes
their way back to Camelot just as Ruber arrives, too. 
There is the music, which is included in homage to the extensive line of
Disney films which have employed the stuff since the inception of the
animated feature. Unfortunately, it lacks a lot of the drama and
flamboyance of typical Disney music; rather than looking like a stage
production, it appears to be what it really is - an entire township
singing in unison. It might almost be laughable, but most who watch this
movie will be caught up in the kiddish atmosphere. The characters here
are an improvement on the rather dry ones found in ANASTASIA, although
it'll be quite some time before they're up to the standards of Disney's
sketches. The star rating for this movie is all based on effort; this
surely won't compare when MULAN thunders into theaters later this year.
FINAL AWARD FOR "QUEST FOR CAMELOT": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
Release Date: March 6, 1998
Starring: Tommy Lee Jones, Wesley Snipes, Robert Downey Jr., Kate
Nelligan, Tom Wood, Joe Pantoliano, LaTanya Richardson
Directed by: Stuart Baird
Distributed by: Warner Bros.
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (some scenes of violence, brief language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/usmarshals.htm
A friend said something like this to me after seeing this movie: "If THE
FUGITIVE was the story from the fugitive's point of view, then U.S.
MARSHALS is the story from the cop's point of view." Makes sense,
doesn't it? And yet so many people, including myself, went into this
movie expecting U.S. MARSHALS to convey the same edge-of-your-seat
suspense as did its quasi-predecessor, the 1993 blockbuster THE
FUGITIVE. Although Tommy Lee Jones reprises his Academy Award-winning
role in respectable fashion, a lot of the elements which made THE
FUGITIVE such an enjoyable movie have not been brought back. With little
or no suspense, no engaging plot, no truly likeable characters, and most
of all, no Harrison Ford, what does U.S. MARSHALS have going for it? 
There are reasons that this movie is worth seeing. Tommy Lee Jones, as
U.S. Deputy Marshal Sam Gerard, and his crack team of criminal-chasers,
were engaging characters - albeit not ones that you hold close to your
heart. Gerard's team, in particular, was the lone source of lighthearted
dialogue. Their constant banter, which usually takes place behind or
around the stony-faced Gerard, was what helped the audience bear with
the cumbersome plot. Wesley Snipes, playing Mark Sheridan, the man that
Gerard has to chase down, in no way replaces Harrison Ford's character
of Dr. Kimble. Robert Downey Jr., who co-stars as an intelligence spook
named John Royce, is nothing but a plot facet: his character is
necessary for the new, complex plot to hold together but on the whole is
unnecessary for the theme. 
The plot which encompasses these characters tells as follows: Marshal
Gerard and team set the ball rolling by taking down a household of
redneck arms hustlers. A tough breed, they require some extra
restraining, and in the siege, Gerard hits one of the criminals over the
head with a shotgun. The redneck threatens to sue, and so Gerard's boss
(Kate Nelligan) has Gerard go to Washington, DC, to do a public
relations bit for the Marshal Service. Unfortunately, she's got him
flying to DC on a prison transport plane with several other marshals
and, among others, Mark Sheridan. Everything is fine until an attempt on
Sheridan's life is made by another prisoner and the plane goes down in
the ensuing chaos. Sheridan escapes, and Gerard calls his team in for
another fugitive situation. This time, though, John Royce, a domestic
intelligence agent, is assigned to the case because of the special
nature of criminal that Sheridan is. 
The plot has amazing possibilities, and it comes close to grasping some
of those, but it never really realizes its full potential. The way that
Director Stuart Baird tells the story is a decidedly sub-par affair, for
the tale comes out clumsy and unintriguing. During the 133-minute
running time, there are only a handful of scenes which have any real
watchability for action or suspense or both, others do nothing but
rehash ground that THE FUGITIVE has firmly trod over. This could have
been a much better movie, and although it's worth seeing, the decision
is primarily viewer merit.
FINAL AWARD FOR "U.S. MARSHALS": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
Release Date: April 10, 1998
Starring: Nicolas Cage, Meg Ryan, Andre Braugher, Dennis Franz, Colm
Feore
Directed by: Brad Silberling
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sexuality including language, some nudity)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/city.htm
It wasn't quite clear, as Director Brad Silberling opened his nearly
two-hour love story CITY OF ANGELS, what image he wanted to give the
elite corps of men and women that trod the Earth as God's messengers.
The image, although not strictly important on an internal basis,
unintentionally becomes important because of the American public's
fascination with angelic beings. As Scott Adams, the creator of
'Dilbert,' writes: "It's statistically proven that a ninety-pound woman
can lift a Chrysler minivan off of her trapped husband with enough
adrenalin"; and usually when she does, the tabloids and talk shows are
run amok with stories of angels coming to the rescue. And what about the
all-too-familiar story of someone retrieving their developed film from
Walgreens or K-mart to see superimposed images of the risen Jesus or the
Virgin Mary? There's no denying the attachment to angels, so Silberling
has to be very careful with what he does. Whatever he did, though, it
turned out all right. 
Silberling, whose last feature film was about another less-than-human
being (CASPER), sets up a solid romance between Nicolas Cage and Meg
Ryan. Cage, who had previously starred in two senseless but enjoyable
action films (CON AIR and FACE/OFF), gets to show a loveable innocence
that helps his character into the audiences' hearts. Ryan, last heard as
the voice of Anastasia in the movie of the same title, is present in the
same spunky manner. Her curly mop of frosted blond hair and willingness
to break into ear-to-ear smiles gives her a seat with the audience as
well. Even though the characters are hard to deny, they end up taking a
while to get together. This displeases the audience, especially after
one or two surprising plot turns, and it slows down a movie that was
otherwise moving at a comfortable speed. 
The movie has a great narrative hook, and through it we learn of Seth
(Cage). An angel, Seth can only be seen by the dying, delirious, and of
course, his fellow angels, of whom there are quite many. The rather
spooky group inhabits (no surprise) the city of angels, Los Angeles,
sitting on skyscrapers, the Hollywood sign, Dodger Stadium, and other
civic landmarks. They cannot taste, smell, or touch, but they know no
fear, no hunger, no pain, and they hear music in the sunrise (a
particularly poetic twist). Seth, unlike many other angels, longs to be
human, and his desire is urged onward when he falls in love with Maggie
(Ryan), a beautiful heart surgeon. With the consoling words of his best
friend Cassiel (Andre Braugher) and the help of a patient at her
hospital (Dennis Franz), Seth comes to the threshold of his decision
between remaining an angel forever, or being with Maggie as a human
forever. 
Along with that thought-provoking decision, CITY OF ANGELS also displays
some interesting themes, of which some are laughable and others are very
intense. Although there's nothing deep about the movie - it's bread and
butter romance between man and woman - the level of intelligence is
elevated by the plot intricacies that develop as a result of Seth's
angelic state. The movie frequently shows us that Seth can hear a
human's thoughts as he passes by them, and it's surprising just how real
the scripted thoughts are. Following Seth in and out of the city also
allows the spectacular cinematography: the angels are almost always
accompanied by grand, sweeping views of Los Angeles. It takes skilled
postproduction efforts to pull all of that down into a meaningful movie,
and it's been done here. Granted, it gets windy in parts, but there's
nothing too mushy or too corny about this romantic drama for anyone not
to like it.
FINAL AWARD FOR "CITY OF ANGELS": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
Release Date: March 12, 1999
Starring: Chow Yun-Fat, Mark Wahlberg, Ric Young, Jon Kit Lee, Elizabeth
Lindsey, Byron Mann
Directed by: James Foley
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: R (strong violence, language, sexuality)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/corruptor.htm 
THE CORRUPTOR can best be summarized as a movie about individuals who
are stuck in the gray areas of life. Many a film has been made about
this dubious ground which lacks morals and order, and survival is easily
half chance. But try as it might, THE CORRUPTOR, directed by James Foley
(GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS) cannot reach the level of intelligence necessary
to skillfully carry this theme. Instead, it's simply a plain old
detective thriller with neon lights and naked women put in for
"atmosphere." 
Chow Yun-Fat, making his sophomore domestic effort here after last
year's action thriller THE REPLACEMENT KILLERS, stars as NYPD Asian Gang
Unit officer Nick Chen. On the payroll of a local Chinatown mobster (Ric
Young) and faced with a surging wave of crime in his territory Nick is
also in the company of a new partner, Danny Wallace (Mark Wahlberg).
Although Danny reeks of inexperience, Nick takes him under his wing and
the two go on a mission of vengeance to clean up Chinatown -- despite
emotional baggage and an interesting plot twist. 
The script for this story is clever but not excessively so, the first
such piece written for the screen by Robert Pucci. It demands a lot of
energy from the director and the cast, hidden amongst awesome
pyrotechnics and furious gun battles, and unfortunately neither Foley
nor Wahlberg and Chow can deliver on that promise. Instead, the movie
comes off feeling like a fake, which pretends to have its supply of
adrenaline wound taut like a tennis net but never delivers on that
promise. Camera tricks and editing room finesse can only go so far to
hide these shortcomings. 
The rest of the script devotes itself to a detective story which is not
skillfully written. Although the plot may have been orderly and clear to
Pucci, on the screen it plays out in an unrefined fashion. Bits of
crucial information are bookended by half-finished subplots and become
lost among the flashiness of THE CORRUPTOR's visual side. This last bit,
the visuals, is perhaps the movie's most redeeming value, for there are
moments when the action is good and the plot is straightforward. Put
simply, THE CORRUPTOR falls into its own gray area: it does not succeed
and it does not fail, giving it the unfortunate disposition of being
easily forgotten. 

Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
Release Date: May 1, 1998
Starring: Liam Neeson, Geoffrey Rush, Uma Thurman, Claire Danes, Hans
Matheson, Reine Brynolfsson, Peter Vaughan, Mimi Newman
Directed by: Bille August
Distributed by: Columbia Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (violence, some sexual content) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/miserables.htm
At the very beginning of 1998's LES MISÉRABLES, the eighteenth remake of
the classic Victor Hugo novel, the convict Jean Valjean (Liam Neeson)
says to a kindly bishop (Peter Vaughan), "Thank you for the meal and a
bed to sleep in. In the morning I will be a new man." And indeed he is,
as this very ambitious, mostly pleasing, and surprisingly serious drama
tells the story of his life. Undoubtedly not as good as previous
versions, but a quality movie nonetheless, this remake is another gem
that will most likely be passed over in public opinion. 
Valjean is our hero, and he is played by Neeson in outstanding fashion.
The benevolence displayed is very much akin to Oskar Schindler (in the
1993 classic SCHINDLER'S LIST), a role which won him an Academy Award
nomination. Opposing him is the persistent Inspector Javert, done by
Geoffrey Rush in a quite contemptable but perfectly compatible manner.
The few scenes when Javert and Valjean come within inches of each other
are tense and exciting because of the two actors' mastery of the roles.
Also of credibility and quality is Uma Thurman as Fantine, whose
baseline role accentuates the kind-heartedness of Valjean. Her daughter
Cosette (Claire Danes), on the other hand, plays exactly the opposite
and becomes the one character to unintentionally illicits negativity
from our hero. The cast is very solid and plays testiment to Hugo's
novel. 
The movie follows Valjean from his first days as a parolee after
nineteen years of hard labor. Breaking parole, however, he escapes
policemen and turns up nine years later in the town of Vigo as the
mayor. His life, quite the opposite now, is perfect until the cunning
Inspector Javert is assigned as the chief inspector of the town. Javert
suspects the mayor to be the convict Valjean, but he cannot place
anything solid on the man and is forced to follow him from a distance.
It is then that Valjean makes a promise to Fantine, a woman who used to
work at his factory and is now dying of pneumonia, to bring her bastard
daughter back to Vigo so that the two may reunite before death.
Unfortunately, Javert tracks Valjean and forces him to take the daughter
to Paris, where the final hunt begins between Javert and Valjean. 
In a time of the year when recent fare has been loaded down with
senselessness and unintelligence, a remarkable redone drama like LES
MISÉRABLES is a very watchable film. Its 140-minute running time makes
it quite long and windy, although every scene begins with a superb
narrative hook to make the picture mostly entertaining throughout. At
the midway point, when the film reaches its highest tempo, the viewers
are very into the movie, and unfortunately it takes a big cut in pacing
and starts over with another plot that doesn't conclude the original
until the very end. While the first half is the story of Valjean, the
second half is the story of Cosette and Javert, and the transition is
not very pleasing. Nevertheless, a very entertaining and watchable film,
recommendable on all counts.
FINAL AWARD FOR "LES MISÉRABLES": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
Release Date: December 25, 1998
Starring: Julia Roberts, Susan Sarandon, Ed Harris, Jena Malone, Liam
Aiken, Darrell Larson, Lynn Whitfield
Directed by: Chris Columbus
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (language, thematic elements) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/stepmom.htm
It's been said that the toughest thing for a director to do is to get
the audience to emote the way he wants it to. But that statement is a
contradiction in terms: it should never be the director's intention to
get the audience to emote in a specific way. Such a style is the
trademark of a lightweight drama -- a pretender -- like Chris Columbus'
latest film, STEPMOM. Rather than being a heartfelt product, it is an
emotionally-manipulative one that specializes in pushing the right
buttons. 
The Gigi Levangie story can be spotted for the tearjerker it is from a
good distance off. Luke (Ed Harris) and Jackie (Susan Sarandon),
recently divorced, are still very much a part of each other's lives due
to their two children, Anna (Jena Malone) and Ben (Liam Aiken).
Unfortunately, the situation is complicated by the presence of Luke's
fiancée, Isabel (Julia Roberts). Naturally, Isabel and Jackie are at
odds with each other: Jackie, a good many years older than Isabel,
envies her freshness but despises her disorganized lifestyle. The two
children aren't sure what to make of Isabel either, both of them
unwilling to accept the separation between their mother and father. As
the story proceeds, then, we learn that Jackie has a malignant form of
cancer, and that soon all will be forced to accept Isabel into their
lives. 
For her credit, Julia Roberts essays the role of Isabel with talent.
It's easily the most dynamic role in the movie, and although none of the
roles are really sympathetic to the audience, hers is the one to watch.
She contributes to much of the life found in STEPMOM that might
otherwise be lacking. The rest of the cast is unfortunately stale. Both
Sarandon and Malone, as mother and daughter, never really get on the
audience's good side. Liam Aiken plays the naďve little boy, a la JERRY
MAGUIRE, and he specializes in stealing scenes. Ed Harris, for all of
his effort, can't create any gravity in his role due to his minimal
screentime; it's unfortunate that he plays so minor a role in the
finished product. 
Watching the movie is an unfulfilling experience from start to finish.
Although the story should be emotionally moving -- the prototypical
American family deals with life-and-death issues in an abnormal manner
-- it comes off weak. All of the gusto about the quality of life found
in PATCH ADAMS is lacking here, and the character motivations are
similarly unclear. There's no reason for the audience to reach out and
accept STEPMOM, and hence its only appeal is for those who don't want
serious drama. As a lighter outing it works marginally: all of the
appropriate elements are present and used in the correct fashion. But
there's little to say that this will be remembered after it has dropped
off the box office charts, and in the mean time, audience dollars are
better spent elsewhere.

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
Release Date: January 22, 1999
Starring: Bill Paxton, Billy Bob Thornton, Bridget Fonda, Brent Briscoe,
Chelcie Ross, Gary Cole
Directed by: Sam Raimi
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violence, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/simple.htm
The setup is familiar: a group of characters land themselves in a
boatload of trouble and devise a simple plan to get out of it. The plan,
needless to say, never goes as intended, and hence the plot of the
movie. A SIMPLE PLAN, directed by Sam Raimi (DARKMAN), is entirely of
this vein -- as the title indicates. But even more so, it's a fine
example of a stylishly directed thriller: screenwriting, camerawork,
editing, and sound all come together to make this movie a truly
involving experience. 
Bill Paxton headlines a cast of noteworthies as Hank Mitchell, an
educated Midwesterner struggling to make ends meet. His wife Sarah
(Bridget Fonda) is expecting a baby, and his job at the local grain mill
may not cover their expenses. His brother Jacob (Billy Bob Thornton) is
even worse -- he hangs out with the town drunk, Lou (Brent Briscoe), and
lives in a derelict apartment. So it's a fortunate turn of events for
the threesome when, out hunting, they find over four million dollars
inside a snow-covered plane wreck. Lou and Jacob want to spend the money
immediately, but Hank insists on keeping the money until spring; if no
one comes looking, then each man will get his share and they'll all
leave town. 
When it wants to be, A SIMPLE PLAN is a very gutsy movie. Most of the
time, however, it relies on subtlety to create a tense atmosphere. For
instance, most of the paranoia and incriminating doubt that the
characters experience is completely unnecessary -- the characters build
it up inside of themselves. Similarly, the writing in certain scenes
(such as the one where Hank and Jacob attempt to evince a confession
from Lou) is shrewd to the point of impossibility; the Scott Smith
script runs in circles before it hits the viewer in the face. On the
other hand, it also calls for stark imagery like a flock of ravens
attacking Hank or several bloody shooting deaths. But most importantly,
the biting irony of the script's ending should not be missed. 
The cast is well-chosen. Bill Paxton and Billy Bob Thornton work well
together, and their contrasts and similarities are what anchor the
movie. In most respects they're different individuals, bound only by
their family name, but in the movie's brief moments of character study
it's possible to see their likenesses. Interestingly enough, Jacob is
often a much more intelligent character than he appears; his role, from
start to finish, is an extraordinary one. Thornton masters it in fine
form. Other supports are also effective, especially Bridget Fonda as
Hank's wife Sarah. 
A SIMPLE PLAN is not unreasonably complex, and can only be faulted for
occasional moments of dullness. There are a number of possible Academy
Award nominations for this picture, although they will certainly it will
certainly be the dark horse. Certainly a worthwhile watch. 

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Release Date: June 26, 1998
Starring: George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle,
Dennis Farina, Steve Zahn, Michael Keaton, Samuel L. Jackson
Directed by: Steven Soderbergh
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (language, some strong violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/outofsight.htm
Amidst a rather noisy summer of asteroids, aliens, and masked Mexican
bandits comes this rather unassuming gem about money, love, and mo'
money. Written by Scott Frank (HEAVEN'S PRISONERS) in a quirky,
ultra-hip style and laced with a retro-cool soundtrack, there's more
than enough story and sizzile here to go around for all of the other
summer movies. Marked by one critic to be the only summer film with sex
in it (the closest competitor being THE X-FILES' one half-kiss), the
character love story provides plenty of depth and excitement for an
original concept. 
It stars George Clooney (THE PEACEMAKER) as Jack Foley, a notorious but
aging bank robber who gets nailed making a getaway from a stickup. In
the slammer, he uses some Latino friends to make his daring escape,
shortly thereafter reuniting with his best friend Buddy (Ving Rhames,
CON AIR). The only thing that limits the escape from being perfect is
the coincidental presence of a Federal marshal named Karen Sisco
(Jennifer Lopez, U-TURN). From here, the story takes off into Jack and
Buddy's plan to heist a large sum of uncut diamonds from a source they
had heard about in a previous incarceration together. Their characters
are immediately likeable, in the glorified sort of way that most
good-guy bank robbers are; if anything, Jack and Buddy are present day
versions of THE NEWTON BOYS. 
The acting is of a superb quality here. George Clooney redeems himself
for his last three films, all of which were stinkers, by giving a
toned-down performance. It works out for the better, as though he's
almost more relaxed in a less flamboyant role. Ving Rhames is similarly
pleasurable, and almost every line he says comes out with some degree of
humor due to his low, gravelly voice and stoic facial expressions.
Jennifer Lopez is sensual as ever, lending an eroticism to the crime
caper story. The other supporting roles are just as solid (Don Cheadle,
Dennis Farina, and the stupefying Steve Zahn), and there's even a few
bizarre cameos - Michael Keaton and Samuel L. Jackson make appearances
in the middle and end, respectively. 
There's no doubt that OUT OF SIGHT will be a hit with genre fans,
although it's questionable as to how large that fan base is. Anyone
who's not in tune with the retro-hipness atmophere that the movie exudes
is going to feel, understandably, that the film is too off-the-wall to
be appreciated. On the other hand, those who are of a PULP FICTION
nature will see a product like this as top-of-the-line material,
something that can't be missed for a true follower. On the whole,
there's nothing that can't be enjoyed, and it may simply be too crass or
crude for some types.
FINAL AWARD FOR "OUT OF SIGHT": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Black Dog (1998)
Release Date: May 1, 1998
Starring: Patrick Swayze, Meat Loaf, Randy Travis, Gabriel Casseus,
Charles Dutton, Stephen Tobolowsky, Brian Vincent, Brenda Strong
Directed by: Kevin Hooks
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (intense scenes of action violence, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/blackdog.htm
Low-budget action films like BLACK DOG are often power trips or playing
cards for either down-and-out or up-and-coming actors. Patrick Swayze,
having not starred in a motion picture in three years, might almost be
mistaken for an up-and-comer; that is, if we weren't all too aware that
his bewrinkled face was the same one we saw eleven years ago in DIRTY
DANCING. Whatever the case, though, this beyond-his-time actor and this
film both should've been kept on the shelves and not shown in most
first-run theaters nationwide. 
Swayze is Jack Crews, an ex-trucker on parole who lost his trucking
license several years ago for vehicular manslaughter. He's now got a job
as a mechanic, struggling to make ends meet and provide a better life
for his wife Melanie (Brenda Strong) and his daughter Tracy (Erin
Broderick). When he needs nine thousand dollars to meet a past due house
payment, he takes an under-the-table offer from his boss to make one
last delivery from Atlanta to his home state of New Jersey. It will mean
breaking parole, and it will mean that he'll have to take the risk of
avoiding anyone who might want to hijack his shipment (hint, hint). 
Right after Patrick Swayze, in the credits, are singers Meat Loaf and
Randy Travis. Both of them aren't fit for the job, and instead end up
giving over-the-top performances of outrageously comedic bad guys. They,
along with almost all of the other characters in the film, are
practically parodies of themselves, and only serve to heighten the
film's hokey atmosphere. Jumbled into the mix are a lot of non-sequitous
trucker stories (e.g., the black dog, or perhaps "slipping a gear" on
the way down a hill) that are surrounded by dialogues that don't extend
beyond two or three exchanges. The film wants to cultivate the
high-tension image of SPEED, but its car chases and crashes have the
laborious feel you'd expect from a Mack truck trying to make it up a
steep incline. 
Nothing is particularly ideal for BLACK DOG, from its setup to its
characters to its plot, and even its opening weekend. Movie audiences
can usually spot the corny action movies, and while this Swayze vehicle
isn't immediately obvious as hokum, the first spoken line costs it any
chance it has to be genuine. Hollywood dollars and moviegoer dollars are
better spent elsewhere.
FINAL AWARD FOR "BLACK DOG": 1.0 star - a poor movie.

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
Release Date: August 28, 1998
Starring: Ryan Phillippe, Mike Myers, Salma Hayek, Neve Campbell,
Breckin Meyer, Sela Ward
Directed by: Mark Christopher
Distributed by: Miramax Films
MPAA Rating: R (sexuality, drug use, language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/54.htm 
In one of its recent reports, Reuters newswire gave Miramax Films' new
movie 54 the label of a "disco film." Granted, the movie is about one of
the most exclusive 1970's disco dives, and that disco music could be
considered an entire culture, but the disco label itself is quite
circumstantial. One of the things that 54 does best is give a general
critique of the less fortunate making fame and success for themselves on
a single break. The critique is thematically inspiring and thoughtful,
but it's so well buried in the glamour of the movie that it's almost not
worth noticing. On the surface, 54 is a muddled project. 
54 was written and directed by the same man - Mark Christopher - and
this is his first feature made for nationwide release. Previous to this,
he's made a living directing short films or segments of features, and
for extending his reach to 90 minutes, he does well. Unfortunately, any
brilliance that might've surfaced in the script is lost in the acting
corps' rough-on-the-edges job. Ryan Phillippe, as the star, uses his
good looks to his advantage but can't come up with anything worthwhile
in terms of substance. Salma Hayek and Mike Myers have limited screen
time, playing supporting roles to the story's main man, and both of them
fail to make an impression. In fact, only Neve Campbell is any good, and
this marks her first impressive dramatic feature. Though she was
noteworthy in SCREAM, she hasn't done much in the way of quality since,
and she was fun to watch here. 
Phillippe (I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER) is Shane O'Shea, a young
Jersey kid with ambitions to be somewhere more exciting. One night he
convinces a friend with a car to take him across the river to New York
City, where they make their way to the exclusive disco dive Studio 54.
Only the beautiful people get inside, though, and so there's throngs of
people outside the door. The club's eccentric manager, Steve Rubell
(Mike Myers, AUSTIN POWERS), makes the call to let Shane in, and then
days later Shane is hired by Rubell to work as a busboy. With the help
of newfound friend Greg (Breckin Meyer), he's quickly promoted to
bartender and instant fame inside the club. It's then that he meets
Julie Black, a soap opera actress; the two hit it off, and that's
perhaps the last good thing to come of the waning days of Studio 54. 
Christopher tells the story in as much of a straight line as is possible
without staying on course. Though only 90 minutes long and very much to
the point, 54 has too many plot devices that bog it down. Because of
this, and because of Christopher's inexperience with directing
full-length features, none of the possibly-interesting subplots come to
fruition. The love story between Shane and Julie is over and done with
in the last half-hour; the story of Rubell's battles with the IRS isn't
in the light until the last twenty minutes, and even that is unexpected;
and Shane's fallings-out with Greg are formulaic in all respects. For
the most part 54 is a so-so movie, unable to find something to bring it
up but not pulled under by any of its flaws. It's hard to dislike with
such a short running time, and so in some sense it's almost a guaranteed
worthwhile watch.
FINAL AWARD FOR "54": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
Release Date: December 18, 1998
The Voices of: Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Jeff Goldblum,
Danny Glover, Michelle Pfeiffer, Patrick Stewart, Steve Martin, Martin
Short, Helen Mirren
Directed by: Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells
Distributed by: DreamWorks Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (intense depiction of thematic elements) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/prince.htm
Near the end of 1996, analysts remarked that the year would be the last
in which Disney would stand alone as the animation king. The following
year, 1997, saw the first sleeper entry into the genre from a studio
other than the Magic Kingdom: Twentieth Century Fox gave baronial Russia
to the masses in the form of ANASTASIA. At best, that's all it was -- a
sleeper hit, designed to surprise but not shake the industry. In 1998,
however, things have been decidedly different. There have been a number
of pushes on Disney's death grip on the market, and fifty-one weeks into
'98, a new champion has emerged. 
DreamWorks' THE PRINCE OF EGYPT succeeds where all of the other
conventionally animated products have failed. The other two contenders,
Warner Brothers' QUEST FOR CAMELOT and Disney's own annual entry, MULAN,
lacked inspiration and drive respectively. Although CAMELOT was
borderline-abysmal, and can't really be considered a shot at the title,
MULAN had the makings of winner. Unfortunately, it was saturated with
traditional, Disney-cute animation, and lost points against the
rapidly-changing face of the competition. In making THE PRINCE OF EGYPT,
DreamWorks has strayed from all of these hallmarks and created a
genuinely unique product. 
The animation is flawless, and, aside from A BUG'S LIFE, is the
best-looking movie to date. The animators have nimbly mixed both flat
and spatial effects, and the 2D/3D combination is something that artists
from Disney and Fox have heretofore struggled with. The key to success,
however, was that the visuals were used not just because they looked
cool but also as a method of advancing the plot. Namely, some of the
most important action sequences (like the parting of the Red Sea) were
done almost entirely in 3D. DreamWorks is the first studio to prove that
they've got the stuff of success, and that they're capable of
challenging Disney. 
The story is also well-written, and the characters voiced with talent.
For the most part, the plot follows its source material -- the Book of
Exodus -- although only in the most general sense. The writers took a
few creative liberties, and most do not damage the story in any way. In
fact, the Shakespearean relationship between Moses (Val Kilmer) and the
Pharaoh Rameses (Ralph Fiennes) makes the story more interesting if
anything. Moses, a Hebrew, is saved from the slaughter of the firstborn
sons by his mother when she sets him in a basket on the Nile; he floats
into the Pharaoh Seti (Patrick Stewart)'s palace and is taken in by the
royal family. Moses grows up but learns of his heritage and flees into
the desert, where he discovers the burning bush and is commissioned by
God to return to Egypt and free the slaves. By this time, Rameses is now
Pharaoh, and the two brothers, now on opposite sides of the line, face
off in a battle of wills and divine intervention. 
The cast of voices is most impressive, and also includes such noteables
as Sandra Bullock, Jeff Goldblum, Danny Glover, and Steve Martin. The
script does not have a lot of one-liners in it, and God is reduced to a
voice that might well be mistaken for the same one that spoke to Kevin
Costner in FIELD OF DREAMS, but overall the story is exciting and
interesting. It's decidedly for an older crowd, and the tykes who
haven't had a few years of religion class will be hopelessly lost. But
for those who make the bid, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT can be a great watch.

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
Release Date: January 15, 1999
Starring: James Van Der Beek, Jon Voight, Scott Caan, Ron Larter, Eliel
Swinton, Ali Larter, Amy Smart, Paul Walker
Directed by: Brian Robbins
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (strong language throughout, sexuality and nudity, some
substance abuse)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/varsity.htm
There's something to be said for reality, and MTV Productions' latest
movie, VARSITY BLUES, proves it beyond a doubt. Even the most flawed
movies -- those filled with bad acting, poor direction, horrible
writing, and misguided photography -- can salvage some dignity by
clinging to reality. But when any real-world sense is thrown out the
window, as in VARSITY BLUES, the product becomes a 100-minute travel
along a downward spiral. Directed by GOOD BURGER helmer Brian Robbins,
VARSITY BLUES is easily bottom-of-the-barrel entertainment. 
As with any Gen-X MTV movie (like last year's DEAD MAN ON CAMPUS), the
movie is marketed for a primarily male audience as indicated by its main
selling points: sex and football. Those two items, wrapped in a
guilty-pleasure package, are sure to snare a sizeable box office chunk
initially, but sales will decline for two reasons. First, the football
sequences are nothing new, nor can they be; the sports genre isn't
mainstream and it's been retread to death. Second, the sex is just bad.
Despite the appearance of a whipped cream bikini or the all-night
strip-club party, there's nothing even remotely tantalizing. 
The acting is mostly mediocre, not including the fantastic Jon Voight.
Cultivating his usual sliminess, Voight gives an unexpectedly standout
performance as West Canaan Coyotes head coach Bud Kilmer. Kilmer is the
driving force behind the Coyotes' twenty-two conference championships
and two state titles in thirty years; this year he plans to make it
twenty-three. Unfortunately, when his star quarterback, Lance Harbor
(Paul Walker), goes down for the count, he's got to rely on the
unreliable abilities of backup John Moxon (James Van Der Beek). Moxon
leads the team through its last four games, and then must cope with his
newfound stardom, the effect it has on his relationship with girlfriend
Julie (Amy Smart), and other temptations that abound in football-crazy
West Canaan. 
Most regions of the country are not nearly as football-crazy as Texas,
and so the atmosphere is likely to be lost on most. Similarly, the set
design is wrong for a high school setting: the teams are decked out with
sparkling uniforms, radio headsets (which never seem to work, however,
and instead require coaches to signal plays manually), and even a giant
bronze statue of Coach Kilmer. These elements (as well as the heavy
drinking and carousing) might be more appropriate on a college campus --
but MTV's core audience is the high school demographic. This focus is
further emphasized by the casting: James Van Der Beek, of TV's "Dawson's
Creek," is an understandable choice for the reluctant hero, although he
never manages to do anything with the role. Other stars are similarly
young and unmemorable. 
There's not much that goes right about VARSITY BLUES, and there's not
much to like about it, either. Everything herein has already been done,
and if it hasn't, the movie manages to botch it one way or another. This
is certainly missable.

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
Release Date: September 25, 1998
Starring: Alicia Witt, Rebecca Gayheart, Jared Leto, Loretta Devine,
Joshua Jackson, Tara Reid, Michale Rosenbaum, John Neville, Robert
Englund
Directed by: Jamie Blanks
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (horror violence/gore, language, sexual content) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/urban.htm
As the slasher/horror-genre revival takes the film world by storm,
filmmakers are gravitating toward the quantity-over-quality maxim. Along
with earlier-this-year's DISTURBING BEHAVIOR, the latest entry into the
neo-category is a quickly-crafted mix of script, character, and
atmosphere. In directing her debut feature, Jamie Blanks attempts to
take URBAN LEGEND down a path that hasn't been done before. The title
shows it - she's going to make use of those pop campfire scare stories -
but in the process of trying to fit everything in she falls back on
cliché and gimmick to the point where it reflects badly on other films
of the type. 
Granted, the urban legends make things interesting intially, but for the
most part this is simply novelty. Everyone knows most of these stories
by one version or another, and the popularity is undeniable, but by the
end they're just a tired gimmick. Even that might work, but in order to
substantiate this, the script calls upon recent trademarks. How many
people in the same small town have the same fur-lined parka (a la the
raincoat in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER)? Or who brought the gun
into the final scene so that the killer could get offed at least three
times a la SCREAM? And that escape route by foot through the woods -
why, that wouldn't be from DISTURBING BEHAVIOR, would it? The bottom
line is that everything included here is definitely not of orginal make
or model. 
The center of the cast is a group of four or five teens we've all seen
before. Alicia Witt (TV's CYBILL) is no different from the Jennifer Love
Hewitts and Neve Campbells of Gen-X fame, and she does all right - minus
a bit of inspiration. Her college student world is rocked one night when
news of the gruesome death of a friend reaches campus. Suddenly other
friends start turning up dead (Joshua Jackson, Danielle Harris), and all
suffer death in the same fashion as one of the urban legends. The cast
is narrowed down to only the smart and the quick, and, of course, they
have their fallings-out and childish moments of paranoia. Nothing we
haven't seen, but not to worry - it won't be long before the killer
strikes again. Thus the plot. 
The only reason we don't confuse this with parody is because Jamie
Blanks makes to spice up her movie with murders grotesque and graphic to
the extreme. URBAN LEGEND is perhaps the first movie to enter the
no-holds-barred arena of slasher movies, and the only purpose it serves
is to turn the audience against the killer. After a string of nine or
ten gruesome deaths, the audience cares more about how the killer will
die rather than who he actually is. And in this case, when the
impossible identity is revealed, no one bats an eye - which could lead
one to believe that Blanks was counting on the ignorance of her
audience. Most of URBAN LEGEND follows in suit: a typical 90's horror
movie. And though the crowds will flock to the theaters on opening
weekend, you don't have to be among them.

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
Release Date: June 19, 1998
The Voices of: Ming-Na Wen, Eddie Murphy, B.D. Wong, Harvey Fierstein,
Jerry Tondo, Gedde Watanabe, James Hong
Directed by: Tony Bancroft, Barry Cook
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: G 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/mulan.htm
The second of this year's two leading-female animated motion pictures
(besides the in-the-rough QUEST FOR CAMELOT), and the third of the last
three (counting 1997's ANASTASIA), MULAN was an animated picture that
had, perhaps, a bit to live up to. Although those last two pictures
weren't really a benchmark, they were a trend, and Disney was charged
with distancing themselves from "normal" fare. Not only that, but as
soon as previews and advance showings began filtering down through the
ranks of the critics, MULAN was hailed as the best Disney animation
since THE LION KING. And while this one isn't as enjoyable as the
African epic of 1994, it is probably the best animated movie since then. 
Disney's animated films have progressively become more refined from the
typical children's movies - ones adults hate to see in theaters because
they know the same films will infest their VCRs like parasites after
release on videocasette - to complete crowd-pleasers. In addition to the
easily-gotten under-12 demographic, Disney has nailed the
too-cool-to-care date crowd, the Gen-Xers, and the middle-aged chaperone
folks. They've done this through clever writing and a well-manicured
storytelling style, all of which is very present in MULAN. From the
opening scene, a rather dark and ominous one showing the Huns invading
China, to the pastel-colored plates of lowland Asia, this movie is
crafted very nicely. The animation quality here, although not
outstandingly different from Disney's last feature, Hercules, is the
up-to-snuff look we've come to expect from the original animators. 
Early on it was made clear that even though MULAN sported a female in
the lead role, this would be no SNOW WHITE. And indeed it's not, as the
main woman here - the 18-year-old Mulan (voiced by Ming-Na Wen) - cuts
her hair, puts on some battle armor, and enlists into the Imperial Army
as a boy to save her ailing father from having to serve. She does this,
of course, against every societal convention in place at the time, but
she oes it quite well - managing to become a national hero after all but
saving China from the evil-doing Huns. Along for the ride is a tiny
dragon sent by Mulan's ancestors. Named Mushu and voiced by Eddie
Murphy, he's the movie's main comic relief source, and for the most part
he does it well. Murphy's also one of the only familiar names in the
cast (apart from Harvey Fierstein, who voices a stout soilder but also
played the quivering news chief in INDEPENDENCE DAY). 
The lack of familiar names was spun as good for the movie, but it may
cost the movie some box office dollars in comparison to PRINCE OF EGYPT,
the later-this-year animated film from DreamWorks. That film sports the
largest collection of big names since THE LION KING, and one of the most
enjoyable aspects of that movie was hearing A-list actors do what they
could with just their voices. Normally something Disney would not have
to worry about, they now are - or will be soon - in direct competition
with other studios' animated features. Up to this point, they've had the
top call; no one's been able to challenge them. But it won't be long
before the other studios pick up speed, and then Disney will need all
the MULANs they can get.
FINAL AWARD FOR "MULAN": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Release Date: June 5, 1998
Starring: Jim Carrey, Ed Harris, Laura Linney, Noah Emmerich, Natascha
McElhone, Holland Taylor
Directed by: Peter Weir
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (thematic elements, mild language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/truman.htm 
The beginning to a good movie is a good story, and that was most likely
the way Andrew Niccol began before writing his script to THE TRUMAN
SHOW. Innovative and determined, the story is one of the finer pieces of
literature to make it on to the screen this year; although it does not
contain the meandering plot twists of similar movies such as Dark City,
it contains a great amount of depth which adds to the power of the
story. It's only a base, though, for a series of fine performances and
great photography, music, and editing, all of which will surely make THE
TRUMAN SHOW one of the year's best. 
The movie almost sets itself up as a metaphor for the power of the
effect television as an entertainment medium. The opening credits do not
read 'Jim Carrey' and 'Ed Harris,' they read 'Truman Burbank' (Carrey)
and 'Christof' (Harris). In this way, Director Peter Weir begins to make
us think that what we're watching is actually happening - the first
important step toward engaging an audience. The movie continues through
a brief but explanatory progression of Truman's life: he is the star of
an immensely popular television series that gives hope to millions, but
there's one catch. He's the only principle in the series that does not
know he's in a television series. All of his friends and family, even an
entire town, are a cast of extras. 
Although the show has been following Truman's life since he was born,
we're inserted at Day 10,909 - somewhere near the end of Truman's
twenty-ninth year. The first half of the movie is contained almost
entirely within the show, so that even the audience has very little idea
of what happens outside. But as the story progresses, both Truman and
the audience come to know more and more that something else exists: the
esoteric world of Christof, the creator of the show. The downside to
this is that any audience member without prior knowledge of the setup
will find the opening part to THE TRUMAN SHOW vague, or perhaps
confusing. Great narrative hook that it is, though, even informed
viewers are yearning to see outside the vast soundstage on which the
television show is shot. 
Into the movie's second half, though, that wish is fulfilled and we are
given broader and broader looks at the man behind the scenes.
Masterfully done by Ed Harris, and perhaps a portrayal of Oscar worth
for a supporting role, the man is a guru of entertainment. Dynamic
enough, though, to at the same time be obssessive and even frightening,
he adds weight to what otherwise might be an inspired little melodrama.
The characters and scenes are also underscored by Burkhard Dallwitz's
fine score, and although cinematography is questionable - is it Peter
Biziou, or the crew of THE TRUMAN SHOW that's choosing what we see -
it's no less thematic. All in all a perfectly watchable motion picture.
With the sudden failings of GODZILLA at the box office, THE TRUMAN SHOW
may become the benchmark for the summer movies of 1998.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE TRUMAN SHOW": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
Release Date: December 25, 1998
Starring: Robin Williams, Monica Potter, Daniel London, Philip Seymour
Hoffman, Bob Gunton, Harve Presnell
Directed by: Tom Shadyac
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (strong language, crude humor) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/patch.htm
The long and illustrious career of Robin Williams, which has included
both forgettable turns like MRS. DOUBTFIRE and FLUBBER, was punctuated
with the actor's first Academy Award in 1998 for his role in GOOD WILL
HUNTING. It was his first truly dramatic role since 1989's DEAD POETS
SOCIETY, and critical remarks were unanimously positive. His next role,
that of a deceased pediatrician in WHAT DREAMS MAY COME, was
unfortunately lackluster. And so, after a six-year stint as a comedic
actor, the proof on whether or not Williams can cut it in the dramatic
league has come down to PATCH ADAMS. 
Williams is the title character, Hunter "Patch" Adams, sporting scruffy
facial hair that falls between the clean-shavenness of DREAMS and the
grotesque hairiness of WILL HUNTING. We're introduced to Patch as he
commits himself to a mental institution because of his suicidal
tendancies. It's at the institution, however, that he discovers a latent
talent for relating to people. He removes himself from the institution
and enrolls at the University of Virginia's medical college, where he
finds that medical doctrine is a calculating, impersonal trade. His
attempts to inject humanity into the profession result in several bouts
with expulsion, and the movie climaxes with Patch's appearance before
the state medical board. 
The characters are well-defined in an Oscar-worthy sense. Although the
script does not perform well as a narrative -- there's little story to
be told outside of Patch's skit-length experiences -- the script does go
a long way toward building the relationships of characters. At medical
school, Patch meets up with Truman Schiff (Daniel London), an outsider
like himself who relishes Patch's zest for humanity. The two instantly
become the best of friends, and it's easy to see why. Monica Potter
plays Patch's love interest, a young woman who personifies the things
that Patch hates about medical school. For some reason he's attracted to
her, and although it never gets said, the audience understands from an
intrinsic point of view. The script -- based on Hunter Adams' own story
-- works well this way. 
The rest of the cast, Bob Gunton as the villain professor in particular,
is solid. Director Tom Shadyac (LIAR LIAR) leads us in and out of
Patch's life in a sound, intentional manner; combined with Williams'
presence on screen, the movie rarely becomes boring. PATCH ADAMS' lack
of purpose is its major shortcoming, and for the first ninety minutes
out of two hours, there's little feeling of continuity or the passage of
time. Nevertheless, it's an emotionally moving picture, and PATCH ADAMS
looks to be one of the more memorable of the holiday season. It succeeds
at everything it tries, and only fails at the stuff it doesn't try in
the first place. By and large there may be another Oscar nomination
herein for Williams, but more importantly, it's entertainment for the
entire family. 

Title
Review for Return to Paradise (1998)
Release Date: August 14, 1998
Starring: Anne Heche, Vince Vaughn, Joaquin Phoenix, David Conrad, Vera
Farmiga, Jada Pinkett
Directed by: Joseph Ruben
Distributed by: PolyGram Filmed Entertainment
MPAA Rating: R (violence, language, sexuality)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/return.htm
The release date listed for RETURN TO PARADISE might be interpreted as a
typo, considering the fact that it's in release at the same time as
multimillion dollar blockbusters made for the masses. Certainly, this
deep and engaging drama might be more at home in late fall or early
winter, when films of this quality see limited but noteworthy release
and usually catch our attention several months later at Oscar time.
There is no doubt that this movie will be pulled under against more
glamorous products, but as was the case with earlier-this-year's
TWILIGHT and last year's NIGHT FALLS ON MANHATTAN, sometimes there are
diamonds in the rough. 
Strictly speaking, RETURN TO PARADISE (directed by Money Train helmer
Joseph Ruben) is not at the peak of its genre. It's a typical drama in
most ways: believable characters thrown into a plot with at least one
heart-wrenching or tearjerking event. But in other ways, it's atypical
in its subtle workings of these elements. Scenes do not scream of plot
development, and characters are larger than they originally appear to
be. Though Ruben cannot be credited with this - his delightfully
star-free cast is the power behind that plus - he manages to weave
everything together into a sturdy mold that does not fall apart upon
inspection. Simple and to the point, with a running time of less than
two hours, PARADISE is an enjoyable drama. 
Most of the premise is laid out in the first thirty minutes, which tends
to make the last eighty minutes not as fun as they could be. Three
friends spend a summer in Malaysia, accumulating during their stay 104
grams of hashish. At the end of the summer, two of the group - Sheriff
(Vince Vaughn) and Tony (David Conrad) fly back to the US with promises
to keep in touch. The other friend, Lewis (Joaquin Phoenix), will stay
at their condo a few days before moving on to Borneo to help a wildlife
preservation program. Before he can do that, however, police officers
find him and the hash. Lew, in possession of over a hundred grams, is
tried and convicted of drug trafficking and sentenced to death by
Malaysia's strict justice code. 
Back in the States, two years later, a young lawyer named Beth Eastern
(Anne Heche) approaches Sheriff and Tony and informs them of the
situation. Lew is set to be executed in eight days, but if the two of
them go back and accept their share of the responsibility, the
government will grant Lew clemency. There will still be prison time
involved, but not without compensation, Beth promises. Then,
predictably, for the greater part of the rest of the movie, both Sheriff
and Tony turn their options over in their heads. Though somewhat slow,
this middle section builds to a final twenty minutes that is some of the
most powerful drama in recent memory. RETURN TO PARADISE is not always
on the mark, but it hits more than it misses and you're sure to find it
worthwhile, at the very least.
FINAL AWARD FOR "RETURN TO PARADISE": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
Release Date: March 26, 1999
Starring: Claire Danes, Omar Epps, Giovanni Ribisi, Dennis Farina, Josh
Brolin, Michael Lerner, Richard Jenkins
Directed by: Scott Silver
Distributed by: Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer
MPAA Rating: R (language, violence, some sexuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/modsquad.htm
Something is horribly appropriate about THE MOD SQUAD. It lies in that
confusing teenage ground between mainstream and fringe, and its cynical
postmodern view is suddenly becoming very prevalent in adolescent
society. However, this tiny societal revolution is nothing more than a
hiccup in civilization's grand scale. And so the wave of trendiness
which Scott Silver's THE MOD SQUAD rides is too meaningless to make the
movie of any worth. 
The plot is similarly meaningless for most of its 95-minute running
time, and for a movie of such brevity, that's never good. The fast-paced
feeling is nothing more than an illusion created by the liberal editing
job, and it should be clear that the plot is nothing more than a
skeleton to hang plot devices upon. The three writers involved (director
Silver as well as Stephen Kay and Katie Lanier) have little experience
between them, and that's frequently obvious: the comic relief would be
nothing without Giovanni Ribisi and the suspense is never
well-disguised. 
Of course, with a little work, THE MOD SQUAD could've easily been
premiered on primetime television, and so there's not much room for
extended development. In quick succession, we're introduced to the
characters, their mission, and their problems which will lead to the
climactic final scene. Protagonists Julie (Claire Danes), Linc (Omar
Epps), and Pete (Ribisi) are teens on their way to jail who cut a deal
with police captain Adam Greer (Dennis Farina). The man says: help us
and we'll help you -- that is, our heroes hold a get-out-of-jail-for-now
card while they undercover-cop their way into Los Angeles' hottest
hangouts. All does not go as planned, however, when Greer ends up dead
with some drugs on his person, and everything stinks of setup. 
It takes some time for all of this to stick in the heads of the
audience, and by the time it does, the end credits are only fifteen
minutes away. Most of the script is filled with trivial banter or
clichéd substance, and unfortunately it isn't until the last scene that
one of the characters takes a poke at the recycled plot. But when all is
said, the script never helped this movie. 
So instead director Silver tries to put the burden of success on the
movie's trendy atmosphere: the 70's-revival dress, the racous big city
nightlife, and the ease with which one can get laid therein are all
themes which prevade the movie. Unfortunately the actors are too one-
dimensional (Danes and Epps) or over-the-top (Ribisi) to draw the
audience in, and thus THE MOD SQUAD will be dismissed as smoke and
mirrors. It is possible to have fun watching this movie, but that would
take far more brain power than the producers assumed the target audience
would have. 

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
* 1/2 (out of 4) - an unremarkable movie
Release Date: November 13, 1998
Starring: Jennifer Love Hewitt, Freddie Prinze Jr., Brandy Norwood,
Mekhi Phifer, Muse Watson, Matthew Settle, Bill Cobbs, Jennifer Esposito
Directed by: Danny Cannon
Distributed by: Columbia Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: R (intense terror violence and gore, strong language, some
drug use)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/istillknow.htm 
The obvious reason for producing a sequel to an immensely popular movie
is to acquire continued profits. The rationale is sound, but in many
cases of this and recent years, the sequel is a shoddy product that's
exposed for the cash-milking vehicle it really is. Last year's SPEED 2
and SCREAM 2, as well as this year's SPECIES II have all been products
that have been decisively less than satisfactory. In some cases, a
sequel can even discredit its predecessor, as with the latest
neo-slasher flick, I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER. Whatever
uniqueness the original might've had now seems trite and overplayed when
paired with this abominable thriller. 
Julie James (Jennifer Love Hewitt) and Ray Bronson (Freddie Prinze Jr.)
are back from the original to star in I STILL KNOW, reprising their
roles in typical fashion. Julie and Ray experience a rather predictable
falling-out at the beginning of the movie, leaving the door wide open
for newcomer Will Benson (Matthew Settle). Will and Julie hit it off,
and along with friends Karla (Brandy Norwood) and Tyrell (Mekhi Phifer),
the foursome heads off to a radio station-giveaway vacation in the
tropics. Unfortunately, things aren't so peachy once they arrive, and
with a regularity you could set your watch by, the infamous fisherman
(Muse Watson) is back with his hook. It's another bloody showdown,
complete with cliffhanger ending. 
There's not much that's original about I STILL KNOW, and with the market
saturated by Gen-X thrillers like this one, it's unlikely that I STILL
KNOW will get any recognition other than that of a bad sequel. For
die-hard fans of the genre, this will be required viewing material, but
the bottom line is that the material here is just recycled from the
original I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER. The aura of thrillerism
surrounding the plot isn't heightened by skillful scripting or camera
work, but rather a tense, string-based score and manipulative editing.
The man with the hook ends up becoming very belittled this time around
when the script gives him too many lines of dialogue -- he goes from
being a scary figure to a nutcase in a few short and painful moments. 
Much of the mystery is dropped for the sake of getting the point. The
whole reason the plot exists - Julie and Karla must guess the capital of
Brazil in order to win the trip from the radio station - is a dead
giveaway, lessening suspense and creating a hurry-up-and-wait timing
problem. And, whereas the killer's identity might've been a question in
the first movie, it's almost a given here, which changes the dynamic of
the movie drastically. Three or four teens run automatically from a man
in a rain slicker they nonchalantly refer to as "the killer." They're
almost used to it, and the performances show it - not Hewitt, nor
Prinze, nor Brandy, nor Phifer give a decent show. And so, in the end,
it's left wide open for a third movie and - most likely - a brand new
supporting cast. God help us.

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
Release Date: July 10, 1998
Starring: Ben Stiller, Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris
Elliott, Lin Shaye, W. Earl Brown, Brett Favre
Directed by: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Film Corp.
MPAA Rating: R (strong comic sexual content, language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/theres.htm 
About the time that the pre-release hype for SAVING PRIVATE RYAN was
reaching a full head of steam, the new Farrelly Brothers movie, THERE'S
SOMETHING ABOUT MARY was making its own waves in the ratings pool.
Skeptics and antagonists pointed out that MARY had some content that was
arguably unsuitable for mass distribution. The Farrelly Brothers
responded by saying that test audiences had responded well to the movie
and were not worried about "crossing the line." After the film has seen
wide release, now, it's easy to see that there's some truth to both
sides of the debate. MARY is a textbook exercise in crude humor, but at
the same time it's saved by its own quirky cuteness. 
Ben Stiller is Ted Stroehmann, an unlikely 1960s prom date for Mary
Jensen (Cameron Diaz). Ted makes it to Mary's house on prom night, but
due to a terrible misfortune in the bathroom, Ted doesn't make it
through the rest of the night. Instead, he's taken to the hospital, and
he doesn't see Mary again when she moves from Rhode Island to Florida
with her parents later that summer. Now, in the present day, Ted still
cannot forget his love for Mary, and so, by his friend Dom (Chris
Elliot)'s reference, he contacts a private investigator named Pat Healy
(Matt Dillon) to find Mary again. Healy does, but instead of going back
to Ted, Healy falls in love with Mary and begins to romance her. This
all goes well until two things happen: Tucker, one of Mary's friends and
also a secret lover, interferes with Healy's plans; and, Ted finds out
for himself where Mary is and goes to meet her anyway. 
The plot is not nearly as convoluted as it may seem, and is quite easily
followed when it plays out onscreen. The actors have all got the
business down adaquately enough, although none of them is as outrageous
as they should be for this sort of off-kilter Gen-X comedy. Stiller is
the most impressive here, and after his limp performance in 1996's
FLIRTING WITH DISASTER, it's nice to see him play a better character
with more feeling. Cameron Diaz adds the appropriate amounts of
attractiveness, sexual tension, and allure in the right places,
makingthe cast seem realistic in their actions to fall head over heals
for Mary. Although the plot gets occasionally sidetracked in unlikely
spots, it goes from start to finish with little interruption and doesn't
get boring. And, for a Packers fan, the Brett Favre cameo near the end
has quite possibly some of the best lines of dialogue spoken onscreen
this year. 
For those who've followed SOMETHING ABOUT MARY's progress on the weekend
gross charts, it's clear where the downfall to MARY's humor is. The
physical and mostly brainless comedy isn't done well or in particularly
good taste, and as such it's got quite a limited audience. SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY has stayed on the charts for an outstanding length of time -
better than most movies in current release - but it's never risen above
number three out of the top ten. These results, along with the final
product itself, underscore the fact that any genius in MARY is limited
to the genre. Fans will see it again and again, but it will be a tough
sell to those interested in more serious dramas or sci-fi/fantasy. It's
a workable movie, but not necessarily for everyone.
FINAL AWARD FOR "SOMETHING ABOUT MARY": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
Release Date: July 24, 1998
Starring: Jimmy Marsden, Katie Holmes, Nick Stahl, Steve Railsback,
Bruce Greenwood, Ethan Embry,
Katharine Isabelle
Directed by: David Nutter
Distributed by: Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer
MPAA Rating: R (terror, violence, brief language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/disturbing.htm 
Since late in 1996, with the release of the ever-popular thriller SCREAM
and the revival of the horror genre into pop culture, there have been
five thriller pics that were specifically made for the teenage
demographic. Sequentially, each has gotten more campy, more absurd, less
believable, and less fun. The low point was 1997's SCREAM 2, which
lacked all of the elements that made its predecessor so much fun.
DISTURBING BEHAVIOR, the latest entry from veteran TV director David
Nutter, may not be an original, but it had its moments. 
Jimmy Marsden (TV's SECOND NOAH) and Katie Holmes (TV's DAWSON'S CREEK)
head up a cast of actors of similar pedigrees. In fact, almost everyone
involved with the production here has a filmography that is nine-tenths
television. And why not? The guaranteed way to attract a good percentage
of the Oxy-10 crowd, most of which spends several hours in front of the
tube each day, is to pick actors they know and like. Above all, though,
they weren't chosen for their acting ability. Marsden is a Tom Cruise
look-alike, and Holmes wears chest-hugging sweatshirts; both are there
to simply fill the role and get oogled by members of the opposite sex.
In fact, the only one of appreciative talent here is Nick Stahl, whose
performance as the drugged-up, burned-out Gavin Strick is quite dynamic
and believable. 
Marsden is the lead as Steve Clark, a troubled but mostly put-together
young lad who is moving with his family to the picturesque town of
Cradle Bay after suffering a death in the family. Like any kid, Steve's
a bit nervous about his first day at his new school, and when he gets
there everything seems normal enough. That is, until he meets Gavin, who
introduces him to both the inner workings of the school and his friend
Rachel Wagner (Holmes). Gavin has an avid hatred of the Blue Ribbon
Club, a group of A-plus students that do philanthropic work. However,
these students are also strangely prone to overloaded sex drives (no
joke, really) that often result in violence. So Steve, with the help of
Rachel, learns that there's a sinister hand behind all of this, and the
only question the movie doesn't answer is how deep it runs. 
The acting may not be top-quality, but writer Scott Rosenberg (CON AIR)
manages to include some amount of genuine thrillerism. His premise reeks
of campiness in the "Twilight Zone" sense, but it does lend itself to
scenes which are tense and exciting to watch. Most of the movie is
filmed in dark and ominous settings, and a good deal of the time that
builds atmosphere to the point where everything is watchable. Still, the
film's main detractor is its inability to grasp anything solid,
worthwhile, or even realistic, and the viewer will be plagued by that
realization once it comes. At its best, this is passing entertainment,
and at its worst, this is good comedy. Hopefully, it falls in between.
FINAL AWARD FOR "DISTURBING BEHAVIOR": 2.0 stars - a fair movie

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
Release Date: January 8, 1999
Starring: Gwyneth Paltrow, Joseph Fiennes, Geoffrey Rush, Ben Affleck,
Colin Firth, Judi Dench, Tom Wilkinson, Rupert Everett
Directed by: John Madden
Distributed by: Miramax Films
MPAA Rating: R (sexuality, nudity, brief profanity) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/shakespeare.htm
The only historical figure that has been written about more than William
Shakespeare is Jesus Christ, which explains why the Bard's materials are
such a popular source for remakes, revisions, rewrites, inspiration,
subtlety, credit, and dispute. Indeed, in recent years, American
contemporary cinema has been swamped with a wash of Shakespearean
products. Including this year's upcoming A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM,
Shakespeare's material has been the cause for twenty-six big screen
productions since 1990. But for a change of pace, MRS. BROWN director
John Madden gives us a story of the Bard himself in the wonderfully
vibrant SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE. 
Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard's story is largely fantasy, although as the
viewer soon learns, SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE is not a movie that takes itself
seriously. (Will Shakespeare of the 1590's would've been married to Anne
Hathaway, and he would've had a teenage daughter and two young sons;
here he is a bachelor played by Joseph Fiennes.) Will is a writer
struggling to come up with a great play, and his current comedy in the
works -- "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter" -- just doesn't quite
seem right. With the help of the great writer Christopher Marlowe
(Rupert Everett), and the inspiration of true love with noblewoman Viola
De Lesseps (Gwyneth Paltrow), he changes things around and writes one of
his greatest tragedies, "Romeo and Juliet."
The love story between Will and Viola loosely parallels the story of
Romeo and Juliet, to great effect. Fiennes and Paltrow develop a sexy
chemistry as the two lovers which gives the movie much momentum; this
momentum smoothes out the bumps in the unfinished and largely
unsuccessful comedy. The supporting roles are well filled out, from
Geoffrey Rush as Will's worrisome agent, Philip, to Tom Wilkinson as the
producer Hugh Fennyman. Even Ben Affleck, leading the troupe of actors,
manages to make a favorable impression; and Judi Dench lends some brief
moments of screen time as Queen Elizabeth I. Gwyneth Paltrow is by far,
however, the standout of the lot, creating a large percentage of the
forementioned vibrance. 
The story is well-crafted if nothing else, although it has dangerous
moments where it flirts with the "let's make a movie"-genre. The
dialogue is breezy and lighthearted, and certainly accessible by the
audience's lowest common denominator. There's something for everyone in
this romantic comedy, making it prime date flick material. Although
certainly not inspiring in any regard, it revels in a wholesome,
well-rounded atmosphere that has been absent in many of 1998's pictures;
the true-love story is one of the best around. Certainly recommendable
when the traditional slew of indifferent year's-open releases is just
around the corner.

Title
Review for Go (1999)
Release Date: April 9, 1999
Starring: Katie Holmes, Sarah Polley, Jay Mohr, Scott Wolf, Desmond
Askew, Taye Diggs, William Fichtner, Nathan Bexton
Directed by: Doug Liman
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (strong drug content, sexuality, language, some violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/go.htm
Filmmakers will use all manner of tricks to flesh out and brighten up a
dull, dreary, and overused idea. Doug Liman (SWINGERS), director of the
ultra-hip and severely dark comedy GO, is an example of just such a
filmmaker. In his latest, he gives the viewers a raucous, neon-lit
backdrop as cinematographer and points the audience down a drug-infested
path of misadventure as director. But he fails to come up with any
parallel structure in his multi-tiered movie and he fails to connect
with the audience on any level, bringing the worth of his efforts to nil
and the value of GO to about the same. 
His movie is produced anthology-style -- telling the same story from
multiple (three) points of view, much as an author might write a serial
novel. Consistent with this ethic, Liman and screenwriter John August
provide a bit of an overlap at the beginning of each narrative and
insert brief connections to other narratives. The thread that laces the
three stories together is a drug deal and the events thereafter. In
story A we have checkout clerk Ronna (Sarah Polley) looking to score
some rent money and turning to drug trafficking to do it; in story B we
have regular drug dealer Simon (Desmond Askew) gone to Las Vegas giving
Ronna her opportunity; and in story C we have gay soap actors Zack (Jay
Mohr) and Adam (Scott Wolf) working undercover for the police to bust
said drug deal. 
Neither of the three stories have much substance, and the movie has the
feel of a campfire story (albeit a rather strange one) that could be
told in five to ten minutes. (In fact, the movie was originally a short
film entitled X expanded to feature length.) The early April release
date is too mistimed to capitalize on the movie's Christmas setting, and
the Los Angeles/Las Vegas nightlife is something too far from the
mainstream for most theater-goers to attach themselves to. The
characters are shallow to the point of prerequisite, and performances
from little-known players like Polley, Askew, and Taye Diggs don't help
or hurt the roles. In fact, even bigger names like Mohr, Wolf, and Katie
Holmes don't have enough time to make substantial success. 
Although that's almost expected for lack of continuous screen time, the
success in the picture should come from a thread that binds the stories.
GO doesn't have this, and it suffers because of it. As far as teen
movies are concerned, GO represents the absolute bottom, for its
constant stream of indecipherable light and sound mean nothing without
some sort of common theme. (The following do not count as common themes:
drug deals, people attempting to have romantic interludes with drug
dealers, people resorting to drug deals for alterior motives, or people
not involved in drug deals stumbling into them.) At times, the humor in
GO is sickly funny, and on a low night, almost watchable; but for the
majority of its running time and for most viewers, this movie will best
be left to teens at Blockbuster on a Saturday night. 

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
Release Date: October 16, 1998
Starring: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise,
Beah Richards
Directed by: Jonathan Demme
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violent images, sexuality, nudity) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/beloved.htm
It's possible to classify cinema based on literature as an entirely
seperate genre aside from action, comedy, drama, and the usual
categories. Those movies which are based on books are almost always a
testament to their source - the author wrote such a visually or mentally
outstanding novel that it begged to be brought to life on the screen -
but as cinema alone they are often disappointing ventures. The most
disappointing transplant within the last few years was James Patterson's
KISS THE GIRLS: although the novel was tense and a very exciting read,
the movie was lackluster and far from noteworthy. The latest product of
this movement, Toni Morrison's BELOVED, does not stoop to such levels,
but it is a rather disappointing movie. 
With all of the talent involved - both in front of the camera, behind
it, and in the script - BELOVED was almost a surefire lock for the
Oscars in March of next year. (It still may harbor such chances, as both
the Academy and several signifcant film writers tend to prefer deep but
cinematically boring films for their ballots.) It's directed by Jonathan
Demme, who won an Academy Award for his direction in SILENCE OF THE
LAMBS. The script is written by Akosua Busia, who wrote the energetic
segregation tale ROSEWOOD, and it's is based on the Pulitzer
Prize-winning novel by Toni Morrison. Finally, the two top-billed
actors, Oprah Winfrey and Danny Glover, have respectable if not
excellent track records in Hollywood. For all of these ingredients, a
very engaging motion picture experience is surely not unreasonable. 
The results are quite the opposite. BELOVED is a three-hour long movie
which lacks anything substantial to power it through such an unlikely
length. Demme and Busia have chosen faithfulness to the novel over basic
principles of filmmaking, and in doing so they deep-six any chances the
movie has for widespread appeal. Herein lies the story of Sethe
(Winfrey) an ex-slave living in post-Civil War Cincinnati. For her, the
year 1873 sees the arrival of friend from the past and soon-to-be-lover
Paul D (Glover). Although Sethe agrees with Paul D's presence in her
household, her daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise) does not. Not long after
Paul D comes to stay with Sethe and Denver do we see the entrance of
Beloved, a strange and sometimes horrific young woman who may or may not
be the reincarnation of a daughter Sethe once had. Sethe and Denver are
enchanted with her, but Paul D knows there's something not right and so
he departs for parts unknown while the plot escalates to its climax. 
And the climax cannot come soon enough. Both 1997 and 1998 have seen the
advent of several movies which push the envelope in terms of running
time, and only those films which have some sort of continual motion will
survive at such an extended duration. Anything which takes the better
part of three hours cannot simply rely on solid acting or tidbits of
tension, as in BELOVED. For therein lies the chief reason for the
disappointing outcome of the movie: although Winfrey and Glover give
outstanding performances, there is nothing here that we haven't seen
between AMISTAD and ROSEWOOD - and those were certainly more watchable
films. The only thing that BELOVED has going for it are the hints of a
ghost story, which, sadly, are dropped without realization very early in
the movie. Although some viewers may find this an outstanding and very
memorable film, it is not a mainstream product; and in the end, that is
what mars what might have been a truly fine movie.

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
Release Date: January 22, 1999
Starring: Emily Watson, Rachel Griffiths, David Morrissey, James Frain,
Charles Dance, Celia Imrie
Directed by: Anand Tucker
Distributed by: October Films
MPAA Rating: R (language, sexuality)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/hilary.htm 
Not since 1996's SHINE, which starred Geoffrey Rush as pianist David
Helfgott, has a movie so defiantly laid bare the lives of world-class
musicians. In fact, if one were to watch these films together, it would
almost certainly stand as a convincing argument that a life of music
naturally leads to all varieties of social ills. Yet HILARY AND JACKIE,
the sophomore effort from director Anand Tucker, has something more to
say -- it softly but strongly explores the complex relationships of
sibling rivalry and love in a very compelling tale. 
Emily Watson and Rachel Griffiths are the leads in this tale, playing
the sisters Du Pré. Both musicians from childhood, Hilary (Griffiths) is
renowned flutist while Jacqueline (Watson) is easily as skilled on the
cello. The two comepete for and win many honors as children and as young
women, both together and seperate. Their careers as musicians surpass
and then bow to one another's, and although their lives take very
different paths -- Hilary settles down to marriage and a family while
Rachel skips across the globe on a world concert tour -- they are bound
together by their deep family love. 
The performances of Watson and Griffiths are excellent in style and
substance. They contrast each other wonderfully, and while Watson's
portrayal of Jackie Du Pré is at times eccentric and perhaps
unsympathetic, both characters are charged with emotion. The Frank
Cottrell Boyce script, which is based on the book by Hilary and Piers Du
Pré, brings a great deal of depth to these characters as well. 
The script is also to be commended for its well-polished dual nature.
Cottrell Boyce adopts a style which one might expect to see in a mystery
thriller (which was in fact the case with David Koepp and Robert Towne's
script for MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE) and skillfully molds it to the story of
two rising musicians on different courses to fame. The latter parts of
his script are controversial to say the least, and the rather depressing
ending takes the wind out of an envigorating story. Some will leave this
movie feeling disenfranchised. Nevertheless, HILARY AND JACKIE is a
movie that reaches an upper echelon of contemporary cinema through solid
fundamentals and is a decent watch all around. 

Title
Review for Almost Heroes (1998)
Release Date: May 29, 1998
Starring: Chris Farley, Matthew Perry, Eugene Levy, Kevin Dunn, Lisa
Barbuscia, Bokeem Woodbine
Directed by: Christopher Guest
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (crude humor, nudity) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/almost.htm
Walking out of this movie, a friend mentioned to me that, although not
every comedy is great, they all have their 'moments.' This needed no
explanation, for the law of averages says that as long as you keep
trying, you're bound to succeed sometime. What's unfortunate, though, is
that the genuinely comical setups in ALMOST HEROES are so far and few
between that all of the remaing humor - as crass, crude, and obtrusive
as possible - makes the movie completely not worth the money. 
The foremost scapegoat for every failed comedy is the screenwriter, or
in this case the team of three responsible for this cinematic atrocity.
Mark Nutter, Tom Wolfe, and Boyd Hale, none of whom (save possibly
Nutter, who's had supporting roles in MICHAEL and TV's JAG) have any
experience in the motion picture industry and have penned no other
feature films, have drawn out a script that's painful to watch.
Literally painful as well, it's nothing more than a series of
half-hearted conversations which string together drug-induced
caricatures and non-sequitous physical comedy. You don't write much
worse than this. 
But even the worst of screenplays can be made to look plausible with an
inspired bit of acting. Unfortunately that's all the audience gets: bits
and pieces. The late Chris Farley plays Bartholomew Hunt, and Matthew
Perry is Leslie Edwards. Together, the two, along with a hodgepodge crew
of derelicts and invalids, are mounting a mission to go west before
Lewis and Clark do. Farley is outrageously comical, but in this setting
his enthusiasm is mistaken for scene-stealing, and he doesn't win much
audience appeal. Perry is downright obnoxious, and his character is so
unlikeable that he has no chance either. The rest of the crew are simply
stereotypes which were designed solely for the purpose of being the butt
of many jokes. 
This is the second movie of such low quality in a remarkably short
amount of time (after the earlier-in-May BLACK DOG). Maybe it says
something about the willingness of Hollywood to produce downright
unwatchable films, for the cinema is being increasingly saturated with
stale products such as ALMOST HEROES. This one can't be seen to light
under any setting, except for extremely enthusastic Farley fans. It
doesn't come near his other films in appeal or taste, and should be left
to wallow in the wake of more worthy, upcoming summer films.
FINAL AWARD FOR "ALMOST HEROES": 1.0 star - a poor movie.

Title
Review for Hush (1998)
Release Date: March 6, 1998
Starring: Gwyneth Paltrow, Johnathon Schaech, Jessica Lange, Nina Foch,
Hal Holbrook
Directed by: Jonathan Darby
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (some violence, sensuality, brief strong language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/hush.htm 
On an otherwise crowded movie weekend, with three other releases that
are surely more promising, HUSH has to hope for viewer curiosity to make
good on its terribly awry premise. Those who wander into this one will
do so certainly to see either the beautiful people - Gwyneth Paltrow
(GREAT EXPECTATIONS) for the guys and Johnathon Schaech (THAT THING YOU
DO!) for the girls - or to see the psychotic Jessica Lange (A THOUSAND
ACRES). But after word of mouth filters back to the rest of the American
public, the masses will learn that HUSH is nothing but a good idea that
never gets going. 
Schaech and Paltrow play Jackson and Helen, a couple hopelessly in love
(the two display appropriate amounts of chemistry, but this doesn't work
out too well later on). Within the first thirty minutes of the movie,
Jackson has taken Helen home to meet Mom (Lange), gotten her pregnant,
and proposed marriage to her. Upon her acceptance of his proposal, he
takes her back home to Mom to have the wedding at her place. However,
things don't go exactly as planned because Mom isn't your garden-variety
mother-in-law and her feelings toward Helen are less than accommodating.
The movie builds on the tensions between Mom and Helen, which takes
Helen through a series of increasingly dangerous encounters that climax
in a painful in-home birth of her baby followed up by Mom's malevolent
intents with a syringe full of morphine. 
This plot, which is both familiar ground and originality (with the new
cast), works only if viewers assumes certain things. First, the audience
has to assume that Lange, as the mother-in-law Martha, wants to kill
Helen only because she's possessive of her son. Second, the audience has
to assume that Jackson is dumb enough to be on his mother's side for the
entire movie and suddenly jump to Helen's defense after she spews about
fifteen seconds worth of hopeful arguments. Third, the audience has to
assume that only reason Helen and Jackson repeatedly return to Mom's
home is the fact that spending weeks of quality time on a back country,
multi-acre horse farm is an enticing ordeal. Fourth, and perhaps most
inconsequential, the audience has to assume that Gwyneth Paltrow can
drive a Ford Explorer over a bumpy horse pasture at blazing speeds when
she's at least eight months pregnant. 
Most of the characters have little or no audience likeability. Schaech,
as Jackson, is dumb as a doornail, while his mother, Lange, is the bitch
everyone wants to hate (fortunately, the scriptwriter made sure Mom gets
what's coming to her - HUSH would've been completely disappointing if
she hadn't). Paltrow is likeable as Helen, but that's only because she's
the victim of society in a cast that's filled with badly characterized
roles. But the most likeable is Nina Foch as Alice, Jackson's paternal
grandmother. She's the only one who openly insults the cunning Martha,
and when she befriends Helen, she can do no wrong. Unfortunately, one or
two good performances can't salvage a movie that's already headed in the
wrong direction. The entire thriller premise takes way too long to
develop and the movie ends before it goes anywhere. Wait until HUSH hits
the budget theaters.

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
Release Date: October 23, 1998
Starring: Kurt Russell, Jason Scott Lee, Connie Nielsen, Sean Pertwee,
Michael Chiklis, Gary Busey, Jason Isaacs
Directed by: Paul Anderson
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: R (strong violence, brief language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/soldier.htm
For those interested in the true spirit of moviemaking - or what's left
of it in mainstream Hollywood - movie which are star vehicles are
terrible things. As a rule, the ignore general principles of cinema
because they are not made to advance the media but rather to advance the
career of a particular actor. An actor might be chosen on the up-and-up,
to give him exposure; or he might be chosen on the way down to hand him
a paycheck. Generally, though, the actor doesn't matter, and SOLDIER,
the latest from the beleaguered Warner Brothers, exemplifies this: the
picture lacks pizazz. 
The star for the vehicle in this case is Kurt Russell, otherwise known
as the man of thirty words or less. Russell plays Todd, a human trained
from birth in the ways of waging war and becoming emotionally distanced
from the carnage he has wrought. The movie lets us see this degenerate
process, but by the time the real plot starts, we're into Todd's later
years. He's about to be replaced by a new breed of soldiers, ones who,
instead of being trained *from* birth, are genetically selected *before*
birth. The pride of this class - Caine 607 (Jason Scott Lee) - will be
our villain, and you know he's the villain because he has a staring
contest with our hero near the movie's start. 
Between the two leads, less than a full typed page of dialogue is
spoken, and it's possible to imagine a script which is ninety percent
stage direction. Director Paul Anderson, who helmed last year's icy
thriller, EVENT HORIZON, doesn't show any inventiveness here and instead
is content to let the actions play out on screen ad nauseam. Todd, upon
being replaced, is left to die on a garbage planet; but in order to
stretch the running time out, the villains return to the garbage planet
on a "routine patrol" and set the stage for the final firefight. Events
are predictable from the time that the setups are made, and neither
Anderson nor scriptwriter David Peoples attempts to show any
creativeness here. 
The most annoying plot facet is the reason that the whole of the movie
comes to be: Todd fails to show physical superiority against Caine - in
fact, not even Todd and two of his companions can best the baddie - but
near the end of the movie he shows remarkable prowess with automatic
weaponry. It's not as though Todd undergoes any significant character
changes throughout the plot of the story, and so the plot has a very
canned feeling about it. The best route through this disaster is to take
it lighthearted in spirit, and treat it as a parody of typical action
fare, like UNIVERSAL SOLDIER. A strict interpretation, however, reveals
an unmistakeable and unforgiveable lack of style, class, or substance;
and by next year, a large percentage of the people who have seen this
will have taped it off of network television.

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
Release Date: March 19, 1999
Starring: Guy Pearce, Robert Carlyle, Jeffrey Jones, John Spencer, Neal
McDonough, David Arquette, Stephen Spinella
Directed by: Antonia Bird
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Films Corp.
MPAA Rating: R (considerable gore, strong violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reveiws/1999/ravenous.htm
There's a certain taboo about the subject of cannibalism, and even those
most accustomed to eating red meat find thoughts of human flesh as
sustenance most disgusting. And so their ought to be something truly
frightening in Antonia Bird's latest film, RAVENOUS. Instead, the
director of 1994's PRIEST crafts a stylishly goofy film; a film that
manages to stumble through its running time without creating substantial
success or error. Largely, though, RAVENOUS is simply too extreme for
any mainstream audience. 
The story even starts out extreme. The audience meets John Boyd (Guy
Pearce), a US Army captain rewarded for bravery in the line of duty but
terribly squeamish. As it turns out, his supposed valor was nothing more
than luck, and as such he's sent to distant Fort Spencer, California,
where he'll be out of the Army's way. Fort Spencer is a prosperous way
station during the summer but a ghost town during the winter, and as
Boyd shows up on the eve of a great snowfall he meets the skeleton crew
assigned to the post during the down months. Headed up by a man named a
cynical nice guy named Hart (Jeffrey Jones), it seems the place is one
of tedium.
Far from it, in fact, as Boyd soon learns after half-dead stranger named
Colqhoun (Robert Carlyle) shows up. Colqhoun explains that he barely
escaped a cannibalistic disaster in the mountains above Fort Spencer,
and when his story is investigated the movie begins its twisted journey
into the nether regions of storytelling. 
The story is slim and the acting isn't much better. On the whole, the
story is told in a rather drab fashion and is executed poorly, drawing
no emotion other than a tinge of doubt from the audience. Attempts at
suspense or depth do not work, as when the story tries to play with
Colqhoun's background. His role is immediately obvious to the audience.
Similarly, the process of establishing Boyd's history is muddled, giving
us fragments of his story in seemingly random order; for instance, we
know he dislikes blood (or possibly red meat) but we don't know why. The
only part of the movie that does work is the comic relief, provided by
the soldiers positioned at Fort Spencer. Their tongue in cheek dialogue
goes a long way toward drawing the audience in, and unfortunately it
can't account for other missteps. 
The thriller RAVENOUS opens with a quote from Friedrich Nietzsche, and
for the next 100 minutes, that's about as serious as it gets. For all of
the spooky seriousness about cannibalism and rampant hunger, there's
very little in Antonia Bird's film that evokes prolonged consideration
of myth or superstition. Instead, the movie chooses to be something of a
dark comedy (very dark, indeed) and espouses true thrillerism only when
it suits the ends of shock value. There's nothing truly substantial in
RAVENOUS, and this may be a better video rental.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
Release Date: October 30, 1998
Starring: James Woods, Daniel Baldwin, Sheryl Lee, Thomas Ian Griffith,
Tim Guinee, Maximilian Schell
Directed by: John Carpenter
Distributed by: Columbia Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: R (strong vampire violence and gore, language, sexuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/vampires.htm
Vampire lore and legend has always been a popular fantasy element,
substantiated by not only the sheer number of movies about the subject,
but also the proliferation of cults and sects of adherents. And, unlike
any of the more outlandish myths, the vampire holds some real-world
probability (one study claims 1,000 bloodsuckers exist worldwide, and
places 50 in Los Angeles). But lest the nasties be mistaken for simple
comic book bad guys, John Carpenter would like to remind us that they
are - and always have been - a truly frightening element of the thriller
genre. And remind us he does in his latest film, VAMPIRES. 
There was some question, as Halloween weekend approached, of how well
VAMPIRES would do in comparison to New Line Cinema's immensely
successful BLADE, released in August. The two films take noticeably
different stands on the vampire issue, and don't even agree on some
basic points of the slaying method. (For instance, Blade's main weapons
are silver and garlic, whereas main character Jack Crow's technique is a
wooden stake to the heart.) BLADE also gives more of a face to the
vampire civilization, while Carpenter would like us to remain in the
dark about how the pasties operate. Both have their advantages, and
here, Carpenter's style lends itself to a darker breed of suspense
rather than the action movie that BLADE director Stephen Norrington
delievered. When it's all said and done, though, the vampires still kill
and die with a bloody flourish; the level for gore is indeed set to
maximum. 
This time, our hero is Vatican-sponsored slayer Jack Crow (James Woods).
He's a cynical, battle-worn veteran, and the best of his bunch. He and
his team are responsible for cleaning out the American Southwest, and
after exterminating a nest one night, they run up against a
super-vampire (termed a "master") named Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith).
Valek kills all of Jack's team except for his partner, Tony Montoya
(Daniel Baldwin), and as the two regroup, they learn that Valek is the
original vampire - now over six hundred years old. Apparently, Valek and
his minions have been sweeping the Southwest for decades in search of a
cross that will enable them to walk in the daytime. So with the aid of a
priest named Adam (Tim Guinee) and a bitten hooker (Sheryl Lee) as bait,
they track Valek down for the final confrontation. 
The script for VAMPIRES, written by Don Jakoby and based on the John
Steakley novel, is perhaps the wittiest piece of screenplay to see
production all year. Crow, in particular, is a fun source of one-liners,
and Woods does every one of them with perfect stoicism. Baldwin, Lee,
and Guinee are all fine supports, adding to the character pool, but the
other true highlight of the movie is Thomas Ian Griffith's bad guy.
Griffith's intense expression is perfect for the role, and the only
downside is that he's got to talk sometime. Luckily, he's got few lines,
and manages to pull off a rather thrilling performance. All said, fans
will surely be impressed by this picture, and those who found APT PUPIL
a bit limp will be excited by this one. Certainly a worthwhile visit to
the theaters.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
Release Date: March 5, 1999
Starring: Robert De Niro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow, Joe Viterelli,
Chazz Palminteri
Directed by: Harold Ramis
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: R (language, a scene of sexuality, some violence)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/analyze.htm 
Black comedies -- those movies which make light of serious and usually
morbid situations -- come in a number of different varieties, each with
their own levels of hilarity and cleverness. GROSSE POINTE BLANK is a
good example of a well-done black comedy: subtle, witty, and
straightforward. It moved quickly to keep expectations high, and it
ended up doing much better than expected. ANALYZE THIS, the latest for
this genre from CADDYSHACK helmer Harold Ramis, does not have these
elements perfected; instead, it's a lighter, breezier comedy of
outrageous situations. 
The outrageous situations are supposed to draw laughs in their own
right: mob boss seeks psychiatric help. But the premise lends itself to
very little thematically, causing the movie to fall into a repetitive
order. The leading names, Billy Crystal and Robert De Niro, add some
life to their roles but don't give them excessive dimension. 
De Niro is New York mobster Paul Vitti, head of one the many crime
families struggling for dominance in the area. After a lengthy monologue
which establishes his place in the crime scene, Vitti luckily avoids an
assassination attempt. Unfortunately his friend takes the bullet
instead, and Vitti is shaken by the affair. Having in his possession --
by a bizzare chain of circumstances -- the name of psychiatrist Ben
Sobol (Crystal), he seeks help and proceeds to drag the unwitting Sobol
into the comically portrayed mob life. 
This story is simple enough, and has moments of comic genius, most of
which are manifested by a Vitti henchman named Jelly (Joe Viterelli).
Unfortunately, most of the movie sees this character dragging
psychiatrist Sobol out of his life so he can "help" Vitti, and his
efforts are wasted. The movie does manage to break this pattern toward
the end of its running time, picking up steam with some great comedy
sequences from Billy Crystal. Even with a GODFATHER parody, though, the
movie never really manages to muster any true comedy. 
Instead, it plays out like to A-list actors goofing around. It's easy to
see that Crystal and De Niro are having fun, but the real question is
whether or not the audience is having fun. And in this case, the answer
is: not as much as they should have. 

Title
Review for Paulie (1998)
Release Date: April 17, 1998
Starring: Jay Mohr, Tony Shalhoub, Gena Rowlands, Cheech Marin, Bruce
Davison, Trini Alvarado, Hallie Kate Eisenberg
Directed by: John Roberts
Distributed by: DreamWorks Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (brief mild language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/paulie.htm
After a while, although probably inconspicuous to the target audience,
movies with animal protagonists gain a campy or hokey aura as a genre.
(It may be interesting to note that, for some reason, an animated animal
can talk and no one bats an eye; but if a live animal mouths anything
more than 'Polly want a cracker,' it becomes unrealistic and
unacceptable.) Perhaps it's the inability for a human audience over the
age of ten to root for a protagonist that isn't of the same species, or
perhaps it's the ability to more readily point out the shortcomings of a
film that has little respect for physical reality. Whatever the case,
Paulie has a tough audience to win over. 
Sure, most kids whose age has not yet broken double digits will want to
pay to see Paulie. What's not to like? The bird fires off jokes like an
assault weapon fires bullets: rapidly, but hardly with good aim. His
voice, done by Jay Mohr (Jerry Maguire), has that annoying little twang
to it that gives him his cocky air. The Jay Mohr we see onscreen,
similarly, plays a brainless petty thief named Benny. Benny uses the
intelligent bird to aid his career, but at the first sign of trouble,
abandons the creature to the ownership of a laboratory testing facility.
None of the characters show much smarts, including the kindly old Ivy
(two-time Academy Award nominee Gena Rowlands), and the only one to make
an intelligent decision is the good-hearted Misha (Tony Shalhoub).
Unfortunately, he's a janitor. Who likes janitors? 
The movie follows the life of Paulie, from his "birth" as a gift to the
child Marie (Hallie Kate Eisenberg) to his reunion with her (now played
by Trini Alvarado) a good many years later. (Should I have called a
spoiler there? Isn't it painfully obvious, in these movies, that the
animal always makes it back?) Although sold off by Marie's father (Matt
Craven) early on, Paulie survives on his own. Pawned off by a guitarist,
taken cross country by Ivy, hired by Ignacio (Cheech Marin) the taco
man, picked up by Benny, and finally given to Dr. Reingold (Bruce
Davison), Paulie comes to be locked away in the basement of the
laboratory, where he meets Misha. He tells the Russian janitor of his
life, and soon the man takes pity on him. 
You have to be in a Lassie Come Home sort of mood to see Paulie with any
sort of plausibility. Some of the jokes the parrot makes might be funny
to the adult crowd, but the maturity level isn't that high. This movie
is good as the product it's intended to be, and from a child's point of
view it's most likely highly entertaining. Unfortunately, I can't
comment with any expertise there, and so any outstanding qualities lose
value in the translation. Not recommendable, but good if there's nothing
else to see and you're dying to spend seven bucks.
FINAL AWARD FOR "PAULIE": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
Release Date: May 1, 1998
Starring: Denzel Washington, Ray Allen, Rosario Dawson, Milla Jovovich,
Hill Harper, Zelda Harris, Jennifer Esposito, Bill Nunn, Ned Beatty
Directed by: Spike Lee
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (sexuality, nudity, language, violence including a
beating) 
The genre of "basketball dramas" is indeed a narrow one, and very few
films fit the bill. Sports movies in general are hard to make, and most
gravitate towards family or comedy genres. It's good to see, then, that
Director Spike Lee has chosen to focus his movie away from the game
itself and towards the powerful character relationships that make this
movie the so very enjoyable product that it is. Here, basketball as a
sport is used only as an underlying and omnipresent motivation for the
entire cast, and the movie's players are stronger because of it. HE GOT
GAME is by far the most watchable, enjoyable, and well made film yet for
1998. 
The quandary that becomes the plot is an interesting one: Jake
Shuttlesworth (Denzel Washington) is a convicted murderer who is given a
mission from the state governor. If Jake can convince his son Jesus (Ray
Allen), the nation's number one high school basketball prospect, to play
for the guv's alma mater, then the governor will shorten Jake's sentence
considerably. Jake, who's looking at another fifteen years, jumps at the
chance - but it won't be easy for him. Jesus has already been scouted
and contacted by every major university with a basketball program, and
has even been offered a chance to skip college and make the jump
straight to a lucrative career in the pros. To top it off, Jake only has
a week until the deadline set by the NCAA for all athletes to declare
their intentions. 
As the movie progresses, Lee introduces a great deal of animosity
between Jake and Jesus, which only hinder's Jake's cause. Neither of the
two actors here are particularly strong, but they are realistic, which
makes their conflict believable and solid. The drama that plays out
between them becomes surprisingly deep and very dynamic: the movie
follows not one but two different stories that are very critical to each
other's believability. Lee masterfully helms the dual picture, creating
atmosphere by including some inspiring moments of photography (he uses
camera tricks similar to those in NIXON - varying speeds, angles,
lighting, and pacing). The picture is topped off by a fantastically
dynamic score, mixing the brass oriented strains of Aaron Copland's
music with the steady beat of Public Enemy. Written by Lee as well, the
script oscillates between moments of affable humor and solemn drama. 
The audience can get very in touch with this movie. Unlike most movies
which use the foregone edge of pop culture to seduce the teenage and
Generation X demographics, the existence of it in HE GOT GAME is so
inbred with the movie that it does not detract from the film's value.
Jesus, as he is being scouted, is drawn and repulsed by the moral
excesses of drugs, alcohol, sex, money, and other forms of materialism -
all illegal in some way. The movie touches on human emotions that are
deep in scope, as well as pop culture issues which are limited in
vision. HE GOT GAME is, as mentioned, a dynamic experience as well as
enjoyable and worthwhile one - and will most likely be among the top
films of 1998.
FINAL AWARD FOR "HE GOT GAME": 3.5 stars - a great movie.

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Release Date: February 5, 1999
Starring: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Gregg Henry, David Paymer, Deborah
Kara Unger, Kris Kristofferson, Lucy Alexis Liu, William Devane, James
Coburn
Directed by: Brian Helgeland
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (strong violence, language, drug and sexual content) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/payback.htm
In PAYBACK, Mel Gibson has the role of a surly, hulking badass named
Porter. Porter has a unique disposition: he's the bad guy we know and
hate caught in the main role. Already the red flags are going up in the
marketing department -- audiences'll never go for it; they need someone
more noble to cheer for. And what's this? By the end of the movie,
Porter's *still* a badass! Unacceptable. A successful antihero pic,
GROSSE POINTE BLANK had our hero character come full circle and pick up
some respectable virtues by movie's end. But not Porter. Nope. However,
maybe it *is* Porter's stubborn badassedness that helps save this movie. 
PAYBACK needs something to save it, because it doesn't always work.
Porter, essayed in fine form by Gibson, is a master bank robber who
specializes in payroll jobs -- taking large sums of money all at once.
Unfortunately, his partner (Gregg Henry) has double-crossed him, and run
off with Porter's half of their latest score: $70,000. Not only that,
but Porter's girlfriend (Deborah Kara Unger) was in on the double-cross.
So now Porter's got to follow a cold trail back to his money, through a
lethal syndicate of mob heads and crooked cops. 
It's when Porter gets on the trail back to his money that the movie runs
cold as well. Here it loses the upbeat tempo which is crucial to the
movie's sucess, and instead of providing snappy, guns-blazing action, it
lulls into unnecessary segments of development. This isn't good
filmmaking, especially when audiences expect to get a thrill ride.
Fortunately, the slower middle portion is bookended by a great opening
sequence and a nice finishing touch. 
The finishing touch is loaded with irony, and it's just a sampling of
the script's finer moments. Written by Brian Helgeland, who co-wrote the
award-winning script of L.A. CONFIDENTIAL, it includes a number of comic
moments that get the audience in the proper mood to forgive the movie's
slower moments. Helgeland, who makes his directorial debut here, chooses
to try and spice up these slow parts with excessive blood and gore, but
it largely desensitizes the viewer to Porter's mission. It does not
accomplish its task. 
The movie comes in at slightly above average for Mel Gibson's fine
performance in the lead role. He gives a sadistic credibility to Porter,
one that might elude actors of a lesser talent. The supports are all
serviceable, and they're not really asked to do a whole lot in a movie
like this. Largely, the pieces fit together; it's just an odd puzzle to
fit them into, and for this, PAYBACK is a questionable choice. Not to be
seen by the lighthearted movie-goer, it will run its course in the box
office and then reappear as an occasional bachelor party video rental. 

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Release Date: May 8, 1998
Starring: Morgan Freeman, Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa
Redgrave, James Cromwell, Mary McCormack
Directed by: Mimi Leder
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (intense disaster-related elements, brief language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/deep.htm
In 1997, it was impossible to mention the movie DANTE'S PEAK without
talking about VOLCANO shortly thereafter. The case might be much the
same for 1998, when movie going audiences will be subjected to the
"twin-vision" releases of DEEP IMPACT and later this year's ARMAGEDDON.
>From the release of the previews, it was obvious that the filmmakers
involved were sending their asteroid-threatens-Earth tales in different
directions. DEEP IMPACT, by far the more character-oriented tale of the
two, loses a lot of the momentum it might've had by struggling through a
muddled storyline; if anything, this cost it any chance it had to outdo
ARMAGEDDON. 
Usually, for disaster event movies, the plot begins a reasonable amount
of time prior to the cork-popping (whether that's a volcano exploding or
aliens attacking a la INDEPENDENCE DAY). Here, however, storytellers
Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin begin the movie a great deal of time
- almost a year, in terms of the movie's scope - before the event and
lead up to the two most exciting parts in the movie with convoluted
storylines. This lack of plot sense does not inspire confidence, and
soon the viewers are left to do nothing but anticipate the moment of
impact (which, thankfully, does arrive). 
DEEP IMPACT is really three stories in one, all of them mostly
independent but all of them connected by the common threat of the
asteroid's imminent collision with Earth. The first is of Leo Biederman
(Elijah Wood), a kid astronomer who first notes the asteroid almost a
year prior to its collision with Earth; the second is of Jenny Lerner
(Tea Leoni), an ambitious reporter for MSNBC who discovers the
government's contingency plans a few weeks before they become public
knowledge; and the third is of Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall), a
seasoned veteran of an astronaut who must lead a team to land on the
asteroid's surface and blow the rock apart with two nuclear bombs. 
The movie, for all its intricacy, would've made a better book than a
movie. Because there are three main plots, and several other minor ones
that give relationship, the movie ends up being much less solid then
hoped for. Directed by Mimi Leder, it has the same helter-skelter feel
of her last action thriller, THE PEACEMAKER. Here, however, her pacing
is worse: the plot lends itself to two incredible scenes of exciting
visuals strung together by lulled plot points for an even 120 minutes.
For all its worth as an "event" movie, DEEP IMPACT may be wide of the
mark, and in two months' time, we'll hope for ARMAGEDDON to fill the
void.
FINAL AWARD FOR "DEEP IMPACT": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
Release Date: October 23, 1998
Starring: Brad Renfro, Ian McKellen, David Schwimmer, Elias Koteas,
Bruce Davison, Ann Dowd, Joe Morton, Jan Tríska
Directed by: Brian Singer
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (scenes of strong violence, language, brief sexuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/aptpupil.htm
Movies that don't deliver are the worst kind. Like any method of
storytelling, the cinema follows a conventional pattern of events: an
expository period is followed by several consecutively more important
scenes which amount to a climax. The most important point of the film's
plot comes somewhere between the end of this rising action and the
climactic scenes themselves. It's at this pivotal moment when the script
ought to deliver the goods, and when it doesn't, it shows both lack of
scripting skills as well as a lackluster production squad. And APT
PUPIL, the latest thriller from THE USUAL SUSPECTS director Bryan
Singer, does not deliver the goods. 
The movie stars Brad Renfro (SLEEPERS) as Todd Bowden, a high schooler
at the head of his class. The current topic of discussion in his history
class is the Holocaust, and his interest leads him to investigate the
background of a hobbling old man on his block named Kurt Dussander (Ian
McKellen, THE SHADOW). With sleuthing skills and a bit of luck, he pins
Dussander as Nazi war criminal Arthur Denker, and confronts Denker with
this information. Rather than threatening to turn the man in, however,
Todd asks Denker to tell him stories of his experiences in the
concentration camps of Germany; and after Denker submits, these
narratives begin to have a decidedly negative effect on Todd's life.
That's when things all spiral toward the harrowing finish. 
The pacing is all wrong in APT PUPIL. It's based on the Stephen King
novella of the same name, from the collection called DIFFERENT SEASONS.
Although I haven't read it, I have no doubt that the source material was
a much more exciting thriller, as King is wont to write. In the movie,
however, too much of the plot and characterization is implicit. Todd
approaches Denker early on and seemingly without motive, and it's almost
impossible to believe the explanation Todd gives in these scenes (he's
fingerprinted and photographed Denker several times). There is also
relatively little time spent on the crux of the storyline: Denker's
horrific tales are the reason that Todd's life spins out of control and
makes the movie possible, but we only get bits and pieces of these.
Instead, Director Singer uses violent imagery for his shock value - and
loses much of the impact. 
Any criticism on the part of the characters themselves would be to
critique the novella rather than the movie, but even so, therein lies
one of the chief problems with the thrillerism. Neither of the two
headliners are good guys: as Denker, Ian McKellen gives us a pathetic
old man who has chronic flashbacks resulting in violence. Perhaps we
feel sorry for him, as the punkish Todd pushes him around, but that's
counterbalanced by his Nazi background. And, as for Renfro's Todd, he
*does* come off punkish, and instead of being a cat killed by curiosity,
he's just a sick teenager. Although both do well given the situation,
neither is impressive by any measure, and they're just one item in a
list of flaws. APT PUPIL is a spooky movie, but for nothing other than
shock value. Sure, if you don't believe in the existence of evil, you've
got a lot to learn - but you won't learn it here.

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
Release Date: November 6, 1998
Starring: Adam Sandler, Henry Winkler, Fairuza Balk, Kathy Bates, Jerry
Reed, Blake Clark, Larry Gilliard Jr.
Directed by: Frank Coraci
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (language, some crude sexual humor) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/waterboy.htm
You might argue that MAJOR LEAGUE started it this one, back in 1989,
spawning the misfit sports genre. The formula isn't unheard of: a bunch
of unlikelies suddenly find themselves in the middle of the league
championship and the media spotlight for the first time in an insanely
long amount of time. Or perhaps you'd argue that the real fuel for this
movie came from 1994's FORREST GUMP, a classic pearl of a movie about
those with less-than-average IQs finding the real hero inside of
themselves. But maybe you'd most like to argue that Adam Sandler - of
all people - could never do justice to either. 
You'd be right on all three accounts, because the latest from the people
that brought you THE WEDDING SINGER is a step down for Sandler and
company. Although the comic himself undoubtedly finds his newer role
more comfortable, he sacrifices a lot of charm and uniqueness simply to
play the buffoon. The producers won't mind - Sandler is in a league of
comics that can draw a sufficient box office minimum and often do more -
but Sandler himself is lacking the maturity that is necessary for him to
have an extended career in Hollywood. 
The cast is one big stereotype dictionary, and a lot of the supporting
roles add to the idiot humor. Sandler himself is the Forrest Gump town
idiot and experienced waterboy named Bobby Boucher. At 32 years old,
however, he's finding it hard to keep a job, and eventually winds up at
the degenerate South Central Lousiana State University. There, a
football coach named Klein (Henry Winkler) recognizes his newfound
waterboy as a tackling savant and immediately recruits him to play
linebacker. Although against his overprotective mother (Kathy Bates)'s
wishes, he's cheered on by his girlfriend Vicki (Fairuza Balk) and the
rest of the university as he leads the team to the conference
championship. 
Anything on the character side of this movie is taken straight from
FORREST GUMP - be it Bobby's mother, his girlfriend, or the friend in
Coach Klein. And everything else, on the football side, is MAJOR LEAGUE
redone for gridiron glory - the screwloose announcer, the drunken
cheerleading squad, and the two fans sitting in the bleachers. Neither
works particularly well in a Sandler movie - the humor isn't intelligent
enough for that - but between the two, enough of the movie manages to
come out above water. In all, there's a certain bottom line to Sandler
movies: if you've been out of college for a good while, you're never
going to get it. But for the adolescents, it's their night away from the
folks, and THE WATERBOY is worth the bucket of popcorn.

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Release Date: August 7, 1998
Starring: Nicolas Cage, Gary Sinise, Carla Gugino, John Heard, Stan
Shaw, Joel Fabiani
Directed by: Brian De Palma
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violence, language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/snake.htm 
The sort of post-Cold War espionage suspense that Brian De Palma
cultivated in MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE was a vivid brand, designed to excite
and engage. And for the most part, it worked. American moviegoers,
reluctant to accept the end of tensions with the former Soviet Union,
search for new shady characters on an internation scale. New neo-Nazi
states for our operatives to go sneaking into with gear that might well
be found on an episode of STAR TREK. Unfortunately for De Palma, the
energy and charisma of such settings are so far removed from an Atlantic
City casino-hotel, that SNAKE EYES never has a chance to be top-notch
suspense. 
De Palma, along with screenwriter David Koepp (both JURASSIC PARK
features), are heavy on the present-day sci-fi, and so its
understandable that they might attempt to sneak a bit of it into a
common murder mystery. In fact, it seems that everyone - cast and crew -
except for Nicolas Cage has it from that angle. Cage, on the other hand,
stubbornly plays policeman Rick Santoro as a man with a bit of change
and an addiction to gambling on fights. The good detective goes to the
heavyweight title fight, in the company of his friend, Commander Kevin
Dunn (Gary Sinise, who is sinister as ever), as well as the Secretary of
Defense. As the knockout punch whistles across the ring, though, so does
a killer's bullet - winging the woman next to Santoro and killing the
Secretary. Suddenly Santoro is sitting at a murder scene, surrounded by
14,000 suspects. 
With little or no work, Dunn finds the shooter and kills him in the
struggle. Santoro's not happy, though, for two reasons: the woman next
to him ran off too soon, and the supposedly KO'd boxer's head jerked up
at the sound of the shot. Santoro's ensuing detective work leads him to
find scandal in the ring and in the Department of Defense. The first of
the two might be a plausible path for the story to follow, because for
the first thirty minutes the hyped-crowd atmosphere surrounds the entire
thing. But instead, Koepp takes it a different direction, trying to
squeeze in a muddled and confusing plot about faulty test missiles and
their financial benefit to the casino's new owner. It's during the
revelation of this plot that the movie spins unreasonably far from its
opening path and loses quite a bit of the steam it had built up. 
Playing out on the screen, though, the movie looks and feels a lot
better than it sounds. De Palma chooses an interesting style of
photography, in which events coinciding play out side by side. This
gives SNAKE EYES a much more dynamic real-time feel that helps the
audience through the tangled-up plot. Finally, the second plotline - the
Department of Defense scandal - makes the murder mystery much deeper
than it has to be, causing the audience to become disinterested. This
disinterest runs deep enough so that by the time the ending comes - no
less than twice - everyone watching has lost appreciation for why the
characters are there or even what their motivations are. Overall, SNAKE
EYES' intent was in the right place, but was simply misled by adding too
many ingredients to what should have been a simple mix.
FINAL AWARD FOR "SNAKE EYES": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
Release Date: April 3, 1998
Starring: Bruce Willis, Alec Baldwin, Miko Hughes, Chi McBride, Kim
Dickens, Robert Stanton, Bodhi Elfman, Carrie Preston, Lindsay Ginter
Directed by: Harold Becker
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violence, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/mercury.htm
Bruce Willis' career as an actor, now in its eighteenth year, commands a
list of nearly forty titles. Add to that almost ten more titles which he
served on as a producer or a writer or various other crew roles, and
there is no denying the statement that Willis is very accomplished in
the motion picture industry. It's somewhat surprising to consider, then,
that the majority of his achievements have not moved beyond the limited
confines of action or thriller movies. While some have been benchmark
entertainment, like DIE HARD, PULP FICTION, and 12 MONKEYS, Willis'
flashes of brilliance do not counterbalance the many senseless movies
he's made. His newest star vehicle, MERCURY RISING, isn't as bland as
other work he's done, but it is a thriller doesn't achieve what genre
fans expect. 
Although primarily a thriller, MERCURY RISING has scenes where it wants
to be and fades into simple, guns-blazing action (scenes of Willis
running through a hospital come to mind). These tentative, cross-genre
steps cause the thriller component to lose value, because the intent of
a thriller is to build tension slowly but steadily. When a gunfight
errupts, its as though all of the tension built to that point has been
thrown onto the screen, and the movie has to start over. Genre fans, who
expect an edge-of-their-seats ride, or at the very least, constant
excitement, will be disappointed by the lulls as MERCURY RISING goes
through the cumbersome rebuilding process. Harold Becker, who last
directed the mediocre political thriller CITY HALL, gets the pacing down
by the end of the movie, although the his finale is somewhat
anticlimactic. 
As the principal, Bruce Willis is unconvincingly bland, although his
character is easy to stomach. He plays Art Jefferies, a special agent
with the FBI who, after striking a superior officer following a botched
hostage situation, is relegated to a missing-child case. Arriving at the
boy's house, he finds both parents shot dead and the child hiding away
in a closet. He attempts to get to know the kid, named Simon (Miko
Hughes), but this proves difficult as Simon is autistic. Unaware of the
world as most people see it, Simon's autism enables him to read and
decipher complex encryptions developed by the nation's most secretive
agencies. When he interprets the National Security Agency's newest
communications code, nicknamed Mercury, he encurs the wrath of the
division head, Nicholas Kudrow (Alec Baldwin). Only Art (of course) goes
with his gut feeling and helps the kid out. 
Both Willis and Baldwin turn in fairly credible performances, and while
this was one of Willis' more likeable roles over his past efforts (THE
JACKAL, THE FIFTH ELEMENT), Baldwin lacks the sinister sliminess that
has pervaded his other antagonistic roles. His gravelly voice makes up
for some of it, but his lack of screen time means he can't lend the
gravity that he did in THE EDGE or THE JUROR. Miko Hughes is the most
outstanding actor here, with a stunning portrayal of an autistic boy
that lends realism to Willis' character. The acting overall is bearable,
but it's present in a genre that doesn't demand it. The movie doesn't
deal with its genre well enough to receive full credit, though, and
MERCURY RISING is watchable by anyone who doesn't demand perfection. 
FINAL AWARD FOR "MERCURY RISING": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Release Date: July 24, 1998
Starring: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward J. Burns, Jeremy Davies, Matt
Damon, Dennis Farina, Ted Danson, Harve Presnell
Directed by: Steven Spielberg
Distributed by: DreamWorks Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (intense prolonged realistically graphic sequences of war
violence, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/saving.htm
It's a dismal day on the northwestern coast of France: the skies are
heavily overcast, the seas are choppy, the winds are high. At the Dog
Green sector of Omaha Beach, things are particularly gruesome: tens of
thousands of American infantrymen push relentlessly toward the sand in
troop transports. Then the army of boats land, and the ramps drop, and
there's a split second where everyone gets their first look at France.
Then the German gunners fill the air with rifle fire and troops are cut
down by the hundreds - some before taking their first step. Others are
killed on the beaches, or in the water, but eventually - if only by
sheer numbers - the Allied invasion force at Normandy wins the day and
gets a small foothold in Nazi France. 
Such is the opening scene in Steven Spielberg's latest epic masterpiece,
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, a scene which some thought might have earned the
movie an NC-17 classification if the movie had been directed by any
other man. Such claims are not far off base, in the sense that Spielberg
incorporates an awesomely stunning amount of realism into his latest
product. The intense violence, largely concentrated to the first twenty
or thirty minutes, is a no-holds-barred look at the Great War. Men die
explicitly and and in utter chaos. At first glance, it would be easy to
earmark such a crass depiction as nothing but gratuitous violence. But
after only moments of viewing, Spielberg does the near-impossible. He
puts every member of the audience there at Dog Green on June 6, 1944. 
Even after the opening-scene slaughter, everything remains authentic.
Mid-forties jargon, olive green uniforms, bulky grey helmets, original
automatic weapons, and more are all replicated in stunning detail and
attention to realism. On those terms, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is to World
War II what TITANIC was to its namesake oceanliner. If there's anything
about the movie that Spielberg does the most, it's in creating an
authentic, believable, and complete atmosphere for the story. Tramping
around the French countryside night and day, everyone watching is in a
complete sense of awe at the time travel they have just undergone. This
benchmark statement of set and production design is accented and
furthered by the acting corps. 
Tom Hanks (THAT THING YOU DO!), Tom Sizemore (THE RELIC), and Ed Burns
(SHE'S THE ONE) are the lead players in a squad of US Army Rangers with
the mission of locating Private James Ryan. Ryan has three brothers, all
of whom have already been killed, and the War Department, fearing a
scandal, gives Captain Miller (Hanks) and his team the job of finding
the remaining Ryan. Each and every member of the team is believable and
solid in nature, as the joke, laugh, cry, and suffer through war and its
facilities. Hanks is not outstanding but is wonderful as ever, exuding
an aura that only comes from a man who has two successive Best Actor
nominations. His lead is essential in this movie, and contributes
greatly to making SAVING PRIVATE RYAN Spielberg's finest film since
SCHINDLER'S LIST. In comparison to his last feature, AMISTAD, Spielberg
exchanges a more colorful set for a more action-filled script; this
works out for the better with a 170-minute running time. All-in-all, the
definitive must-see feature of the summer, and possibly the year.
FINAL AWARD FOR "SAVING PRIVATE RYAN": 4.0 stars - an excellent movie.

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
Release Date: March 20, 1998
Starring: John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Adrian Lester, Billy Bob
Thornton, Maura Tierney, Kathy Bates, Larry Hagman
Directed by: Mike Nichols
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (strong language, sexual references) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/primary.htm
It's hard to imagine that a movie with a cast so powerful and a theme so
poignant could fall so short of the mark. It's interesting to note that
the A-list cast may be all that keeps this political drama from sinking
into the murky waters of near-obscurity. There's a scene in PRIMARY
COLORS where five or six grown men and women all hug each other around a
plate of barbecued ribs and sing "You Are My Sunshine," and although the
scene is laughable in context, nobody ever stops to think that the
situation is horribly outrageous. Why? Because among the makeshift
chorus are John Travolta, Emma Thompson, and Billy Bob Thornton. Those
three alone have the power and tenacity on screen to turn a silly
sing-along into a fantastic character-building sequence. And perhaps
that's the film's best quality: the character of the cast, from the
leads to the supports. 
There's a somewhat-definite line drawn between the two or three lead
roles and the dozens of supporting actors and actresses. The leads,
Governor Jack Stanton (Travolta) and his wife Susan (Thompson), are
clearly the most serious of the lot. Other main characters, like Henry
Burton (Adrian Lester), Daisy Green (Maura Tierney), and Richard Jemmons
(Thornton) are the buffer between the seriousness of the Stantons and
the hazy stereotypes of the rest of the cast. Finally, on the opposite
end of the spectrum, are the numerous two-bit roles that are written off
as hilariously abnormal parts. The range of the cast knows no bounds:
they are the butt of countless racist, sexist, anti-Semetic, and
homophobic jokes, and they are the funniest butt you will ever see.
There is no word in the English language to describe them. 
But the story that all of these characters have to follow is based on a
novel that is not well written. PRIMARY COLORS, the novel by Anonymous,
was good as an infomercial on the business of running a Presidential
campaign, but as a story its entertainment value was nil. The movie,
which stays very faithful to its in-print basis, is simply the story of
a virtually unknown governor from an small, unnamed Southern state who
runs for President. Of course, everything the story resembles Bill
Clinton's 1990-91 campaign, but that's quietly brushed off to the side
as mere happenstance. While that may be the media's official line, it's
hard to dismiss John Travolta's salt-and-pepper hair color or his
sweet-as-molasses Southern lilt as happenstance. Emma Thompson, too,
lives up to the fierce political advocate of the current First Lady,
although she doesn't come as close as the book's version.
This movie is not the most powerful motion picture you will see this
year. Its running time of 140 minutes is on the long end of watchable,
especially when the story isn't that interesting and Director Mike
Nichols does not do anything to spice it up. There is no powerful music,
no skillful photography, and no well-written script. This may be a
textbook example of a book's transition into film, but it is not a
thoroughly entertaining film. When the only recent comparison is WAG THE
DOG, which was a better product, I hesitate to say that this is a good
movie. Nevertheless, it may be worth watching for curiosity alone. The
bottom line is that this film's value will be based on viewer merit.
FINAL AWARD FOR "PRIMARY COLORS": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
Release Date: June 5, 1998
Starring: Michael Douglas, Gwyneth Paltrow, Viggo Mortensen, David
Suchet, Sarita Choudhury
Directed by: Andrew Davis
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: R (violence, sexuality, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/perfect.htm
The suspense genre, which has been decidedly absent of quality movies
since last year's THE GAME, comes back to life here in a thrilling
recreation of Alfred Hitchcock's DIAL M FOR MURDER. It is to some degree
of wonder that Michael Douglas, who had the lead role in the 1997
thriller, comes back to command the genre again. Whether it's his
involvement, or the able direction of Andrew Davis (THE FUGITIVE),
there's a lot about A PERFECT MURDER that goes right, making this movie
a top-of-the-line suspense thriller. 
Michael Douglas is once again a successful businessman, this time named
Steven Taylor. He's got a trophy wife, Emily Bradford (Gwyneth Paltrow,
Great Expectations), who works for the United Nations. Unfortunately for
Steven, though, Emily has an artist lover named David Shaw (Viggo
Mortensen, G.I. Jane). Once Steven finds out, though, it's no big deal -
under the guise of looking to buy some art pieces, he travels to David's
downtown loft and confronts him about it. Ultimately, he makes David -
an almost penniless man - an offer he can't refuse: five hundred
thousand dollars to kill his wife. 
The movie takes off from there as an intense character battle between
three different characters. Steven, icily intense and incredibly wild,
is easily the best of the three, done by Michael Douglas in outstanding
fashion. David and Emily both pale in comparison, although David is
slightly better simply for the devil-may-care attitude that Viggo
Mortensen brings to him. Finally, Gwyneth Paltrow does the least amount
of truly suspenseful acting; her character is left to walk around like a
doe in a shooting gallery. What makes the conflict even more exciting is
the fact that both Steven and Emily also have financial gains to make:
Steven's a lucrative businessman, so obviously he's loaded, and Emily
has one hundred million dollars in inheritance that lands in the lap of
whatever man she dies while married to. As Sarita Choudhury (playing
Raquel, Emily's friend) says in the movie, "Money is the oldest reason
in the world to kill someone." 
The music is also in fine form here, scored by James Newton Howard. It
picks up and moves to a crescendo to emphasize character emotions, and
in general increases the suspense level by several notches. This is more
than adaquate proof of Andrew Davis' skill at directing a suspense film;
but also of note are the way he combines the script with cinematography
to provide a sensationally tense atmosphere. A PERFECT MURDER may not
fare well in the box office against more flamboyant summer films, but it
is a truly enjoyable film throughout and a definite must-see. Suspense
fans, this one's for you.
FINAL AWARD FOR "A PERFECT MURDER": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Release Date: January 8, 1999
Starring: John Travolta, Robert Duvall, Tony Shalhoub, William H. Macy,
Kathleen Quinlan, Bruce Norris, John Lithgow
Directed by: Steve Zaillian
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (some strong language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/civilact.htm
Courtroom drama is an overrated genre. Flashy images often come to mind
at the mention of such a setting -- Tom Cruise grilling Jack Nicholson
on the stand in A FEW GOOD MEN -- which are often followed by powerful,
moving images -- Gregory Peck's majestic voice in TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD.
But after a true count, the courts have given reason for a number of
shoddy products that lack substance and are filled with gimmick. THE
RAINMAKER, for example, featured the hotshot, know-it-all character
played by Danny De Vito: it was fresh, but unoriginal. Perhaps this
history, then, is the reason that Steve Zaillian's latest film, A CIVIL
ACTION, is a rewarding experience. 
There's nothing gimmicky about Zaillian's sophomore effort (his debut
film was 1993's SEARCHING FOR BOBBY FISCHER). Everything is a cold
reality, from the cutting-block calculus of personal injury law (John
Travolta explains in a series of voice-overs the relative worth of
different clients and concludes that a child is worth the least of all)
to the admitted lack of justice in the court system. Gone is the Perry
Mason-style grandeur, and with it the delivery of great orations.
Instead, a large percentage of the movie's running time does *not* take
place in a courtroom but in the real world of depositions and field
work. 
Travolta is our star, playing real-life lawyer Jan Schlichtmann.
(Indeed, all of Zaillian's script is based on a true story, as told in
Jonathan Harr's book.) Jan is well-dressed and successful, named in a
magazine as one of Boston's ten most eligible bachelors. Perhaps
unfortunately for Jan, he happens upon the Woburn drinking water case,
brought to his attention by Woburn resident Anne Anderson (Kathleen
Quinlan). As it happens there's a large number of leukemia deaths in
Woburn, which Anderson and other town parents believe is related to the
drinking water. Jan traces the water back to its source, where he finds
-- mostly by serendipity -- a tannery which has been illicitly draining
waterproofing chemicals into the town's water supply. Now all Jan has to
do is prove it in court. 
Seemingly against his own advice, Jan becomes emotionally entrenched in
his own case. He carries on his crusade longer than his partners advise,
to the delight of his auspicious adversary, Jerome Facher (Robert
Duvall). It's here that the actors shine: Travolta and Duvall, in the
leading roles, carry on a solid competition; Travolta in particular is
much recovered from previously bland outings like PRIMARY COLORS and MAD
CITY. The supports are also sturdy as well -- William Macy as Jan's
financial advisor is the best. Kathleen Quinlan's performance is a bit
of a disappointment, but aside from that it's hard to find fault with
this picture. Some might find it a bit slow or a bit long, but overall A
CIVIL ACTION is a well-written, well-directed product that has hit its
mark.

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
Release Date: March 31, 1999
Starring: Heath Ledger, Julia Stiles, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Larisa
Oleynik, Andrew Keegan, David Krumholtz, Larry Miller
Directed by: Gil Junger
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (crude sex-related humor and dialogue and alcohol and
drug-related scenes all involving teens) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/10things.htm
Good ol' William Shakespeare. Ya gotta give the guy credit. 
First, he's an awfully prolific writer, turning out more performances
than Mel Brooks. Second, he writes romantic poetry that is the envy of
any man who's ever wooed a woman. (And we're not talking about any old
"one fish two fish red fish blue fish" junk; we're talking about sonnets
the length of a Bible that nobody understands but everyone pretends to.)
And third, people still read his stuff today, and, on the outside, they
make a couple movies about it now and then. 
The latest of these is an adaptation of the Bard's romantic comedy, THE
TAMING OF THE SHREW, otherwise known as veteran TV director Gil Junger's
10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU. Interestingly enough, the movie has a
twofold purpose, which hints at an intelligence not normally found in
teen comedies such as this. First, Junger's film begs to be stood
against Shakespearean movies which display a mastery of the English
language and use to inspire laughter, tears, and thought. Second,
Junger's film begs to be stood against the trite genre of the teen
romance, which boasts unworthy competition like SHE'S ALL THAT and ROMEO
+ JULIET. In both respects, the movie makes great strides. 
In regards to the first of the two marks, the script is written not only
intelligently and articulately, but also with a story to tell. The Karen
Lutz and Kirsten Smith script takes a straightforward romantic idea --
girl can't date unless undesireable sister does, boy interested in girl
hires other boy to date sister, other boy and sister fall in love -- and
front-loads it with clever English. Unlike 1996's ROMEO + JULIET,
however, the movie does not distract with such poetic dialogue; instead,
it adds to the movie's value as a witty comedy. And wit is most
definitely the best way to present a teen romance. 
The teen romance -- the second of the two areas for 10 THINGS to cover
-- is also better than usual. Our boy Cameron (Joseph Gordon-Levitt,
who's really a wimp for most of the movie) is interested in the lovely
Bianca Stratford (Larisa Oleynik), but Bianca can't date unless her
less-than-desireable sister Kat (Julia Stiles) does. So Cameron, with
the help of his friend Michael (David Krumholtz), goes about hiring a
date for Kat. They succeed in getting outcast Patrick Verona (Heath
Legder), and thus the plot is in motion. The plot itself does not make
the movie succeed, but instead, the fresh approach does. New faces
outweight the clichés (like the oily KARATE KID-esque villain or the
predictable falling-out between Kat and Patrick), and almost every actor
present has talent. 
So 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU succeeds at both of the paths it tries,
and for this it's a most welcome entry into contemporary cinema.
Definitely a worthwhile flick, and definitely the best date flick of the
year thus far. 

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
Release Date: March 13, 1998
Starring: Leonardo DiCaprio, Jeremy Irons, John Malkovich, Gerard
Depardieu, Gabriel Byrne, Anne
Parillaud, Judith Godreche, Peter Sarsgaard
Directed by: Randall Wallace
Distributed by: Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sequences of violence, some sensuality/nudity) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/manironmask.htm
It's always interesting to watch a film in which several A-list actors
have been thrown into the fold with each other. Conflicting acting
styles are modified (sometimes) to give interesting and fresh
perspectives (sometimes) on actors we've known for quite some time. A
successful meshing of talent like this is one of the brightest things
about THE MAN IN THE IRON MASK, the cinematic rendition of the third
episode in Alexandre Dumas' THREE MUSKATEERS trilogy. Unfortunately, a
lot of the talent incorporated into IRON MASK is not in the limelight
for a good portion of the movie, and so the finished product is a bit
muddled. So is the A-list cast the only thing that makes IRON MASK
worth watching? 
Trying to pass THE MAN IN THE IRON MASK off as a heavyweight period
costume drama is like trying to pass a Geo Metro off as a muscle car.
Director Randall Wallace, who wrote the script for Braveheart and also
wrote the script here, rushes his drama through its opening moments. He
doesn't take advantage of the initial screen time to build the
atmosphere of a famine-wrought Paris on the edge of revolution, and the
sets that he constructs and fills with extras do not have a very
Renaissance feel about them. Without atmosphere, the movie has a hard
time conveying the characters' motivations and a lot of great characters
are therefore unfortunately left empty. 
The plot itself is relatively simple. In the late 1600s, King Louis XIV
(Leonardo DiCaprio) sits on the throne of France, although his country
is in shambles. Aided by D'Artagnan (Gabriel Byerne), he shows no signs
of improving, although D'Artagnan hopes for the better. Louis has also
earned the hatred of several of his Muskateers (now retired), including
Athos, Porthos, and Aramis (John Malkovich, Gerard Depardieu, and Jeremy
Irons). The three conspire to replace the king with his twin brother
Phillippe (also DiCaprio), who is locked up at the Bastille. They spirit
the young lad out of prison, teach him the ways of royalty, and make the
switch during a costume party, but the wily D'Artagnan notices and soon
things are headed for the worse. 
DiCaprio's double role does not necessarily make him twice as good.
Although his characters are so far apart that it almost seems like there
are two different actors, his arrogance for Louis is stale and his
innocence for Phillippe is too cute for the character's good. DiCaprio
did much better in TITANIC. The Three Muskateers and D'Artagnan are the
best, but Wallace has written them off to the side until the end and
does not take full advantage of their characters: the straightforward
Malkovich, the buffoonish Depardieu, and the contemplative Irons are all
fine performances. Byrne as D'Artagnan isn't as good, but only because
he takes the side of the evil Louis. Overall, it's obvious that
lightning doesn't strike the same place twice, both for DiCaprio and
Randall Wallace. IRON MASK is missable for better fare.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE MAN IN THE IRON MASK": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
Release Date: September 18, 1998
Starring: Jackie Chan, Chris Tucker, Tom Wilkinson, Elizabeth Pena, Tzi
Ma, Julia Hsu
Directed by: Brett Ratner
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sequences of action/violence and shootings,
language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/rushhour.htm 
It's no secret in the motion picture industry that the relationship
between a script and the actors involved often makes or breaks a movie
at the box office. A poorly-written script can be bested by a superb
acting corps, and a well-written piece can be mangled by a group of
amateurs. In directing his latest action-comedy, Director Brett Ratner
(MONEY TALKS) takes a relatively mediocre piece of standup comedy and
turns it into a funny as all get-out buddy cop movie. In addition, RUSH
HOUR serves as a first-class example of directing a movie with
conservative attitude - a feature that is sure to draw in crowds of all
types. 
The two lead names share equal screen time here, mostly because they
spend it together. Jackie Chan, in his first completely American
production, makes an impressive debut by mixing dialogue with martial
arts. The other martial arts flick from a few weeks ago, KNOCK OFF,
stands no chance against the content of this one. Chan manages to make
every fight scene exude grace and poise, and there's no doubt that a
large percentage of video sales for this movie will come from viewers
who couldn't believe their eyes the first time. Chris Tucker, on the
opposite side, relates a hilarious comedic approach which smoothes out
the rough edges to Chan's performance. He works perfectly with the
script, and it's quite likely he lent scribe Jim Kouf a hand with some
of his lines. 
Almost essential to the action genre, the plot is nonexistent. We're
quickly introduced to Detective James Carter (Tucker) is a maverick
officer for the LAPD. Cut forward to another scene where the daughter
(Julia Hsu) of the American Chinese Consul (Tzi Ma) is kidnapped by a
gang of swarthy characters. The FBI is quick to the rescue, but the
consul insists that one of his men, Detective Inspector Lee (Chan), be
brought on the case to help. The FBI resists, but then requests that
LAPD send a man over to babysit the Chinese detective. It's here that
Carter and Lee hook up, and the two unwittingly solve the case while the
FBI rushes in to back them up. 
Rattner does a fine job of going the extra mile to get his movie to move
a step up, but it doesn't quite reach the top tier of action-comedies
like last year's GROSSE POINTE BLANK. There are moments where the plot
strays too far off the straight line it sticks almost exclusively to,
and if not for the comedic interactions between Tucker and Chan, this
might be a major drawback. Also, some supporting characters are almost
entirely along for the ride, and others are there simply to look
menacing. However, none gives a standoffish performance and they mostly
mesh into the background. Almost every member of the cast displays some
reservation at one point or another - whether it's Tucker's toned-down
routine or Chan's tight rein on his action sequences - and that
contributes greatly to this being a watchable movie for all types. A
recommendable visit to the theater, indeed.

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
Release Date: March 19, 1999
Starring: Clint Eastwood, James Woods, Denis Leary, Isaiah Washington,
Diane Venora, Sydney Poitier, Mary McCormack
Directed by: Clint Eastwood
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: R (language, some violence)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/truecrime.htm
Clint Eastwood never changes. He does not age in a linear fashion, as
most men do, but instead on some radical quadratic curve. On the screen,
he's always been and always will be a dog. Cultivating a
rough-on-the-edges, heart-of-gold personality, he knows no other ground.
And this recycled demeanor is only the beginning of an atmosphere of
déjŕ vu that surrounds Eastwood's latest crime drama, TRUE CRIME. 
TRUE CRIME is a mystery of sorts, and its primary setting is the death
row cellblock of San Quentin. This is familiar ground for most viewers,
as Hollywood cameras have been in and out of prisons on countless
occasions. John Grisham films in particular are regular introspectives
into the lives of the men and women on both sides of the bars. The
mystery surrounds a wrongfully convicted man and a race against his
midnight execution date, which is another familiar story for movie
watchers. Toss in the typical character finds of the washed-up ex-drunk,
the boss looking for an excuse to can him, the wife looking for an
excuse to leave him, and the occasional companion who still wants to
trust him, and TRUE CRIME is looking like a painfully familiar movie. 
Specifically, Eastwood gives us, step-by-step, the final day of Frank
Beachum (Isaiah Washington). Beachum has been convicted in the shooting
death of a convenience store clerk; Steve Everett (Eastwood), a reporter
assigned to the incident only in the last twenty-four hours, smells
something wrong and decides to investigate. Everett is famous for his
"hunches," and his boss (Denis Leary) warns him several times not to go
looking for anything but a simple human interest sidebar story.
Nevertheless, Everett starts his own investigation, if only to save his
own career. 
In the end, however, it's Eastwood's adventurous direction that saves
this movie from being a case study in recycled film. The ancient
entertainer is easily more skilled behind the camera now than he is in
front of it, and once past his seedy character stereotype his fluent
direction is easily visible. Although the movie is a bit longish,
Eastwood has a very determined style of filmmaking, keeping the movie
straight from start to finish. Plot twists are nicely contained, and the
movie never once spins out of control. 
The supports also help to keep this movie above water. James Woods and
Denis Leary are outstanding, providing the movie's comic relief against
Eastwood's boring stoicism. Isaiah Washington, as the condemned man of
the lot, gives a very subdued performance here, which conveys a much
greater sense of power. 
The only flaws to be found in TRUE CRIME are its gravitation toward the
familiar and its mass of forced emoting. Neither of these help what
could have been a truly provocative motion picture, in the way that DEAD
MAN WALKING was. Instead, it's just another mediocre product of only
relative worth. 

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
Release Date: May 15, 1998
Starring: Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Sam Neill, Scarlett
Johansson, Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper, Cherry Jones, Catherine Bosworth
Directed by: Robert Redford
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (a disturbing accident scene) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/horse.htm
If there's anything THE HORSE WHISPERER says very well, it's what it has
to say about personality, and consequently, characterization. The three
or four main characters in the drama, and the ten or so more that are
significant supports, are very solid and very believable. And although
that should be a given in most movies, it is almost thankfully so in
this new Robert Redford film, a painstakingly thorough and mostly
powerful motion picture. It's been hailed as the best movie of 1998 thus
far, and although it may not warrant itself that award, it is definitely
among the top three movies yet. 
Redford directs himself for the first time in his thirty-six year career
as an actor, and the results are somewhat muddled. His skills as both a
director (ORDINARY PEOPLE) and an actor (OUT OF AFRICA) are excellent,
but he loses some of his touch when devoting his energies to both
positions on the set. Fortunately, the rest of his cast really picks him
up, and in the end makes him seem better than he really is. Kristin
Scott Thomas (THE ENGLISH PATIENT), Sam Neill (JURASSIC PARK), and
Scarlett Johansson (MANNY & LO) all enforce the movie's solidity and
concrete characterization. Believable as everyone is, though, the entire
cast seems to lack an extra edge or push that would grant them any
noteability. No one in the cast astounds or amazes (with the possible
exception of Johansson, whose portrayal of a crippled girl is akin to
Leonardo DiCaprio's portrayal of a mentally retarded boy in WHAT'S
EATING GILBERT GRAPE), and thus the intense character issues are
somewhat bland. 
The movie begins with Grace (Johansson) and her friend Judith (Catherine
Bosworth) out for a horse ride on a winter morning. Tragically, though,
their horses slip on icy ground, onto a road andinto the path of an
oncoming truck. The collision kills Judith and renders Grace minus her
right leg, which severly traumatizes the girl as well as her horse.
Annie (Scott Thomas), her mother, in her search for anything to help the
girl, chances upon the name of Tom Booker (Redford), a rancher with a
gift for helping horses. For lack of anything better, Annie leaves her
husband Robert (Neill) behind and takes Grace and the troubled steed out
to Montana to meet Tom and see if he can help them at all. It's from
here on, throughout the last three-quarters of the movie, that best part
of THE HORSE WHISPERER is clearly evident. The photography of Montana -
the impregnable mountains, the wide open skies, and the rolling hills -
is simply amazing. This movie may certainly garner an Academy Award
nomination in this respect. 
THE HORSE WHISPERER isn't for the uncomitted viewer. It runs almost
three hours in length, and doesn't include a continual excitement factor
in movies of similar length, such as Titanic or The Postman. Rather, it
relies on important character relationships and the inklings of intense
melodrama to keep an anticipatedly intelligent audience very interested.
This strategy works - most of the time - as those watching become bent
on learning just how Tom Booker will help the horse, or how Annie will
deal with her new position in life. Other than its lack of sheer
panache, there's nothing wrong with THE HORSE WHISPERER; this is quite
possibly the best three-star movie I've ever seen.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE HORSE WHISPERER": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
Release Date: October 23, 1998
Starring: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giustino Durano, Sergio
Bini Bustric, Horst Bucholz
Directed by: Roberto Benigni
Distributed by: Miramax Films
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (holocaust-related thematic elements) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/lifeisbeaut.htm
The love for family is one of the strongest driving forces in any man's
life, especially for those who have fostered their family under
precarious circumstances. Thematically in cinema, love for family has
been used frequently and emphatically to highlight more abstract aspects
of characters; it is rare, however, for it to develop as outstandingly
as it does in Roberto Benigni's neo-classic drama, LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL.
Through a central cast of father, mother, and son, Benigni demonstrates
the wonderful, undying love that a family shares in the best of times
and the worst of times. 
Life *is* beautiful for Guido Orefice (Roberto Benigni, directing
himself here for the sixth time in his career), an Italian Jew, master
con man, and aspiring waiter extraordinaire. Living in 1930's Italy, he
lives a carefree life of good fortune; it is made even better when he
happens upon a pretty schoolteacher named Dora (Nicoletta Braschi).
Although Dora is already engaged, Guido manages to sweep her off her
feet and persuades her to marry him instead; the two have a child named
Joshua (Giorgio Cantarini). Unfortunately for the happy family, the
Third Reich and its Nazi minions occupy Italy and imprison all Jews in
work camps. 
It is after the movie takes this dramatic turn that the movie's theme of
family love becomes the strongest. Although prior to this turning point
Benigni plays Guido with a sort of goofy charm, he relaxes the role to
ensure his son's happiness. Now, instead of awkwardly seducing the sweet
Dora, he constantly reassures his son that everything will be all right.
Benigni's performance is truly a well-rounded one, and certainly one of
the more fluid turns all year. 
The supports are all strong as well, but the movie truly excels in its
script. LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL is a self-proclaimed fable, one which tells
its story in grand, two-part fashion. In certain parts it manages to
sink to the level of a "Saturday Night Live" spinoff -- a number of
humorous skits connected by a token plot -- but in the movie's second
half the script's circular nature becomes admirably obvious. Characters
make reprise appearances in fine form, and certain events which are
intially curious become critically linked to the plot's outcome. 
In all, fans of foreign film will see this as a memorable motion
picture, and novice movie-watchers may take this opportunity to see
their first "artsy" film. LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL is an artsy movie by
convention but easily accessible to everyone, and above all is a fine
thematic picture. 

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Release Date: July 17, 1998
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta Jones,
Stuart Wilson, Matthew Letscher
Directed by: Martin Campbell
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (intense action and violence)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/mask.htm 
For the first time in a long time, both the experienced cinema-goer and
the novice movie-watcher get to experience top-notch derring-do and
flamboyance without having to travel to an obscure film festival. With a
zest normally reserved for independent or little-known features, THE
MASK OF ZORRO combines excellent acting and theatrics with guns-blazing
action with sensual romanticism with an interesting story for a
smorgasboard of demographic targets. Everything about ZORRO is handled
thoughtfully, carefully, and intelligently for a motion picture that
definitely comes in at above par. 
Directed by Martin Campbell, whose last feature saw the return of James
Bond in GOLDENEYE, the movie is set in early 19th century Mexico tells
the story of the legendary folk hero, Zorro. The masked man is to
Mexicans then what Batman is to prepubescent comic readers today - a man
who works against crime and injustice anonymously. Similar to Batman,
Zorro's true identity is that of an aristocrat, Don Diego de la Vega
(Anthony Hopkins). And so it begins, as Zorro strides onto the screen a
la James Bond, etches his Z into space, and the audience is ready. The
story, then: Diego wearies of his extensive tenure as Zorro and, after
losing his wife and daughter to a cruel tyrant (Stuart Wilson), he
retires into hiding. Many years later, he comes across a young man named
Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas) who is seeking to avenge his
brother's death. 
The opening scenes, which develop the characters and motives of Don
Diego and Alejandro, are well done in every respect. The audiences grow
to know and like the characters. Both are well-cast, Banderas for his
sex appeal and Hopkins for his wizened countenance; these appointments
continue to show their worth as Banderas and Hopkins play off of each
other for the movie's comic relief. As the story continues, it turns out
that the man who murdered Alejandro's brother, Captain Harrison Love
(Matthew Letscher) now works for Don Diego's villain, Don Rafael
Montero. Don Diego takes Alejandro under his wing and trains him to be
his successor as the masked hero of Mexico. Unfortunately for both men,
the wrench in their plans is the reappearance of Don Diego's daughter,
Elena (Catherine Zeta Jones) who had been raised as Montero's own during
the intervening years. 
Jones plays Elena with noticeable strength and energy, and the result of
this is a romance that sizzles veritably between Elena and Alejandro.
Although the relationship between Elena and her mostly-unknown father
Don Diego is not hit upon until late in the movie, it nevertheless
provides a believable motive for Diego's character to take the actions
that he does. The only plot hole that the John Eskow, Ted Elliot, and
Terry Rossio script encounters, in fact, is the post-Cold War-esque
invention of a motive for Don Rafael. Although the Zorro's primary goal
was to defend the wronged in the Mexican Revolution, the lack of such an
event means that the same villain must inspire a new revolution, this
time with the succession of California from the United States. But for
all of the fun and games that follows, it's definitely worth looking
past; it's also worth paying full price to see the pic.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE MASK OF ZORRO": 3.5 stars - a great movie.

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
Release Date: February 12, 1999
Starring: Brendan Fraser, Alicia Silverstone, Christopher Walken, Sissy
Spacek, Dave Foley
Directed by: Hugh Wilson
Distributed by: New Line Cinema
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (brief language, sex and drug references) 
Everyday life has a certain odd humor to it, especially to the
uninformed viewer. Many of us have grown accustomed to it, having been
frequent observers of "everyday life" for most of our lives. But pop
sitcoms like "Seinfeld" have made millions by showing us how funny life
really is, and now cinema has taken up that task as well. Like last
year's HOLY MAN, which took a character unfamiliar with modern society
and dropped him into pop culture, BLAST FROM THE PAST gives us a fresh
and envigorating look at what society really is. 
This brand new perspective of the ordinary is accompanied by quite a few
laughs, too. Aided by Brendan Fraser's innocent countenance, which he
used to great effect in 1997's GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE, and the
straight-faced humor which Christopher Walken has mastered, the script
manages to engage the audience in a charming manner. Although the jokes
are rough on the edges early on, by the middle of the movie's 110-minute
running time the comedy is very polished. 
Directed by Hugh Wilson, who helmed the first POLICE ACADEMY movie,
there's no reason it shouldn't be polished. Wilson also wrote the script
with rookie scribe Bill Kelly, and it tells the story of the
quentessential 60's family, the Webbers. Although perhaps a bit
eccentric, everything appears normal until we learn that Calvin Webber
(Walken) has been constructing a fallout shelter underneath his garage,
and when news of the Cuban Missile Crisis breaks, Calvin and his wife
Helen (Sissy Spacek) go underground for thirty years. It's there that
Helen gives birth to Adam (Fraser), whom the Webbers raise on their own
for nearly thirty years. Only then does Adam return to the surface to
give us the AUSTIN POWERS-esque situation of a man from the sixties
stuck in the nineties. 
While on the surface, Adam unwittingly meets and charms Eve Rustikov
(Alicia Silverstone), with the help of her gay friend Troy (David
Foley). Both Silverstone and Foley play these roles perfectly, with
Silverstone developing excellent romantic chemistry and Foley doing
humorous asides. They make the movie a joy to watch, and the script,
which takes a nearly implausible premise and makes it happen, is also in
good form. Boiled down, BLAST FROM THE PAST is simply a bread-and-butter
romantic comedy -- the narrative cop-out of an ending gives this away --
but it's good, clean, fun and that's all that counts. For those not
looking for the serious drama of weepy love affairs, this is the ticket.

Title
Review for Major League: Back to the Minors (1998)
Release Date: April 17, 1998
Starring: Scott Bakula, Corbin Bernsen, Thom Barry, Ted McGinley Jensen
Daggett, Eric Bruskotter, Walt Goggins, Dennis Haysbert, Takaaki
Ishibashi, Bob Uecker
Directed by: John Warren
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (brief language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/major.htm
People who think Hollywood should stay away from sequels are most
definitely going to use MAJOR LEAGUE: BACK TO THE MINORS as ammunition
for their case. There are very few movies that can survive the sophomore
jinx, let alone become franchises that sprawl out to three or four or
even five movies. ROCKY, BATMAN, ALIEN, and LETHAL WEAPON are all
enjoyable movies that have now spawned at least three less-than-
enjoyable follow-ups, and in the case of ROCKY, we did have to sit
through Stallone's stinker of a fifth episode (although the point might
be made that it capped the series off). Hopefully, though, MAJOR LEAGUE
3's dismal appearance will warrant a cut-off for the series, as an
outing like this does not deserve to be repeated. 
There is little to like about the bad humor and dismal cast that
cultivates MAJOR LEAGUE 3. Only three members of the original cast
haven't nixed the franchise by this episode, and the title character is
fresh meat. Scott Bakula (from a more enjoyable sports comedy, Necessary
Roughness) plays Gus Cantrell, a minor league baseball player who, on
the verge of retirement, takes the option from Roger Dorn (Corbin
Bernsen) to manage a triple-A team in the Minnesota Twins' organization
called the Buzz. Predictably, at the movie's outset, the group is a
bumbling gaggle of klutzes that fight amongst themselves and boggle
routine plays. And predictably, with Gus' help, they become a top-notch
farm team. The climax of the movie comes with a bet between Gus and
Leonard Huff (Ted McGinley), the manager of the Twins, that pits the
Buzz against the Twins. 
Bob Uecker as Harry Doyle, the vulgar announcer, and Dennis Haysbert as
the intimdating Cuban batsman Pedro Cerrano, are the other two cast
members (along with Bernsen) to make it back. Also returning from the
second movie is Takaaki Ishibashi, although those three characters have
lost their novelty and don't lend much to the movie's story. Even
Uecker, usually funny, has lost a lot of his idiosyncrasies for the sake
of a PG-13 rating: his drunken abandon is replaced with dry humor that
loses appeal quickly. Bakula is decent as Buzz manager Cantrell,
although his attempt at middle-aged wisdom doesn't lend itself to the
audience the way Tom Berringer's did for the first movie. Bernsen, too,
as Dorn, has lost his appeal, and Jensen Daggett (from FRIDAY THE 13TH
PART VIII - now that's sequel overkill), who plays Gus' fiancee Maggie,
is good-looking onscreen but either underused in the script or just
pointless. 
Sports comedies are drastically in decline, and that may correlate to
the declining stability of professional sports. Laughable gems like
MAJOR LEAGUE don't deserve to be ruined by poor sequels, and even though
Warner Brothers may not have realized it prior to their distribution of
the third episode, they may after it brings in poor box office receipts.
Although CITY OF ANGELS was a diamond in the rough for the film company,
they haven't had a box-office smash in seven months. MAJOR LEAGUE: BACK
TO THE MINORS is definitely missable, for just about every person and
for just about any other movie.
FINAL AWARD FOR "MAJOR LEAGUE 3": 0.5 stars - a very poor movie.

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
Release Date: September 25, 1998
Starring: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Jonathan Pryce, Natascha McElhone,
Stellan Skarsgard, Sean Bean, Katarina Witt
Directed by: John Frankenheimer
Distributed by: Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer
MPAA Rating: R (strong violence, some language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/ronin.htm
There exists a litany of differences between a successful action movie
and a successful suspense movie. Action movies are typically devoid of
plot other than a simple byline which can string together several
explosive sequences, while suspense movies hinge on plot and subtlety
and the ability to bring everything full-circle. For fans of both
genres, however, realism is key. Action fans want to know that the
weapons and methods their heroes are using are authentic, and suspense
fans want everything to fall into an explainable framework by the
movie's end. On this advice, Director John Frankenheimer (THE ISLAND OF
DR. MOREAU) strives for realism in an interestingly dynamic balance of
suspense and action for his latest thriller, RONIN. 
The depth of intrigue in RONIN is quite amazing, considering the fare
that's fallen into the same category over the last few years. The
script, written by J.D. Zeik in his big-screen debut, approaches levels
of complexity that had people spinning away from MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE two
years ago. A certain number of people will be lost by this, but
afficianados will appreciate it all the more and return multiple times.
Frankenheimer masters the script with poise, and tells us a dark but
stoically realistic tale of a group of post-Cold War mercenaries working
to earn their paycheck. His ability to convey feeling and character
while promoting explosiveness and tense atmosphere works well here, and
RONIN becomes a better movie because of it. 
Robert De Niro headlines this cast of noteworthies in a performance that
is the most outstanding of his in quite some time. He takes command and
offers much gravity as the ex-spy Sam, a man who's called to France to
help a shady operations controller named Dierdre (Natascha McElhone)
recover a package. The package becomes the central motivator for the
entire cast, especially once the requisite double-crossing begins, and
its role is skillfully penned by Zeik. At times, however, Zeik's tale
becomes almost too reminiscent of MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE - De Niro might
easily become Tom Cruise, the package might become Cruise's computer
disk. Fortunately, the focus here is almost entirely on the package,
whereas in MISSION the script was more concerned with the double-cross
and why it happened. 
The action content is impressive, and it lives up to the hints given in
previews. The only fans who will be disappointed are those who expect
full-blown combat scenes and instead are forced to suffer through
moments of slowness. RONIN does take a degree of intelligence to follow
all of the nuance from start to finish, but even the uninitiated will be
able to keep a grasp on most characters mand subplots. The suspense
tapers off considerably by the end, a bit of a drawback because of its
height at the movie's open. Considering these factors it's good to see
that RONIN was a project that turned out well, and it's another good bet
this month. Since quality is usually sparse during the early fall
months, it's definitely worth the visit.

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
Release Date: March 6, 1998
Starring: Paul Newman, Susan Sarandon, Gene Hackman, Stockard Channing,
Reese Witherspoon, James Garner, Liev Schrieber, Margo Martindale, John
Spencer
Directed by: Robert Benton
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violence, language, some sexuality)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/twilight.htm
By all rights and properties of the American movie-going public,
TWILIGHT should and will not be a popular movie. It has a target
audience of people who were in the prime of their life the last time
Paul Newman was in a feature film and it opens on a very crowded weekend
with three other, more popular releases (by "popular" I mean a wider
target audience). But popularity and weekend gross statistics are by no
means a measure of a film's quality, and every once in a while a gem
such as TWILIGHT slips through the net. 
The storytelling style that Director Robert Benton adopts is equal parts
film noir and complex mystery thriller. Although the plot isn't too
confusing, it is a prerequisite that the viewer follows along throughout
the entire movie: characters' names are important and connections are
immediately lost if a role is regarded as unimportant. Although Paul
Newman's tongue-in-cheek voice-overs are part of the film noir style,
they don't really help to keep the story clear. Fortunately they don't
get tiresome or annoying - they were written in to elevate the
comfortable level of cyncism that Newman's character of Harry Ross
shows. 
Harry Ross (Newman) is an ex-police officer, ex-private investigator,
and current friend to Jack and Catherine Ames (Gene Hackman and Susan
Sarandon). Both former thespians, the Ames' have their share of
antagonists. At the time of the movie, which takes place in the
Hollywood area, Jack Ames is at the beck and call of a blackmailer (Liev
Schrieber) who has information about the death of another actor. At the
onset, the danger of this information is unclear, until Jack calls Harry
in to pay off the blackmailer. Harry, being an former investigator and
policeman, checks out the situation a bit more thoroughly and discovers
that Jack and Catherine may not be as innocent as they seem. 
The main cast is pretty small, which allows for a lot of plot
intricacies to develop. I can't remember the last time I've seen a noir
drama with as many plot twists as TWILIGHT. Even the likes of MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE, which countless people have told me was far too confusing,
didn't have as many turnabouts as TWILIGHT. Even so, some supporting
characters were a bit superfluous: both Jack's daughter Mel (Reese
Witherspoon) and the blackmailer's parole officer (Margo Martindale)
were nothing but excuses to show off a lot of Hollywood's immoral
excesses (sex and money, respectively). Nevertheless, quality
performances from the upper-echelon likes of Hackman, Sarandon, and
Newman didn't hurt, and a believable and interesting story were what
powered this movie. Recommendable to everyone except the
action-at-any-cost types.

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
Release Date: July 10, 1998
Starring: Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo, Chris Rock,
Jet Li, Steve Kahan, Kim Chan
Directed by: Richard Donner
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: R (violence, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/lethal.htm
For the second time this summer - in just as many weeks - Hollywood has
proven to audiences everywhere that action-adventure is the best genre
for exploiting formula to get box office dollars. Although in most
respects, the world 'formula' is used by critics to sink new releases -
hence garnering its bad connotation - it is applied with better spirits
to the latest installment of the LETHAL WEAPON series. Helmed by Richard
Donner, who has worked with Mel Gibson in two of his last three pictures
and has directed the other three Lethal pics, number four combines an
exciting mix of explosive action and comedic dialogue for a sure-fire
success of a motion picture. 
Back for LETHAL 4 are Gibson, Danny Glover, Rene Russo, and Joe Pesci;
they're joined this time by comedian Chris Rock in one of his biggest
and best performances yet. Gibson and Glover are the real stars, though,
reprising their roles as Riggs and Murtaugh to chase down some Chinese
counterfeiters. After discovering some Chinese illegal aliens aboard a
boat in the Los Angeles harbor, they track them to a sweatshop where the
immigrants work to create bogus cash. The story in the Channing Gibson
script, however, almost plays second fiddle to the intense rush of
pyrotechnics that is heavily dispersed throughout the movie. Equally
present is the vulgar language, although it doesn't make the movie any
less enjoyable and is rarely outstanding. 
It could be said that Director Donner stretches the limits of reality
when providing the action content in LETHAL WEAPON 4, for there's no
limit to the amount or convenience of the items that the story will have
blown up. For instance: in the opening scene, Riggs and Murtaugh take on
a crazy in a bulletproof suit, armed with an assault rifle and a napalm
gun. Of course, there's a napalm tank on his back, and his chosen ground
for the standoff is a gas station with an oil truck parked outside.
Guess what happens to the bad guy, the oil truck, and the gas station?
Or in another scene: Riggs and his girlfriend Lorna (Russo) are trapped
at a train crossing by some thugs in a Suburban. Just in time, Riggs
pulls out of the way of the oncoming train so that it hits the Suburban;
and moments later, another train comes bearing down to hit the other
side of the Suburban. 
There are these examples and many more, but the bottom line is that
Donner gets the stuff to blow up really well. Following on the heels of
the noise-laden, fire-filled ARMAGEDDON, action fans will surely be
pleased by LETHAL 4. It sticks to its guns and nimbly mixes humor
(thanks, in no small part, to the thinly disguised standup routine of
Chris Rock) with action. It's been quite some time since a movie has
been able to truly recreate the exciting eye candy style of action
perfected by DIE HARD ten years ago, and LETHAL WEAPON 4 does just that.
Of the many films that have been or will be released between Memorial
Day and the end of July, this one will surely be among the most
memorable.
FINAL AWARD FOR "LETHAL WEAPON 4": 3.0 stars - a good movie.
